Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
RENAMING AND REORGANIZATION OF
THE OFFICE OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT
SECTION 1.
(1) The amendments to ORS 401.052, 401.054, 401.062, 401.072, 401.076, 401.082,
401.088 and 401.092 by sections 2 to 9 of this 2021 Act are intended to change the name of the
“Office of Emergency Management” to the “Oregon Department of Emergency
Management” and to establish  that entity as a state agency independent from the Oregon
Military Department.
(2) For the purpose of harmonizing and clarifying  statutory law, the Legislative Counsel
may substitute for words  designating the “Office of Emergency Management,” wherever they
occur in statutory law, other words  designating the “Oregon Department of Emergency
Management.”
SECTION 2.
 ORS 401.052 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 1
401.052. (1) The [ Office] Oregon  Department  of Emergency Management is established [ in the
Oregon Military Department ].
(2) The [ office] department shall be responsible for:
(a) Coordinating and facilitating private sector and governmental efforts to  prevent, prepare for,
respond to and recover from emergencies; and
(b) Coordinating  exercises and training, planning, preparedness, response, mitigation and recov-
ery activities with state and local emergency services agencies and organizations.
(3) The [ office] department shall prepare a statewide emergency management plan  and update
the plan from time to time as necessary.
SECTION 3.  ORS 401.054 is amended to read:
401.054. (1) Each of the following agencies,  entities and officials shall designate an individual
to act as a liaison with the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management:
(a) The Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(b) The Department of Corrections;
(c) The Department of Education;
(d) The Department of Environmental Quality;
(e) The Department of Human Services;
(f) The Department of Justice;
(g) The Department of Land Conservation and Development;
(h) The Department of Public Safety Standards and Training;
(i) The Department of State Lands;
(j) The Department of State Police;
(k) The Department of Transportation;
(L) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs;
(m) The Employment Department;
(n) The Housing and Community Services Department;
(o) The Judicial Department;
(p) The Oregon Business Development Department;
(q) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services;
(r) The Oregon Department of Aviation;
(s) The Oregon Health Authority;
(t) The Oregon Military Department;
(u) The Oregon Tourism Commission;
(v) The Public Utility Commission of Oregon;
(w) The Secretary of State;
(x) The State Department of Agriculture;
(y) The State Department of Energy;
(z) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife;
(aa) The State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries;
(bb) The State Fire Marshal;
(cc) The State Forestry Department;
(dd) The State Marine Board;
(ee) The State Parks and Recreation Department;
(ff) The Travel Information Council; and
(gg) The Water Resources Department.
(2) Each agency, entity and official required to designate a liaison under  this section shall des-
ignate an individual who has authority during an emergency  to allocate resources and assets of the
agency, entity or official.
(3) Each individual designated as a liaison under subsection (1) of this section shall  assist in the
coordination of the functions of the agency,  entity or official that designated the individual that
relate to emergency preparedness and response with  similar functions of the [ Office] Oregon De-
partment of Emergency Management.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 2
SECTION 4.  ORS 401.062 is amended to read:
401.062. (1) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management is under the super-
vision and control of a director, who is responsible for the performance  of the duties, functions and
powers of the [ office] department.
(2) [The Adjutant General, with the approval  of] The Governor[ ,] shall appoint the Director of the
[Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management, who holds office at the pleasure of the
[Adjutant General. ] Governor. The appointment  of the director is subject to confirmation by
the Senate in the manner prescribed by ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(3) The director  shall be paid a salary as provided by law or, if not so provided, as prescribed
by [ the Adjutant General, with the approval of ] the Governor.
(4) For purposes of administration, subject to the approval of the [ Adjutant General ] Governor,
the director may organize and reorganize the [ office] department  as  the director considers neces-
sary to properly conduct the work of the [ office] department.
(5) The director may divide the functions of the [ office] department  into  administrative divi-
sions. Subject to the approval of the [ Adjutant General ] Governor , the director may appoint an in-
dividual to administer each division. The administrator of each  division serves at the pleasure of the
director and is not subject to the provisions of ORS  chapter 240. Each individual appointed under
this subsection  must be well qualified by technical training and experience in the functions to be
performed by the individual.
SECTION 5.  ORS 401.072 is amended to read:
401.072. (1) The Director of the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management may,
by written order filed with the Secretary of State, appoint a deputy director. The deputy  director
serves at the pleasure of the director, has authority to act for the director in the absence  of the
director and is subject to the control of the director at all times.
(2) Subject to any applicable provisions of ORS chapter 240, the director shall appoint all sub-
ordinate officers and employees of the [ Office of Emergency Management ] department , prescribe
their duties and fix their compensation.
SECTION 6.  ORS 401.076 is amended to read:
401.076. In accordance with  applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183, the Director of the
[Office] Oregon Department  of  Emergency Management may adopt rules necessary for the admin-
istration of the laws that the [ Office of Emergency Management ] department  is charged with  ad-
ministering.
SECTION 7.  ORS 401.092 is amended to read:
401.092. (1) The Director  of the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management is re-
sponsible for coordinating and facilitating exercises and  training, emergency planning, preparedness,
response, mitigation and recovery activities with  the state and local emergency services agencies
and organizations, and shall[ , with the approval of the Adjutant General or as  directed by the Gover-
nor]:
(a) Make rules that are necessary and proper for the administration and implementation  of this
chapter;
(b) Coordinate the activities of all public and private  organizations specifically related to pro-
viding emergency services within this state;
(c) Maintain a cooperative liaison with  emergency management agencies and organizations of
local governments, other states and the federal government;
(d) Have such additional authority, duties and responsibilities authorized by this chapter or as
may be directed by the Governor;
(e) Administer grants relating to emergency  program management under ORS 401.305, emer-
gency services for the state and the statewide 2-1-1 system as provided in ORS 403.430;
(f) Provide for and staff [ a] the State Emergency Operations Center to  aid the Governor and the
[Office of Emergency Management ] department in the performance of duties under this chapter;
(g) Serve as  the Governor’s authorized representative for coordination of certain response ac-
tivities and managing the recovery process;
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 3
(h) Establish training and  professional standards for local emergency program management
personnel;
(i) Establish task  forces and advisory groups to assist the [ office] department  in achieving
mandated responsibilities;
(j) Enforce compliance requirements of federal and state agencies  for receiving funds and con-
ducting designated emergency functions;
(k) Oversee the design, implementation and support of a  statewide 2-1-1 system as provided un-
der ORS 403.415; and
(L) Coordinate the activities of state and local governments to enable state and local  govern-
ments to  work together during domestic incidents as provided in the National Incident Management
System established by the Homeland Security Presidential Directive 5 of February 28, 2003.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the State Forester  shall serve as the
Governor’s authorized representative for the  purpose of initiating the fire management assistance
declaration process with  the Federal Emergency Management Agency and administering Federal
Emergency Management Agency fire management assistance grants.
SECTION 8.  ORS 401.082 is amended to read:
401.082. (1) To aid and advise the Director of the [ Office] Oregon Department  of  Emergency
Management in the performance of the functions of the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency
Management, the director  may establish such advisory and technical committees as the director
considers necessary. The committees may be continuing or temporary. The director shall  determine
the representation, membership, terms and organization  of the committees and shall appoint their
members. The director is an ex officio member of each committee.
(2) Members of  the committees are not entitled to compensation, but in the discretion of the
director may be reimbursed from funds available  to the [ office] department for actual and necessary
travel and other expenses incurred by them in the performance of their official  duties in the manner
and amount provided in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 9.  ORS 401.088 is amended to read:
401.088. The Director of the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management  may enter
into interagency agreements  with other state agencies that the director determines are necessary
to carry out the duties of the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management.
(Finance)
SECTION 10. (1) The unexpended balances of amounts authorized to be expended by the
Oregon Military Department for purposes of  the Office of Emergency Management for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from revenues dedicated,  continuously appropriated, appro-
priated or otherwise made available to the department, are transferred to  and are available
for expenditure by the Oregon Department of Emergency Management  for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2021.
(2) The expenditure classifications, if any, established by Acts authorizing or  limiting
expenditures by the Office of Emergency Management remain applicable to expenditures  by
the Oregon Department of Emergency Management under this section.
(Action, Proceeding, Prosecution)
SECTION 11. The amendments to  ORS 401.052, 401.054, 401.062, 401.072, 401.076, 401.082,
401.088 and 401.092 by sections 2 to 9 of this  2021 Act do not affect any action, proceeding
or prosecution involving or with respect to any duties, functions and powers  of the Office
of Emergency Management begun before and pending as of the operative date specified  in
section 155 of this 2021 Act, except that the Oregon Department of Emergency Management
is substituted for the Office of Emergency Management in any such action, proceeding or
prosecution.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 4
(Liability, Duty, Obligation)
SECTION 12. (1) Nothing in the amendments to ORS 401.052, 401.054,  401.062, 401.072,
401.076, 401.082, 401.088 and 401.092 by sections 2 to 9 of this 2021 Act relieves a person of a
liability, duty or  obligation accruing under or with respect to the duties, functions and pow-
ers conferred by those statutes prior to the operative date specified in section 155 of this 2021
Act. The Oregon Department of Emergency Management may undertake the collection or
enforcement of any such liability, duty or obligation.
(2) The rights  and obligations of the Office of Emergency Management legally incurred
under contracts, leases and business transactions executed, entered into or begun before  the
operative date specified in section 155 of  this 2021 Act are transferred to the Oregon De-
partment of Emergency Management.  For the purpose of succession to these rights and ob-
ligations, the Oregon Department of Emergency Management is a continuation of the  Office
of Emergency Management and not a new authority.
(Rules, References)
SECTION 13.
The rules of the Office of Emergency Management in effect on the  opera-
tive date specified in section 155 of this 2021 Act continue in effect until  superseded or re-
pealed by rules of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management. References in  rules
of the  Office of Emergency Management to the Office of Emergency Management or an of-
ficer or employee of the Office of Emergency Management are considered to be references
to the Oregon Department  of Emergency Management or an officer or employee of the
Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
SECTION 14.
Whenever, in any statutory  law or resolution of the Legislative Assembly
or in any rule, document, record or proceeding  authorized by the Legislative Assembly, ref-
erence is made to the Office of Emergency Management  or an officer or employee of the
Office of Emergency Management, the reference is considered to be a  reference to the
Oregon Department of Emergency Management or an officer or employee  of the Oregon
Department of Emergency Management.
(Initial Director)
SECTION 15. The Director of the  Office of Emergency Management on the operative date
specified in section 155 of this 2021  Act shall serve as the initial Director of the Oregon De-
partment of Emergency Management  at the pleasure of the Governor and without the need
for confirmation by the Senate.
(Transfer of Emergency Powers to
the Oregon Department of Emergency Management)
SECTION 16.  ORS 401.094 is amended to read:
401.094. (1)(a) The Department of  State Police shall maintain a system for the notification and
interagency coordination of state resources in  response to emergencies involving multijurisdictional
cooperation between the various levels of government and private business entities.
(b) The department shall provide  the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management
with a service level agreement that describes the continued daily  operations and maintenance of the
system, the services and supplies needed to maintain the system 24 hours  a day, every day of the
year, and the policies and procedures that support the overall notification system.
(2) The notification system shall be  managed by the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency
Management as a continuously available communications network  and a component of the state’s
emergency operations center.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 5
(3) The notification system shall be the  primary point of contact by which any public agency
provides the state notification of  an emergency or disaster, or requests access to state and federal
resources.
(4) Each department of  state government, and those agencies of state government identified in
the statewide emergency management plan prepared under ORS 401.052 as having emergency service
or administrative responsibilities, shall appoint an emergency  management coordinator as their
representative to work with the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management on the
development and implementation of emergency plans and procedures.
(5) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management  shall adopt rules relating to
the planning, administration and operation of the notification system maintained  under this section.
SECTION 16a.
 ORS 401.094, as amended by section 16 of this 2021 Act, is amended to read:
401.094. (1)[ (a)] The Oregon Department of [ State Police ] Emergency Management  shall main-
tain a system for the notification and interagency coordination of state resources  in response to
emergencies involving multijurisdictional cooperation between  the various levels of government and
private business entities.
[(b) The department shall provide the Oregon Department of Emergency Management with a service
level agreement that describes the continued daily operations and  maintenance of the system, the ser-
vices and supplies needed  to maintain the system 24 hours a day, every day of the year, and the policies
and procedures that support the overall notification system. ]
(2) The notification system shall be managed  by the [ Oregon Department of Emergency Manage-
ment] department  as  a continuously available communications network and a component of the
state’s emergency operations center.
(3) The notification system shall be the primary point of  contact by which any public agency
provides the state notification of an emergency or disaster, or requests access  to state and federal
resources.
(4) Each department of state government, and those agencies of state  government identified in
the statewide emergency management plan prepared under ORS 401.052 as having emergency service
or administrative responsibilities, shall appoint  an emergency management coordinator as their
representative to work with the  [Oregon Department of Emergency Management ] department on the
development and implementation of emergency plans and procedures.
(5) The  [ Oregon Department of Emergency Management ] department  shall adopt rules relating
to the planning, administration and operation of the notification system maintained under this  sec-
tion.
NOTE:
 Sections 17 through 23 were deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were  not re-
numbered.
SECTION 24.  ORS 476.590 is amended to read:
476.590. The State Fire Marshal , in consultation with the Director of the Oregon  Depart-
ment of Emergency Management,  shall prepare plans for the effective carrying  out of the pro-
visions of ORS 476.520 to 476.610 and provide advice and counsel to the Governor for  the most
practical utilization under ORS 476.520 to 476.610 of the fire-fighting resources of this state.
NOTE: Section 25 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
(Emergency Preparedness Functions)
SECTION 25a. The Oregon Department of Emergency Management shall carry out the
following functions:
(1) Coordinate emergency management functions on a regional basis within this state;
(2) Coordinate training related to emergency response on a  regional basis within this
state; and
(3) Develop and carry out emergency preparedness exercises on a statewide basis.
(Conforming Amendments)
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 6
SECTION 26.  ORS 195.260 is amended to read:
195.260. (1) In order to reduce the risk of serious bodily injury or death resulting  from rapidly
moving landslides, a local government:
(a) Shall exercise all available authority to protect the public during emergencies,  consistent
with ORS 401.032.
(b) May require a geotechnical report and, if a report is required, shall provide for a coordinated
review of the geotechnical report by the State Department of Geology and  Mineral Industries or the
State Forestry Department, as appropriate, before issuing a building  permit for a site in a further
review  area.
(c) Except those structures exempt from building codes under ORS 455.310 and 455.315, shall
amend its land use regulations,  or adopt new land use regulations, to regulate the siting of dwellings
and other structures designed for human occupancy, including those  being restored under ORS
215.130 (6), in  further review areas where there is evidence of substantial risk for rapidly moving
landslides. All final decisions under this paragraph  and paragraph (b) of this subsection are the re-
sponsibility of the local government with jurisdiction over the  site. A local government may not
delegate such final decisions to any state agency.
(d) May deny a request to issue a building permit if a geotechnical report discloses  that the
entire parcel is subject to  a rapidly moving landslide or that the subject lot or parcel does not
contain sufficient buildable area that is not subject to a rapidly moving landslide.
(e) Shall maintain a record, available to  the public, of properties for which a geotechnical report
has been prepared within the jurisdiction of the local government.
(2) A landowner allowed a building permit under subsection  (1)(c) of this section shall sign a
statement that shall:
(a) Be recorded with the county clerk of the county  in which the property is located, in which
the landowner acknowledges that the landowner  may not in the future bring any action against an
adjacent landowner about the  effects of rapidly moving landslides on or adjacent to the landowner’s
property;  and
(b) Record in the deed records for the county where the  lot or parcel is located a nonrevocable
deed restriction that the landowner signs and  acknowledges, that contains a legal description com-
plying with ORS 93.600 and that prohibits any  present or future owner of the property from bringing
any action against an adjacent landowner about the effects  of rapidly moving landslides on or ad-
jacent to the property.
(3) Restrictions on forest practices  adopted under ORS 527.710 (10) do not apply to risk situ-
ations arising solely from the construction of a building designed for human  occupancy in a further
review area on or after October 23, 1999.
(4) The following state agencies shall  implement the following specific responsibilities to reduce
the risk of serious bodily injury or death resulting from rapidly moving landslides:
(a) The State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries shall:
(A) Identify and map further review areas selected  in cooperation with local governments and
in coordination  with the State Forestry Department, and provide technical assistance to local gov-
ernments to facilitate the  use and application of this information pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this
section; and
(B) Provide public education regarding landslide hazards.
(b) The State Forestry Department shall regulate forest  operations to reduce the risk of serious
bodily injury or death from rapidly  moving landslides directly related to forest operations, and assist
local governments in the siting review of permanent  dwellings on and adjacent to forestlands in
further review areas pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(c) The Land  Conservation and Development Commission may take steps under its existing au-
thority to assist local governments  to appropriately apply the requirements of subsection (1)(c) of
this section.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 7
(d) The Department of Transportation shall provide warnings to motorists during periods deter-
mined to be of highest risk of rapidly moving landslides along areas on state highways with a his-
tory of being most vulnerable to rapidly moving landslides.
(e) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management shall  coordinate state re-
sources for rapid and effective response to landslide-related emergencies.
(5) Notwithstanding  any other provision of law, any state or local agency adopting rules related
to the risk of serious bodily injury or death from rapidly moving landslides shall do so only in con-
formance with the policies and provisions of ORS 195.250 to 195.260.
(6) No state or local agency may adopt or enact any rule or ordinance for the purpose of re-
ducing risk of serious bodily injury or death from rapidly moving landslides  that limits the use of
land that is in addition to land identified as a  further review area by the State Department of
Geology and Mineral Industries or the State Forestry Department  pursuant to subsection (4) of this
section.
(7) Except as provided in ORS 527.710 or in Oregon’s ocean and  coastal land use planning goals,
no state agency may adopt criteria regulating activities  for the purpose of reducing risk of serious
bodily injury or death from rapidly  moving landslides on lands subject to the provisions of ORS
195.250 to 195.260 that are more  restrictive than the criteria adopted by a local government pursu-
ant to subsection (1)(c) of this section.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 244.050 is amended to read:
244.050. (1) On or before April 15 of each year the following persons shall file with  the Oregon
Government  Ethics  Commission a verified statement of economic interest as required under this
chapter:
(a) The Governor, Secretary  of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries, district attorneys and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Any judicial officer, including justices of the peace and municipal  judges, except any pro tem
judicial officer who does not otherwise serve as a judicial officer.
(c) Any candidate for a public office designated in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Deputy Attorney General.
(e) The Deputy Secretary of State.
(f) The Legislative Administrator, the Legislative Counsel, the Legislative Fiscal Officer,  the
Legislative Policy and Research Director,  the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the House
of Representatives and the Legislative Equity Officer.
(g) The president  and vice presidents, or their administrative equivalents, in each public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002.
(h) The following state officers:
(A) Adjutant General.
(B) Director of Agriculture.
(C) Manager of State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(D) Water Resources Director.
(E) Director of Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) Director of Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(G) State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(H) State Forester.
(I) State Geologist.
(J) Director of Human Services.
(K) Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(L) Director of the Department of State Lands.
(M) State Librarian.
(N) Administrator of Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(O) Superintendent of State Police.
(P) Director of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(Q) Director of Department of Revenue.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 8
(R) Director of Transportation.
(S) Public Utility Commissioner.
(T) Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(U) Executive director of Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(V) Director of the State Department of Energy.
(W) Director and each assistant director of the Oregon State Lottery.
(X) Director of the Department of Corrections.
(Y) Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(Z) Executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(AA) Director of the Oregon Business Development Department.
(BB) Director of the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management.
(CC) Director of the Employment Department.
(DD) State Fire Marshal.
[(DD)] (EE) Chief of staff for the Governor.
[(EE)] (FF) Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
[(FF)] (GG) State Court Administrator.
[(GG)] (HH) Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
[(HH)] (II) Board chairperson of the Land Use Board of Appeals.
[(II)] (JJ) State Marine Director.
[(JJ)] (KK) Executive director of the Oregon Racing Commission.
[(KK) ] (LL) State Parks and Recreation Director.
[(LL)] (MM) Public defense services executive director.
[(MM)] (NN) Chairperson of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
[(NN)] (OO) Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
[(OO)] (PP) Executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
[(PP)] (QQ) Executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
[(QQ)] (RR) Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
[(RR)] (SS) Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
[(SS)] (TT) Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(i) The First Partner, the legal counsel, the  deputy legal counsel and all policy advisors within
the Governor’s office.
(j) Every elected city or county official.
(k) Every member of a city or county planning, zoning or development commission.
(L) The chief executive officer of a city or county who performs the  duties of manager or prin-
cipal administrator of the city or county.
(m) Members of local government boundary commissions formed under ORS 199.410 to 199.519.
(n) Every member of a governing body of a metropolitan  service district and the auditor and
executive officer thereof.
(o) Each member of the board of directors of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(p) The chief administrative officer and the financial officer  of each common and union high
school district, education service district and community college district.
(q) Every member of the following state boards and commissions:
(A) Governing board of the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
(B) Oregon Business Development Commission.
(C) State Board of Education.
(D) Environmental Quality Commission.
(E) Fish and Wildlife Commission of the State of Oregon.
(F) State Board of Forestry.
(G) Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(H) Oregon Health Policy Board.
(I) Oregon Investment Council.
(J) Land Conservation and Development Commission.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 9
(K) Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(L) Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(M) State Marine Board.
(N) Mass transit district boards.
(O) Energy Facility Siting Council.
(P) Board of Commissioners of the Port of Portland.
(Q) Employment Relations Board.
(R) Public Employees Retirement Board.
(S) Oregon Racing Commission.
(T) Oregon Transportation Commission.
(U) Water Resources Commission.
(V) Workers’ Compensation Board.
(W) Oregon Facilities Authority.
(X) Oregon State Lottery Commission.
(Y) Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.
(Z) Columbia River Gorge Commission.
(AA) Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(BB) Capitol Planning Commission.
(CC) Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(DD) Oregon Growth Board.
(EE) Early Learning Council.
(r) The following officers of the State Treasurer:
(A) Deputy State Treasurer.
(B) Chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer.
(C) Director of the Investment Division.
(s) Every member of the board of commissioners of a port governed by ORS 777.005 to  777.725
or 777.915 to 777.953.
(t) Every member of  the board of directors of an authority created under ORS 441.525 to 441.595.
(u) Every member of a governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(v) Every member of the board of directors of an authority created under ORS 465.600  to
465.621.
(2) By April 15 next after the date an appointment takes effect, every appointed public  official
on a board or commission listed in subsection (1) of this section shall file with  the Oregon Govern-
ment Ethics Commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060, 244.070
and 244.090.
(3) By April 15 next after the filing deadline for the primary election, each candidate described
in subsection (1) of this section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as
required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(4) Not later than the 40th day before the date of the statewide general  election, each candidate
described in subsection (1) of this section who will appear on the  statewide general election ballot
and who was not required to file a  statement of economic interest under subsections (1) to (3) of this
section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS
244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(5) Subsections (1) to (3) of this section apply only to persons  who are incumbent, elected or
appointed public officials as of April 15 and to persons who are candidates on April 15.
(6) If a statement  required to be filed under this section has not been received by the commis-
sion within five days after the date the  statement is due, the commission shall notify the public of-
ficial or candidate and give the public official or candidate not less than 15 days to comply  with the
requirements of this section. If the public official or candidate fails to comply by the date set  by the
commission, the commission may impose a civil penalty as provided in ORS 244.350.
SECTION 28.
 ORS 276A.300 is amended to read:
276A.300. (1) As used in this section:
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 10
(a) “Executive department” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.112.
(b) “Information  systems” means computers, hardware, software, storage media, networks, oper-
ational procedures and processes used in collecting, processing, storing, sharing  or distributing in-
formation within, or  with any access beyond ordinary public access to, the state’s shared computing
and network infrastructure.
(2) The State Chief Information Officer has responsibility for and authority  over information
systems security in the executive department, including responsibility  for taking all measures that
are reasonably necessary to protect the availability, integrity or confidentiality of information  sys-
tems or the information stored in information systems. The State Chief Information Officer shall,
after consultation and collaborative development with agencies, establish a state information  sys-
tems security plan and associated standards, policies and procedures. The plan must align with and
support the Enterprise Information Resources Management Strategy described in ORS 276A.203.
(3) The State Chief Information  Officer may coordinate with the Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services to:
(a) Review and verify the  security of information systems operated by or on behalf of state
agencies;
(b) Monitor state network traffic to identify and react to security threats; and
(c) Conduct vulnerability assessments of state agency information  systems for the purpose of
evaluating  and  responding to the susceptibility of information systems to attack, disruption or any
other event that  threatens the availability, integrity or confidentiality of information systems or the
information stored in information systems.
(4) The State Chief Information Officer  shall contract with qualified, independent consultants for
the purpose of conducting vulnerability assessments under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) In collaboration with appropriate agencies, the State  Chief Information Officer shall develop
and implement  policies for responding to events that damage or threaten the availability, integrity
or confidentiality of information systems or the  information stored in information systems, whether
those systems  are within, interoperable with or outside the state’s shared computing and network
infrastructure. In the policies, the State Chief Information Officer shall prescribe actions  reasonably
necessary to:
(a) Promptly assemble and deploy in a coordinated manner  the expertise, tools and methodol-
ogies required to prevent or mitigate the damage caused or threatened by an event;
(b) Promptly alert other persons of the event and of the  actions reasonably necessary to prevent
or mitigate the damage caused or threatened by the event;
(c) Implement forensic techniques and controls developed under subsection (6) of this section;
(d) Evaluate the event for the purpose of possible improvements to the security  of information
systems; and
(e) Communicate and share information with appropriate agencies, using preexisting  incident
response capabilities.
(6) After consultation and collaborative development with appropriate agencies and  the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, the  State Chief Information Officer shall implement forensic
techniques and controls for the security of information systems, whether those systems are  within,
interoperable  with  or outside the state’s shared computing and network infrastructure. The tech-
niques and controls must include using specialized expertise, tools  and methodologies to investigate
events that damage or threaten  the availability, integrity or confidentiality of information systems
or the information stored in  information systems. The State Chief Information Officer shall consult
with the Oregon State Police, the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management, the
Governor and others as necessary in developing forensic techniques and controls under this  section.
(7) The State Chief Information Officer shall ensure that reasonably  appropriate remedial
actions are undertaken when the State Chief Information Officer finds that such  actions are rea-
sonably necessary by reason of vulnerability assessments of information  systems under subsection
(3) of this section, evaluation  of events under subsection (5) of this section and other evaluations
and audits.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 11
(8)(a) State agencies are responsible for securing computers,  hardware, software, storage media,
networks, operational procedures and processes used  in collecting, processing, storing, sharing or
distributing information outside the state’s shared computing and network  infrastructure, following
information security standards,  policies and procedures established by the State Chief Information
Officer and developed collaboratively with the agencies. Agencies  may establish plans, standards
and measures that are  more stringent than the standards established by the State Chief Information
Officer to address specific agency needs if the plans, standards and measures do  not contradict or
contravene the state information systems security  plan. Independent agency security plans must be
developed within the framework of the state information systems security plan.
(b) A state agency shall report the results of any vulnerability assessment,  evaluation or audit
conducted by the agency  to the State Chief Information Officer for the purposes of consolidating
statewide security reporting and, when appropriate, to prompt a state incident response.
(9) This section does not apply to:
(a) Research and student computer systems used by or in conjunction with  any public university
listed in ORS 352.002; and
(b)(A) Gaming systems and networks operated by the Oregon State  Lottery or contractors of the
State Lottery; or
(B) The results of  Oregon State Lottery reviews, evaluations and vulnerability assessments of
computer systems outside the state’s shared computing and network infrastructure.
(10) The State Chief Information Officer shall adopt  rules to implement the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 276A.326 is amended to read:
276A.326. (1) The Oregon Cybersecurity Advisory Council is established within the office  of the
State Chief Information Officer. The  council consists of nine voting members appointed by the State
Chief Information Officer in consultation with the Governor. A majority of the council’s voting
members must be representatives  of cyber-related industries in Oregon. The voting members of the
council must include at least one representative of post-secondary institutions  of education and one
representative of public law enforcement agencies in Oregon.
(2) The State Chief Information Officer may appoint nonvoting members to the council from:
(a) The Department of Justice;
(b) The office of the Secretary of State;
(c) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management;
(d) The Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(e) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission;
(f) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board;
(g) The Employment Department;
(h) The Oregon Business Development Department; or
(i) Any local, county, state, regional, tribal or federal government partner.
(3) The State Chief Information Officer  shall provide administrative and staff support and facil-
ities as necessary for the council to carry out the purposes set forth in this section.
(4) The purposes of the council are to:
(a) Serve as the statewide advisory  body to the State Chief Information Officer on cybersecurity.
(b) Provide a statewide forum for discussing and resolving cybersecurity issues.
(c) Provide information  and recommend best practices concerning cybersecurity and resilience
measures to public and private entities.
(d) Coordinate cybersecurity information sharing and promote shared and  real-time situational
awareness between the public and private sectors in this state.
(e) Encourage the development of the cybersecurity  workforce through measures including, but
not limited to, competitions aimed  at building workforce skills, disseminating best practices, facili-
tating cybersecurity research and encouraging industry investment and partnership  with post-
secondary institutions of education and other career readiness programs.
(5) The council may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the council.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 12
(6)(a) A majority of the voting members of the council constitutes a quorum for the  transaction
of business.
(b) Official  action by the council requires the approval of a majority of the voting members of
the council.
(7) The State Chief Information  Officer shall appoint one member of the council to serve as
chairperson and one member of the council to serve as vice chairperson.
(8)(a) The term of office of each voting  member of the council is four years, but a member serves
at the pleasure of the State Chief Information Officer.
(b) Before the expiration of the term of a voting member, the State  Chief Information Officer,
in consultation with the Governor, shall appoint a successor whose term  begins on July 1 following
the appointment. A voting member is eligible for reappointment.
(c) A nonvoting member’s term  of office is two years. A nonvoting member is eligible for reap-
pointment.
(d) If there is a vacancy  for any cause, the State Chief Information Officer, in consultation with
the Governor, shall make an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(9) The council  shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson or a ma-
jority of the voting members of the council.
(10) Members of the council who are not members  of the Legislative Assembly are not entitled
to compensation, but the State Chief Information Officer may reimburse a member of the council  for
actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in performing the member’s  official duties,
in the manner and amounts provided for in ORS  292.495, from funds appropriated to the State Chief
Information Officer for purposes of the council.
(11) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the
council in the performance of the council’s duties and, to the extent permitted by laws  relating to
confidentiality, shall furnish information and  advice the council considers necessary to perform the
council’s duties.
SECTION 30.  ORS 377.833 is amended to read:
377.833. (1) The Department of Transportation shall work  together with the Travel Information
Council, the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management,  the Department of State Po-
lice, the Secretary of State and owners of  digital billboards to develop a public notification plan for
the purpose of using digital billboards to display notifications to  the traveling public related to civic
activities  and  public safety. Public notifications include but are not limited to information about the
Government Waste Hotline established  under ORS 177.170, elections, voter registration, Amber
Alerts and natural disasters and other emergencies.
(2) The Department  of Transportation, in coordination with the [ Office] Oregon Department
of Emergency Management, the Department of State Police, the Secretary of State and owners  of
digital billboards, shall prepare  a written public notification plan. In preparing the plan, the De-
partment of Transportation shall address:
(a) The criteria to be applied in determining when it is appropriate to request that  an owner
of a digital billboard display a public notification.
(b) The procedures used to determine the expiration of a notification and to recall  the request
once the information is no longer needed.
SECTION 31.  ORS 399.035 is amended to read:
399.035. (1) In addition to the federally recognized Oregon National Guard  subject to call or
order to federal  service under laws of the United States, there shall be organized within the state
a National Guard Reserve force. Such force shall be known  as the Oregon Civil Defense Force, and
shall be composed principally of officers, warrant officers  and enlisted persons not eligible for gen-
eral service under federal selective service laws.
(2) In time of  peace the Oregon Civil Defense Force shall be maintained at cadre strength in
numbers to be determined by the Governor.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 13
(3) In time of peace the mission of  the Oregon Civil Defense Force shall be to augment the
Oregon National Guard as an internal security  force. In time of war, it shall replace the Oregon
National Guard as a force when the National Guard is ordered into federal service.
(4) Whenever laws of the United  States authorize the organization of such forces under federal
recognition,  the  Governor shall promulgate such regulations as are necessary to comply with such
federal laws and obtain federal recognition for the force authorized by this section.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (4) of this section:
(a) The  Superintendent of State Police may form a volunteer Oregon State Police Civil Defense
Force for the purpose of providing emergency response and communications, medical assistance, lo-
gistical support and other  aid authorized by the superintendent. The superintendent, in collaboration
with the  Adjutant General, may assign delegate members of the Oregon State Police Civil Defense
Force to command centers throughout this state.
(b) The sheriff of a county in this state may form a  volunteer County Civil Defense Force for
the purpose of providing emergency response and communications, medical  assistance, logistical
support and other aid authorized by the sheriff.
(6) Volunteers  in the Oregon State Police Civil Defense Force or a County Civil Defense Force
must possess and demonstrate experience  or training in the military, law enforcement, communi-
cations, rescue operations or logistical support.
(7)(a) Volunteers in the Oregon  State Police Civil Defense Force or a County Civil Defense
Force are not, by virtue of volunteering in the force, considered:
(A) Members of the Oregon Civil Defense Force;
(B) Employees or volunteers of the state;
(C) In “state service,” as that term is defined in ORS 240.015; or
(D) Agents of a public body under ORS 30.260 to 30.300 (Oregon Tort Claims Act) for the pur-
pose of acts  and omissions of the volunteer that are within the course and scope of the volunteer’s
duties.
(b) Unless entitled to compensation, reimbursement,  benefits or coverage under any other pro-
vision of law,  volunteers in the Oregon State Police Civil Defense Force or a County Civil Defense
Force are not entitled  to compensation, reimbursement for expenses, workers’ compensation or other
insurance coverage, public employment benefits or entitlements  from the Oregon Military Depart-
ment, the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management or any  other state or local
agency or government.
SECTION 32.
 ORS 401.096 is amended to read:
401.096. (1) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management is designated  as the
sole agency of the State of Oregon for the purpose of negotiating  agreements with the United States
Department of Homeland Security or  other appropriate federal agency, on behalf of the state, for
the acquisition of federal funds for the purpose of providing emergency program  management and
emergency services.
(2) When applying for funds  described in subsection (1) of this section, the following entities
shall coordinate  with the [ office] department on development of proposals and submit applications
to the [ office] department to be reviewed and processed:
(a) A city or county operating an emergency management program.
(b) An emergency service agency.
(c) A state agency.
(3) A tribal government operating  an emergency management program may, when applying for
funds, coordinate with the [ office] department on development  of proposals and submit applications
to the [ office] department to be reviewed, processed or both.
(4) The [ office] department is authorized to  accept and receive federal funds for the purposes
of emergency program management and emergency services on  behalf of the state, counties, cities
and participating tribal governments.
SECTION 33.
 ORS 401.165 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 14
401.165. (1) The  Governor by proclamation  may declare a state of emergency [ by
proclamation] at the request of a county governing body or after determining that an  emergency has
occurred or is imminent.
(2) All requests by a county governing body  that the Governor declare an emergency shall be
sent to the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management. Cities must submit requests
through the governing body  of the county in which the majority of the city’s property is located.
Requests from counties shall be in writing and include the following:
(a) A certification signed by the county governing body  that all local resources have been ex-
pended; and
(b) A preliminary assessment of property damage or loss, injuries and deaths.
(3)(a) If, in the judgment of the [ Adjutant General ] Director of the Oregon Department of
Emergency Management , the Governor cannot be reached by available communications  facilities
in time to respond appropriately to an emergency, the [ Adjutant General ] director  shall notify the
Secretary of State or, if the Secretary of State is not available,  the State Treasurer that the Gov-
ernor is not available.
(b) After notice from the [ Adjutant General ] director  that the Governor is not available, the
elected state official so notified  may declare a state of emergency pursuant to the provisions of
subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(c) If the [ Adjutant General ] director  is unavailable to carry out  the duties described in this
subsection, such duties shall be performed  by the [ Director of the Office of Emergency Management ]
Adjutant General.
(4) Any state of emergency declared by the Secretary of  State or State Treasurer pursuant to
this section has the same force and effect as if [ issued] declared by  the Governor, except that it
must be affirmed by the  Governor as soon as the Governor is reached. However, if the Governor
does not set aside  the [ proclamation] declaration within 24 hours of being reached, the
[proclamation] declaration shall be considered affirmed by the Governor.
(5) Any [ proclamation] declaration of a state of emergency must specify the geographical area
covered by the [ proclamation] declaration. Such area shall be no larger than  necessary to effec-
tively respond to the emergency.
(6) The governing body of each county shall establish a  procedure for receiving, processing and
transmitting to  the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management, in a timely manner, a
request submitted by a city that the Governor declare [ an] a state of  emergency.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 401.239 is amended to read:
401.239. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Broadcaster” means a person that holds a  license issued by the Federal Communications
Commission under 47 C.F.R. parts 73, 74, 76 or 78.
(b) “First informer” means an individual:
(A) Who has received credentials under this section and who is employed by, or  acting pursuant
to a contract under the direction of, a broadcaster; and
(B) Who is:
(i) Maintaining, including repairing or  resupplying, transmitters, generators or other essential
equipment at a broadcast station or facility; or
(ii) Providing technical support services to a broadcaster or to another first informer.
(2) Unless prohibited by state or federal law or  in the discretion of the incident commander
during [ an] a state of  emergency declared under ORS 401.165, a first informer may:
(a) Travel on public roads within a geographic area subject to a declaration of a state of
emergency under ORS 401.165;
(b) Access the geographic area for the purposes of  maintaining transmitters, generators or other
essential equipment at a broadcast station or facility used  to acquire, produce or transmit news or
public safety information related to the declared state of  emergency; and
(c) Access the distribution of fuel, food, water, supplies, equipment  and any other materials
necessary for producing a broadcast or a broadcasting signal.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 15
(3) An emergency service agency may not seize a vehicle, fuel, food,  water or other essential
materials in the possession of a first informer.
(4) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management  shall authorize a private entity
organized under the laws of this state that represents a  majority of the broadcasters in this state
to establish a program for the issuance of credentials for first informers pursuant  to a plan devel-
oped by the private entity. The plan to  provide credentials to first informers must provide for
training first informers regarding:
(a) Risks associated with  entering a geographic area subject to a declaration of [ an] a state
of emergency under ORS 401.165;
(b) Best practices for working safely in the geographic area; and
(c) Best practices for working in  a geographic area without hindering or interfering with the
conduct of emergency services by an emergency service agency.
(5) The private entity selected by the [ office] department to develop  a plan for and issue cre-
dentials to first informers shall annually submit to the  [ office] department a report regarding the
operation of the program to issue credentials, including any changes to the plan or program.
SECTION 34a.
If Senate Bill 104 becomes law, section 34 of this  2021 Act (amending ORS
401.239) is repealed and ORS 401.239, as amended by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 104), is amended to read:
401.239. (1) As used in this section, “critical service provider” means an individual:
(a) Who has received credentials under this section and  who is employed by, or is acting pur-
suant to a contract under  the direction of, an organization deemed by the [ Office] Oregon Depart-
ment of Emergency Management to be critical to emergency response operations in Oregon; and
(b) Who is:
(A) Maintaining, including repairing or resupplying,  critical infrastructure equipment or sys-
tems;
(B) Maintaining continuity of operations of the individual’s organization;
(C) Supporting emergency response activities; or
(D) Providing technical support services to another critical service provider.
(2) Unless prohibited by state or federal law  or in the discretion of the incident commander
during [ an] a state of  emergency declared under ORS 401.165, a critical service provider may:
(a) Travel on  public roads within a geographic area subject to a declaration of a state of
emergency under ORS 401.165;
(b) Access the geographic area for a purpose described in subsection (1)(b) of this section; and
(c) Access the distribution of fuel, food, water, supplies, equipment  and any other materials
necessary to carry out a purpose described in subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(3) An emergency service agency may not seize a vehicle, fuel, food,  water or other essential
materials in the possession of a critical service provider.
(4) The [ office] department may establish sector-specific programs for the credentialing of indi-
viduals as critical service providers. Such programs must inform critical service providers about:
(a) Risks associated with entering a geographic area subject to a declaration of  [ an] a state
of emergency under ORS 401.165;
(b) Best practices for working safely in the geographic area; and
(c) Best practices for working in a geographic area without  hindering or interfering with the
conduct of emergency services by an emergency service agency.
(5) The [ office] department may authorize one or more private entities organized under the laws
of this state to establish sector-specific programs for the credentialing  of individuals as critical
service providers, subject to the following requirements:
(a) The [ office] department  may  authorize a private entity under this subsection only if the
entity represents a majority of owners  and operators in the sector for which the entity will establish
a credentialing program.
(b) A program established under this  subsection must meet the requirements set forth in sub-
section (4) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 16
(c) An entity authorized by the [ office] department  under this section  to establish a creden-
tialing program shall annually submit to the [ office] department  a report  regarding the operation
of the program, including any changes to the program.
(6) The  [ office] department may adopt rules to administer and implement the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 35.  ORS 401.305 is amended to read:
401.305. (1) As used in this section, “tribal government” means  a federally recognized sovereign
tribal government operating within the borders of this state or an intertribal organization  formed
by two or more federally recognized sovereign tribal governments operating within this state.
(2) Each county of this state shall, and each city or tribal  government may, establish an emer-
gency management agency  that is directly responsible to the executive officer or governing body
of the county, city or tribe.
(3) The executive  officer or governing body of each county, and any city or tribe that partic-
ipates, shall appoint an emergency program manager who is responsible for the organization,  ad-
ministration and operation of the emergency management  agency, subject to the direction and
control of the county, city or tribe.
(4) When a city  or tribal government has an emergency management agency, the city or tribal
government, as applicable, and the counties  within which the city or tribal government operates
shall jointly establish policies that:
(a) Provide direction and identify and define the purpose and roles  of the individual emergency
management programs;
(b) Specify the responsibilities of the emergency program managers and staff; and
(c) Establish  lines of communication, succession and authority of elected officials for an effective
and efficient response to emergency conditions.
(5) Each emergency management agency  shall perform emergency program management func-
tions within the territorial limits of the county, city or tribal government and  may perform the
functions outside the territorial limits as required under  any mutual aid or cooperative assistance
agreement or as requested  and authorized by the county or city in whose territorial limits the
emergency functions are performed.
(6) The emergency management functions include, at a minimum:
(a) Coordination  of the planning activities necessary to prepare and maintain a current emer-
gency operations plan, management and maintenance  of emergency operating facilities from which
elected and appointed officials can direct emergency and disaster response activities;
(b) Establishment of an incident command structure for management of a  coordinated response
by all local emergency service agencies; and
(c) Coordination with the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management to  integrate
effective practices in emergency preparedness and response  as provided in the National Incident
Management System established by the Homeland Security Presidential Directive 5  of February 28,
2003.
SECTION 36.
 ORS 401.358 is amended to read:
401.358. As used in ORS 401.358 to 401.368:
(1) “Emergency service activities” means:
(a) The provision of emergency services; and
(b) Engaging in training under the direction  of a public body, whether by reason of the training
being conducted or approved by a  public body, for the purpose of preparing qualified emergency
service volunteers to perform emergency services.
(2) “Qualified emergency service volunteer” means a person who is:
(a) Registered with the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management or other  public
body to perform emergency service activities;
(b) Acknowledged in writing as a qualified emergency service volunteer, at the time the person
offers to volunteer  during an emergency, by the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Man-
agement or by another public body;
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 17
(c) A member of the Oregon Civil Defense Force; or
(d) A building evaluator certified under  the Oregon Safety Assessment Program established un-
der ORS 401.256.
SECTION 37.
 ORS 401.368 is amended to read:
401.368. (1) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management shall provide workers’
compensation coverage for qualified  emergency service volunteers who are injured in the course and
scope of performing emergency service activities under the direction of a public body if the injury
occurs:
(a) While the volunteer is performing emergency service activities under the direction of the
public body during a  state of emergency declared under this chapter, or during a state of public
health emergency [ proclaimed] declared under ORS 433.441; or
(b) While the volunteer is engaged in training being conducted or approved by a public body for
the purpose of preparing the volunteer to perform emergency services.
(2) Workers’ compensation coverage shall be provided under this  section in the manner provided
by ORS 656.039.
SECTION 38.
 ORS 401.551 is amended to read:
401.551. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Emergency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 401.025.
(b) “Maintain” means to repair, perform upkeep on and otherwise keep in  good working condi-
tion.
(c) “Preparedness equipment” means equipment, vehicles or other personal property that:
(A) May be used to decrease the risk to life and property resulting from an emergency; and
(B) Qualifies as a capital asset eligible for financing with tax-exempt bonds.
(d) “Qualified applicant” means an entity that has responsibility for or expertise in  emergency
preparedness and that is a local government, a  special government body, a federally recognized In-
dian tribe in Oregon or a private organization qualified for federal  tax-exempt status under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(e) “Recipient” means an entity that applies for and  receives preparedness equipment, or funds
to purchase preparedness equipment, under the grant program described in subsection  (3) of this
section.
(f) “Tax-exempt bond” means a bond, as defined in ORS 286A.001, the receipt of interest  on
which is excluded from gross income under the Internal Revenue Code  or that is eligible for a fed-
eral interest subsidy payment or other tax-advantaged status.
(2)(a) [ Before December 31, 2017, ] The Oregon Homeland Security Council shall  develop , and
shall periodically revise and update,  a list of preparedness  equipment that is needed throughout
this state to address deficiencies in the ability  of the state to respond to local and regional emer-
gencies.
(b) In developing , updating and revising  the list,  the council shall consult and coordinate with
the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management and with county officials who are re-
sponsible for emergency management.
(c) The council shall assign a priority level to each type of preparedness equipment on the list,
taking into  consideration, without limitation, the types of emergency that are most likely to occur
in different regions of this state and the  types of preparedness equipment that offer the highest ratio
of utility to cost. [ The council shall periodically update and revise the list. ]
(3) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management shall develop and administer
a grant  program to distribute preparedness equipment, or funds to purchase preparedness equipment,
to recipients throughout this state. Pursuant to the grant program:
(a) Qualified applicants  may request preparedness equipment that is identified on the list de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section. Applicants must demonstrate  a need for the specific
preparedness equipment requested, the ability to  maintain the preparedness equipment and the
ability to use the preparedness equipment to address  deficiencies in local or regional emergency
preparedness.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 18
(b) The [ office] department shall  identify which requests from applicants, if fulfilled, will maxi-
mize the state’s ability to respond to an emergency,  taking into account considerations that include
but are not limited to:
(A) The level of priority assigned to the requested preparedness  equipment type pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section;
(B) The level  of need for the requested preparedness equipment as demonstrated by the appli-
cant;
(C) The ability to use and maintain the  preparedness equipment as demonstrated by the appli-
cant;
(D) The types of emergency most likely to occur  in the region where the applicant is located;
and
(E) Whether the applicant has an alternative means of  acquiring the requested preparedness
equipment.
(c) The [ office] department shall issue grants to applicants identified under paragraph (b) of this
subsection after entering into grant agreements with the applicants as provided in paragraph  (e) of
this subsection. The  [office] department may either purchase the requested preparedness equipment
for distribution to a recipient or disburse funds to  the recipient for the purchase of the requested
preparedness equipment.
(d) The Public Contracting Code does not  apply to the acquisition of preparedness equipment
by the [ office] department or by a recipient pursuant to this section. When acquiring  preparedness
equipment pursuant to this section, the [ office] department  and recipients shall use  procurement
methods that are impartial and transparent to the greatest extent feasible and are  designed to
maximize value to the State of Oregon.
(e) The [ office] department  may not disburse  preparedness equipment or funds under this sec-
tion unless the [ office] department  and the intended recipient first enter into a  grant agreement.
The grant agreement:
(A) Shall require the recipient to maintain the preparedness equipment.
(B) Shall  provide that, if a recipient fails to adequately maintain preparedness equipment, the
recipient must relinquish possession of the  preparedness equipment or reimburse the [ office] de-
partment for the cost of the preparedness equipment.
(C) Shall specify that the [ office] department  may conduct periodic inspections  of the
preparedness equipment as described in paragraph (f) of this subsection.
(D) Shall specify that preparedness equipment distributed to the recipient  remains the property
of the [ office] department  until it is fully depreciated under governmental accounting principles,
after which the [ office] department may offer the  preparedness equipment for sale to the recipient
at its fair market value at the time of sale.
(E) May permit  the recipient to use the preparedness equipment for any purpose, governmental
or otherwise, that is permissible for  assets financed with tax-exempt bonds, including nonemergency
purposes.
(F) Shall  require private organizations to obtain approval from the [ office] department  before
making any use of preparedness equipment that is outside the  scope of the purpose of the private
organization as stated in the formation documents or bylaws of the organization.
(G) Shall require the recipient to take action or refrain from action as necessary to maintain
federal tax  benefits related to any tax-exempt bonds that are used to fund the grant and to indemnify
the State of Oregon  for any costs, expenses or liability due to loss of such federal tax benefits
caused by action or inaction of the recipient.
(f) The [ office] department  shall conduct periodic  inspections of preparedness equipment dis-
tributed or purchased through the grant program to ensure that  recipients are adequately main-
taining the preparedness equipment. If the  [ office] department finds that any preparedness
equipment is not  adequately maintained, the [ office] department may take possession of the
preparedness equipment or require the recipient to reimburse  the [ office] department for the cost
of the preparedness equipment.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 19
(g) The [ office] department may transfer between recipients, dispose of or otherwise manage the
preparedness equipment as [ it] the department  determines is in the best interests of  meeting the
emergency preparedness needs of the State of Oregon. If the [ office] department  disposes  of
preparedness equipment for any reason, including sale to a recipient as provided  in paragraph (e)(D)
of this subsection, the [ office] department  shall deposit any moneys [ it] the department receives
from the disposal in the Resiliency Grant Fund established under ORS 401.552.
(4) On or before December 31  of each year, the [ office] department shall submit a report to the
Legislative Assembly and  to the Oregon Homeland Security Council that describes the adminis-
tration and  effectiveness of the grant program established under this section and the current prior-
itized list of preparedness equipment types.
(5) The [ office] department shall adopt  rules to administer and implement the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 38a. If House Bill 2426  becomes law, section 38 of this 2021 Act (amending ORS
401.551) is repealed and ORS 401.551, as amended by section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 2426), is amended to read:
401.551. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Emergency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 401.025.
(b) “Maintain” means to  repair, perform upkeep on and otherwise keep in good working condi-
tion.
(c) “Preparedness equipment” means equipment, vehicles or other personal property that:
(A) May be used to decrease the risk to life and property resulting from an emergency; and
(B) Qualifies as a capital asset eligible for financing with tax-exempt bonds.
(d) “Qualified  applicant” means an entity that has responsibility for or expertise in emergency
preparedness and that is a local government, a  special government body, a federally recognized In-
dian tribe in Oregon or  a private organization qualified for federal tax-exempt status under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(e) “Recipient” means an entity that  applies for and receives preparedness equipment, or funds
to purchase preparedness equipment,  under the grant program described in subsection (3) of this
section.
(f) “Tax-exempt  bond” means a bond, as defined in ORS 286A.001, the receipt of interest on
which is excluded from gross income under the  Internal Revenue Code or that is eligible for a fed-
eral interest subsidy payment or other tax-advantaged status.
(2)(a) The Oregon Homeland Security  Council shall develop a list of preparedness equipment
that is needed throughout this state to address deficiencies in the ability of the state to respond to
local and regional emergencies.
(b) In developing , updating and revising  the list,  the council shall consult and coordinate with
the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management and with county officials who are re-
sponsible for emergency management.
(c) The council shall assign a priority level to  each type of preparedness equipment on the list
as described in this paragraph:
(A) Preparedness equipment that is necessary, in the determination of  the council, to equip ur-
ban search and rescue teams must be included in the highest priority level.
(B) In assigning priority levels to other types of preparedness equipment, the  council shall take
into consideration, without limitation, the types of emergency that are  most likely to occur in dif-
ferent regions of this state and the types of preparedness equipment that offer the  highest ratio of
utility to cost.
(d) The council  shall periodically update and revise the list, including the assigned priority
levels.
(3) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management shall develop and administer
a grant  program to distribute preparedness equipment, or funds to purchase preparedness equipment,
to recipients throughout this state. Pursuant to the grant program:
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 20
(a) Qualified applicants may request preparedness equipment that is identified on the  list de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this  section. Applicants must demonstrate a need for the specific
preparedness equipment requested, the ability to maintain  the preparedness equipment and the
ability to use the preparedness equipment to  address deficiencies in local or regional emergency
preparedness.
(b) The [ office] department shall  identify which requests from applicants, if fulfilled, will maxi-
mize the state’s ability to respond to an emergency,  taking into account considerations that include
but are not limited to:
(A) The level of priority  assigned to the requested preparedness equipment type pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section;
(B) The level of need for the requested preparedness equipment as demonstrated by  the appli-
cant;
(C) The ability to use and maintain the  preparedness equipment as demonstrated by the appli-
cant;
(D) The types of emergency most likely to occur  in the region where the applicant is located;
and
(E) Whether the applicant has  an alternative means of acquiring the requested preparedness
equipment.
(c)(A) Subject to subparagraph  (B) of this paragraph, the [ office] department shall issue grants
to applicants identified under paragraph (b) of this  subsection after entering into grant agreements
with the applicants as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection. The [ office] department  may
either purchase the  requested preparedness equipment for distribution to a recipient or disburse
funds to the recipient for the purchase of the requested preparedness equipment.
(B) For the purpose of equipping urban search and rescue teams,  the [ office] department shall
prioritize requests made by applicants that are capable,  at the time of application, of deploying ur-
ban search and rescue teams.
(d) The Public Contracting Code does not apply  to the acquisition of preparedness equipment
by the [ office] department or by a recipient pursuant to this section. When acquiring  preparedness
equipment pursuant  to this section, the [ office] department  and recipients shall use procurement
methods that are  impartial and transparent to the greatest extent feasible and are designed to
maximize value to the State of Oregon.
(e) The [ office] department may not disburse preparedness  equipment or funds under this sec-
tion unless the  [ office] department  and the intended recipient first enter into a grant agreement.
The grant agreement:
(A) Shall require the recipient to maintain the preparedness equipment.
(B) Shall provide that, if a recipient fails to adequately maintain preparedness equipment,  the
recipient must relinquish possession of the preparedness equipment  or reimburse the [ office] de-
partment for the cost of the preparedness equipment.
(C) Shall specify  that the [ office] department  may conduct periodic inspections of the
preparedness equipment as described in paragraph (f) of this subsection.
(D) Shall specify that  preparedness equipment distributed to the recipient remains the property
of the [ office] department  until it is fully depreciated under governmental  accounting principles,
after which the [ office] department may offer the  preparedness equipment for sale to the recipient
at its fair market value at the time of sale.
(E) May permit the recipient to use the preparedness equipment for any  purpose, governmental
or otherwise, that is permissible for  assets financed with tax-exempt bonds, including nonemergency
purposes.
(F) Shall require private organizations to obtain approval from the [ office] department  before
making any use of preparedness equipment that is  outside the scope of the purpose of the private
organization as stated in the formation documents or bylaws of the organization.
(G) Shall require the recipient to take action or refrain from action as necessary to maintain
federal tax  benefits related to any tax-exempt bonds that are used to fund the grant and to indemnify
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 21
the State of Oregon for any costs, expenses or liability due to loss of such  federal tax benefits
caused by action or inaction of the recipient.
(f) The [ office] department  shall conduct  periodic inspections of preparedness equipment dis-
tributed or purchased through the  grant program to ensure that recipients are adequately main-
taining the preparedness equipment. If the [ office] department  finds that any preparedness
equipment is not adequately maintained, the [ office] department  may take possession  of the
preparedness equipment or require the recipient to  reimburse the [ office] department for the cost
of the preparedness equipment.
(g) The [ office] department may transfer between recipients, dispose of or otherwise manage the
preparedness equipment as  [ it] the department  determines is in the best interests of meeting the
emergency  preparedness  needs of the State of Oregon. If the [ office] department  disposes of
preparedness equipment for any reason, including sale to a recipient as provided  in paragraph (e)(D)
of this subsection, the [ office] department shall deposit any  moneys it receives from the disposal in
the Resiliency Grant Fund established under ORS 401.552.
(4) On or before December 31  of each year, the [ office] department shall submit a report to the
Legislative Assembly and  to the Oregon Homeland Security Council that describes the adminis-
tration and  effectiveness of the grant program established under this section and the current prior-
itized list of preparedness equipment types.
(5) The [ office] department shall adopt  rules to administer and implement the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 39.  ORS 401.534 is amended to read:
401.534. (1) The Oregon Disaster Response Fund is established in  the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Moneys received  from federal grants for disaster response ef-
forts shall be deposited into the Oregon  Disaster Response Fund. Moneys in the fund are contin-
uously appropriated  to the [ Oregon Military Department ] Oregon Department of Emergency
Management to be used to:
(a) Help state agencies and local government units with  immediate disaster response and re-
covery efforts related to federally declared disasters in this state; and
(b) Implement long-term hazard  mitigation measures after a federally declared disaster in this
state during the period of immediate recovery from the disaster.
(2) The Oregon Disaster Response Fund may  receive gifts, grants, bequests, endowments and
donations from public and private sources for purposes related to the fund.
(3) The [ Office of Emergency Management of the  Oregon Military Department ] department shall
adopt rules for the disbursement of moneys from the Oregon Disaster Response Fund.
(4) If there are expenditures from the Oregon Disaster Response Fund, the [ Adjutant General of
the Oregon  Military Department ] Director of the Oregon Department of Emergency Manage-
ment shall report to the Emergency Board, or to the Legislative Assembly if it is in session, on:
(a) The nature and severity of the disaster;
(b) The actual and projected deposits into the fund;
(c) The sources of actual and projected expenditures from the fund;
(d) The nature of in-kind donations received; and
(e) The rationale for expenditures and allocation of payments to state agencies  and local gov-
ernment units.
(5) Following  the final expenditure for a particular disaster, the [ Adjutant General of the Oregon
Military Department ] director shall issue a final report to the Emergency Board,  or to the Legisla-
tive Assembly if it is in session. The report must include an  aggregate description of the factors
described in subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 40.
 ORS 401.536 is amended to read:
401.536. (1) The  Oregon Local Disaster Assistance Loan and Grant Account is established as
an account in the Oregon Disaster Response Fund. The account  consists of moneys appropriated by
the Legislative Assembly and any other moneys deposited into the account pursuant to law.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 22
(2) Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated  to the [ Oregon Military Department ]
Oregon Department of Emergency Management  for:
(a) Providing loans to local governments, as  defined in ORS 174.116, and school districts to
match, either in full or in  part, moneys from federal programs for federally declared disaster relief
that require a match;
(b) Providing loans and grants  to local governments, as defined in ORS 174.116, and school dis-
tricts, for the purpose of  paying costs incurred by local governments and school districts in response
to federally declared disasters;
(c) Providing loans and grants to local governments, as defined in  ORS 174.116, and school dis-
tricts for the purposes of paying costs incurred by local governments and  school districts in re-
sponse to disasters that are not  federally declared disasters, as determined by the Legislative
Assembly, if  all loans and grants provided under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection have been
repaid, fulfilled or otherwise satisfied and moneys remain in the account; and
(d) Subject to  subsection (5) of this section, paying the department’s expenses for administering
loans made from the account under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3) Loans made under subsection (2)(b) or (c) of this section  shall be repaid pursuant to such
terms and conditions  as may be established by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
Loans made under subsection (2)(b) or (c) of this section may be interest free, or bear  interest at a
rate established by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.  Amounts repaid on loans
made under subsection (2)(b) or (c) of this section shall be deposited in the General Fund.
(4) The [ Oregon Military Department ] Oregon Department of  Emergency Management  shall
deposit into the account any amounts repaid on loans made under subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(5) The [ Oregon Military Department ] department  may  not charge the account more than five
percent of the maximum  amount in the account during a biennium for administrative expenses at-
tributable to a loan made under subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(6) An applicant may apply to the [ Oregon Military Department ] department  for a loan under
subsection (2)(a) of this section. The department  shall consider the application, make a recommen-
dation and submit  the application and recommendation to the Local Disaster Assistance Review
Board established under subsection (7) of this section.
(7) The [ Oregon Military Department ] department  shall establish a Local Disaster Assistance
Review Board to:
(a) Review the recommendations of the department regarding loans under subsection (2)(a)  of
this section;
(b) Approve, by a majority vote of members, the amount of any loan under subsection  (2)(a) of
this section; and
(c) Approve, by a majority vote of members,  the terms and conditions of any loan under sub-
section (2)(a) of this section.
(8) The review board shall include:
(a) Three members of county governing bodies, with at least one member  representing a county
from east  of the crest of the Cascade Mountains, with membership determined by the Association
of Oregon Counties;
(b) Three members of city  governing bodies, with at least one member representing a city from
east of the crest of  the Cascade Mountains, with membership determined by the League of Oregon
Cities;
(c) A representative of the office of the State Treasurer;
(d) A representative of the [ Oregon Military ] department;
(e) A representative of school districts, with membership determined by  the Oregon School
Boards Association;
(f) A representative of special districts, with membership determined by  the Special Districts
Association of Oregon;
(g) A representative of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services; and
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 23
(h) Two additional members determined jointly by the department, the Association of Oregon
Counties and the League of Oregon Cities.
(9) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management [ of the Oregon Military De-
partment] shall adopt rules establishing:
(a) A loan application process and application forms for loans under  subsection (2)(a) of this
section;
(b) Reasonable financial terms and conditions for loans under subsection (2)(a) of  this section,
including interest and the repayment of the loans;
(c) Eligibility requirements for applicants for loans under subsection (2)(a) of this section;
(d) The maximum amount an applicant for a loan under subsection (2)(a) of  this section may
receive;
(e) The methodology the department will use  for charging the account for administrative ex-
penses; and
(f) Procedures  for submission of recommendations to the review board for loans under subsection
(2)(a) of this section.
(10) The [ Oregon Military Department ] department  shall provide staff support for the  review
board.
SECTION 41.
 ORS 401.552 is amended to read:
401.552. The Resiliency Grant Fund is established  in the State Treasury, separate and distinct
from the General  Fund. Interest earned by the Resiliency Grant Fund must be credited to the fund.
The Resiliency Grant Fund consists of moneys deposited  in the fund under ORS 401.551 and may
include moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative  As-
sembly or otherwise and interest earned on moneys in the fund. The moneys in the fund  are con-
tinuously appropriated to the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management for  the
purposes specified in ORS 401.551.
SECTION 41a. If House Bill 2426 becomes law, section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 2426) (amending ORS 401.552), is repealed.
SECTION 42.  ORS 540.482 is amended to read:
540.482. (1)  The Water Resources Department shall require the owner of a dam that has a high
hazard rating to develop an emergency action plan for the dam.
(2) An emergency action plan required under this section must include, but need not be  limited
to:
(a) Means for emergency condition detection;
(b) Means for emergency level determination;
(c) Identification of, and information necessary for, notifications  and communications to be made
at each level of emergency condition;
(d) A description of actions  expected to be undertaken to prevent dam failure or reduce the ef-
fects of dam failure;
(e) A map of dam failure inundation  zones for varying conditions, including, but not limited to,
dry weather conditions and high flood conditions; and
(f) Procedures to be followed at the termination of an emergency.
(3) A dam owner that develops an emergency action plan required under this section shall  file
copies of the plan with the  Water Resources  Department, the [ Office] Oregon Department  of
Emergency Management and the local emergency services agency  for the county where the dam is
located. The Water Resources  Department, in consultation with  the [ office] Oregon Department
of Emergency Management  and local emergency services agency, shall  periodically review the
emergency action plan and may require updates to the plan.
(4) The Water Resources  Department, in consultation with the [ office] Oregon Department
of Emergency Management  and local emergency services agency, shall  determine the appropriate
frequency for conducting emergency response exercises at a dam that has a high hazard rating.
SECTION 43.
 ORS 689.645 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 24
689.645. (1) In  accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of Pharmacy under ORS
689.205, a pharmacist may:
(a) Administer vaccines:
(A) To persons who are seven years of age or older; or
(B) If authorized by the Governor  or the Director  of the Oregon Department of Emergency
Management under ORS  433.441 or the Public Health Director under ORS 433.443 or 433.444, to a
person three years of age or older.
(b) Pursuant to a statewide drug  therapy management protocol developed by the Public Health
and Pharmacy Formulary Advisory Committee convened under ORS  689.649 and adopted by rule of
the board, provide approved patient care services including  smoking cessation therapy and travel
health services.
(c) Using a form prescribed by the  board, submit a concept for the development of a protocol,
other than the protocols pharmacists may establish under subsection  (5) of this section, to the
committee for consideration by the committee  and recommendation to the board for adoption by rule
of the board.
(d) Prescribe and dispense a drug or device included on  the formulary established under sub-
section (6) of this section if  the prescription and dispensation is pursuant to a diagnosis by a health
care practitioner who has prescriptive authority and is qualified to make the diagnosis.
(2) The board may adopt rules allowing a pharmacist to prescribe vaccines, provide patient  care
services and submit protocol concepts under subsection (1) of this  section. The rules related to the
prescription of vaccines may be only as broad as necessary to  enable pharmacists to enroll and
participate in the Vaccines for Children Program administered by the  Centers for Disease Control
and Prevention.
(3) The board is authorized to issue, to licensed pharmacists who have completed training ac-
credited by the Centers for Disease  Control and Prevention, the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy
Education or a similar health authority or  professional body, certificates of special competency in
the prescription and administration of vaccines.
(4) The board shall adopt rules relating to the  reporting of the prescription and administration
of vaccines to a patient’s primary health care provider and to the Oregon Health Authority.
(5) The board shall adopt rules requiring pharmacists to  establish protocols for the prescription
and administration of vaccines and the provision of  patient care services under subsection (1) of this
section.
(6)(a) The board shall establish by rule a formulary of drugs and devices, as recommended  by
the committee, that a pharmacist may prescribe and  dispense to a patient pursuant to a diagnosis
by a  health care practitioner who has prescriptive authority and who is qualified to make the di-
agnosis.
(b) The formulary may include  post-diagnostic drugs and devices such as diabetic testing sup-
plies, emergency refills of insulin, albuterol inhalers,  epinephrine autoinjectors, smoking cessation
aids, discharge medications for transitions of care, rapid strep tests and spacers.
SECTION 44.
 ORS 401.654 is amended to read:
401.654. (1)  The Oregon Health Authority may establish an emergency health care provider
registry that includes emergency health care providers who  are available to provide health care
services during an emergency or crisis. As a condition of inclusion in  the registry, the authority
may require:
(a) Training related to the provision of health care services in an emergency or crisis as  a
condition of registration; and
(b) Criminal background checks for applicants and persons who have been registered.
(2) The authority shall issue  identification cards to health care providers entered in the emer-
gency health care provider registry established under this section that:
(a) Identify the health care provider;
(b) Indicate that the health care provider  is registered as an Oregon emergency health care
provider;
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 25
(c) Identify the license or certification  held by the health care provider, or previously held by
the health  care provider if the health care provider is entered in the emergency health care provider
registry under ORS 401.658; and
(d) Identify the health care provider’s usual area of practice, and  the types of health care that
the health care provider is authorized to provide, if that information  is available and the authority
determines that it is appropriate to provide that information.
(3) The authority by  rule shall establish a form for identification cards issued under subsection
(2) of this section.
(4) The authority shall support and provide assistance to  the [ Office] Oregon Department  of
Emergency Management in emergencies or crises involving the public health or requiring emergency
medical response.
(5) The authority may enter into agreements with other states to facilitate the registry of  out-
of-state health care providers in the emergency health care provider registry  established under this
section.
SECTION 45.
 ORS 401.900 is amended to read:
401.900. (1) Each state or local agency  shall drill agency employees working in office buildings
on emergency procedures so that the employees may respond to an earthquake emergency  without
confusion or panic.
(2) The state or local agency shall conduct the drills annually in accordance  with [ Office]
Oregon Department  of Emergency Management rules.
(3) The drills must include  familiarization with routes and methods of exiting the building and
the earthquake emergency response procedure recommended by the Federal Emergency Management
Agency known as “drop, cover and hold on.”
(4) Consistent with rules of the [ Office of Emergency Management ] department, the state or lo-
cal agency may drill earthquake emergency response procedures in addition to “drop, cover and hold
on” when the state  or local agency determines, based on evaluation of specific engineering and
structural issues related to an office building,  that “drop, cover and hold on” may not be the most
effective earthquake emergency response procedure to prevent or limit injury or loss of life.
(5) The [ Office of Emergency  Management ] department  may, by rule or on application, grant
exemptions from the drill requirement for good cause.
(6) As used in this section, “state or local agency” means a state  or local office, department,
division, bureau, board or commission that  is assigned, renting, leasing, owning or controlling office
space for carrying out its duties. “State or local agency” includes the Legislative Assembly when
in regular session.
SECTION 46.
 ORS 401.902 is amended to read:
401.902. (1) A person employing 250 or more full-time employees within this state shall  drill
employees  working  in office buildings on emergency procedures so that the employees may respond
to an earthquake emergency without confusion or panic.
(2) The person shall conduct the drills annually in accordance with  [ Office] Oregon Depart-
ment of Emergency Management rules.
(3) The drills must include  familiarization with routes and methods of exiting the building and
the earthquake emergency response procedure recommended by the Federal Emergency Management
Agency known as “drop, cover and hold on.”
(4) Consistent with rules of the [ Office of Emergency Management ] department, the person  may
drill earthquake emergency response procedures in addition to “drop, cover and hold on”  when the
person determines, based on evaluation of specific engineering and structural issues related to  an
office building, that “drop, cover and hold on” may  not be the most effective earthquake emergency
response procedure to prevent or limit injury or loss of life.
(5) The [ Office of Emergency Management ] department  may, by rule  or on application, grant
exemptions from the drill requirement for good cause.
SECTION 47.
 ORS 401.904 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 26
401.904. The [ Office] Oregon Department  of  Emergency Management, in consultation with the
State Department of Geology and Mineral  Industries, shall adopt rules governing the conduct of
earthquake emergency drills  required by ORS 401.900 and 401.902. In addition to the [ office] Oregon
Department of Emergency Management  submitting the rules for publication pursuant to  ORS
183.360, the [ office and the department ] departments shall each post the rules on an electronic bul-
letin board, home page or similar site.
SECTION 48.  ORS 401.910 is amended to read:
401.910. (1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall develop a grant program for the
disbursement of funds for the seismic rehabilitation  of critical public buildings, including hospital
buildings with acute inpatient care facilities, fire stations, police stations, sheriffs’  offices, other fa-
cilities used by state, county, district or municipal  law enforcement agencies and buildings with a
capacity of 250 or  more persons that are routinely used for student activities by kindergarten
through grade 12 public schools, community  colleges, education service districts and institutions of
higher education, including but not limited to public universities listed in ORS  352.002. The Oregon
Infrastructure Finance Authority established in the department  by ORS 285A.096 shall administer
the grant program developed under this section. The  funds for the seismic rehabilitation of critical
public buildings under the grant program are to be provided from the issuance of bonds pursuant
to the authority provided in Articles XI-M and XI-N of the Oregon Constitution.
(2) The  grant program shall include the appointment of a grant committee. The grant committee
may be composed of any number of persons with qualifications that the authority  determines nec-
essary. However, the authority shall include persons with experience in administering  state grant
programs and representatives of entities with responsibility over critical public buildings. The au-
thority shall also include as permanent members representatives of:
(a) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management;
(b) The State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries;
(c) The Seismic Safety Policy Advisory Commission;
(d) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services;
(e) The Department of Education;
(f) The Oregon Health Authority;
(g) The Oregon Fire Chiefs Association;
(h) The Oregon Association Chiefs of Police;
(i) The Oregon Association of Hospitals and Health Systems; and
(j) The Confederation of Oregon School Administrators.
(3) The authority  shall determine the form and method of applying for grants from the grant
program, the eligibility requirements  for grant applicants, and general terms and conditions of the
grants. The  authority shall also provide that the grant committee review grant applications and
make a determination of funding based on a scoring system that  is directly related to the statewide
needs assessment performed by the  State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries. Addi-
tionally, the grant process may:
(a) Require that the grant applicant provide matching funds for completion of  any seismic re-
habilitation project.
(b) Provide authority to the grant committee to waive requirements of  the grant program based
on special circumstances  such as proximity to fault hazards, community value of the structure,
emergency functions provided by the structure and storage of hazardous materials.
(c) Allow an applicant to appeal any  determination of grant funding to the authority for ree-
valuation.
(d) Provide that  applicants release the state, the authority and the grant committee from any
claims of liability for providing funding for seismic rehabilitation.
(e) Provide separate rules for funding rehabilitation of structural and nonstructural building  el-
ements.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 27
(4) Subject to the grant  rules established by the authority and subject to reevaluation by the
authority, the grant committee has the responsibility  to review and make determinations on grant
applications under the grant program established pursuant to this section.
SECTION 49.  ORS 401.915 is amended to read:
401.915. (1) There is established a  Seismic Safety Policy Advisory Commission consisting of the
following members:
(a) The chief officer or the chief officer’s designee of the following:
(A) Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(B) State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries;
(C) Department of Land Conservation and Development;
(D) Department of Transportation; and
(E) [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management; and
(b) Thirteen members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(A) One representative of local government;
(B) Six members representing the public interest, including:
(i) One representative of a school district, community college or university;
(ii) Two members of the Legislative Assembly; and
(iii) Three members of the general public; and
(C) Six members representing affected industries or stakeholders.
(2) The term of office of each member, except a member of the Legislative  Assembly, appointed
under subsection (1)(b) of this section is four years,  but a member serves at the pleasure of the
Governor. The term of office of a member of the Legislative Assembly  expires at the end of the term
for which the member is elected. Before the expiration  of the term of a member, the Governor shall
appoint a successor  whose term begins on July 1 next following. A member is eligible for reap-
pointment. If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an appointment to become
immediately effective for the unexpired term.
SECTION 50.
 ORS 401.922 is amended to read:
401.922. The [ Office] Oregon Department  of  Emergency Management shall provide technical,
clerical and other necessary support services to the  Seismic Safety Policy Advisory Commission.
The Department of Consumer and Business Services, the State Department of Geology  and Mineral
Industries, the Department  of Land Conservation and Development, the Department of Transporta-
tion, the Oregon Health Authority, the Water Resources Department and the  public universities
listed in ORS  352.002 shall provide assistance, as required, to the commission to enable it to meet
its objectives.
SECTION 51.  ORS 401.950 is amended to read:
401.950. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Transient lodging facility” means a hotel, motel, inn,  condominium, any other dwelling unit
or a public  or private park that is made available for transient occupancy or vacation occupancy
as those terms are defined in ORS 90.100.
(b) “Tsunami inundation zone” means an area of  expected tsunami inundation, based on scien-
tific evidence that  may include geologic field data and tsunami modeling, determined by the gov-
erning board of the State Department of Geology and  Mineral Industries, by rule, as required by
ORS 455.446 (1) and (2).
(2) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management, in consultation and  cooper-
ation with the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries, shall:
(a) Develop and  adopt by rule tsunami warning information and evacuation plans for distribution
to transient lodging facilities located in a tsunami inundation zone; and
(b) Facilitate and encourage broad distribution  of the tsunami warning information and evacu-
ation plans to transient lodging facilities  and other locations within tsunami inundation zones fre-
quented by visitors to the area.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 28
(3) The [ office] Oregon Department of Emergency  Management  is not required to carry out
the duties assigned under subsection (2) of this section if sufficient moneys  are not available under
ORS 401.955.
SECTION 52.  ORS 401.952 is amended to read:
401.952. (1) The [ Office] Oregon  Department  of Emergency Management, in consultation with
the State Department of Geology and Mineral  Industries, shall establish by rule a uniform tsunami
warning signal, including rules specifying the type, duration and volume of the  warning signal and
the location of warning signal delivery devices, for use on the Oregon coast.
(2) The [ office] Oregon Department of Emergency Management  is not required to carry out
the duties assigned under subsection  (1) of this section if sufficient moneys are not available under
ORS 401.955.
SECTION 53.  ORS 401.955 is amended to read:
401.955. The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management or the State Department
of Geology and Mineral Industries may  seek and accept gifts, grants and donations from any source
to finance all or part of the duties assigned under ORS 401.950 and 401.952.
SECTION 54.  ORS 401.975 is amended to read:
401.975. The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(1) During an evacuation after a major disaster  or an emergency, many pet owners are reluctant
to leave their pets and are willing to risk their lives to protect their pets.
(2) Animals  are important to their owners and the presence of an animal brings comfort to an
owner and may enhance recovery for an owner distressed over  injury or damage caused by a major
disaster or an emergency.
(3) Significant loss of livestock as a result of a major disaster or an  emergency would seriously
threaten the economy of Oregon. Therefore, a livestock emergency operations plan will ensure  that
livestock are provided for during a major disaster or an emergency.
(4) It is essential that the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management and the
State Department of Agriculture work together to develop emergency operations plans for animals
and livestock that provide for animals and livestock during a major disaster or an emergency.
SECTION 55.
 ORS 401.977 is amended to read:
401.977. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Companion animal” means a domestic animal commonly kept as a household pet.
(b) “Service animal” means an animal that assists or  performs tasks for a person with a sensory,
emotional, mental or physical disability.
(2) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management, in cooperation with the  State
Department of Agriculture and  local governments, shall prepare a written animal emergency oper-
ations plan that provides  for the evacuation, transport and temporary sheltering of companion ani-
mals and service animals during a major disaster or an emergency.
(3) The [ office] Oregon Department of Emergency Management , in developing the plan, shall
emphasize the protection of human life and shall consider:
(a) Allowing owners of service animals to be evacuated, transported and  sheltered with their
service animals;
(b) Establishing  a sufficient number of evacuation shelters equipped to temporarily shelter
companion animals and service animals in close proximity to a human sheltering facility;
(c) Allowing owners and their companion animals to be evacuated together whenever possible;
(d) Establishing an identification system to ensure that owners who are separated from their
companion animals or service animals during an evacuation are provided with all information nec-
essary to locate and reclaim their animals;
(e) Transporting companion animals or service  animals, in cages or carriers that safely and
securely confine the animals, in an impending major disaster or emergency;
(f) Recommending that animal shelters, humane societies, veterinary offices,  boarding kennels,
breeders, grooming facilities, animal testing  facilities and any other entity that normally houses
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 29
companion animals or service animals create evacuation plans for the animals housed at their  fa-
cilities;
(g) Establishing recommended minimum holding  periods for companion animals or service ani-
mals that are sheltered during a major disaster or an emergency; and
(h) Creating and  promoting an educational campaign for owners of companion animals or service
animals that will:
(A) Encourage owners to plan for and incorporate their animals in  the owners’ personal plans
in the event of a major disaster or an emergency; and
(B) Inform owners of companion animals or service  animals about the animal emergency oper-
ations plan prepared under this section.
SECTION 55a. If Senate Bill 103 becomes law, section 55 of this  2021 Act (amending ORS
401.977) is repealed and ORS 401.977, as amended by section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 103), is amended to read:
401.977. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Companion animal” means a domestic animal commonly kept as a household pet.
(b) “Service animal” means an animal that assists or  performs tasks for a person with a sensory,
emotional, mental or physical disability.
(2) The State Department of  Agriculture, in cooperation with the [ Office] Oregon Department
of Emergency Management, the  Department of Human Services and local governments, shall prepare
a written animal emergency operations plan  that provides for the evacuation, transport and tempo-
rary sheltering of companion animals and service animals during  a major disaster or an emergency.
(3) The State Department of Agriculture, in developing the plan, shall emphasize the  protection
of human life and shall consider:
(a) Allowing owners of  service animals to be evacuated, transported and sheltered with their
service animals;
(b) Establishing a sufficient number of evacuation shelters equipped to temporarily  shelter
companion animals and service animals in close proximity to a human sheltering facility;
(c) Allowing owners and their companion animals to be evacuated together whenever possible;
(d) Establishing an identification system to ensure that owners who are separated from their
companion animals or service animals during an evacuation are provided with all information nec-
essary to locate and reclaim their animals;
(e) Transporting companion animals or service animals, in cages  or carriers that safely and
securely confine the animals, in an impending major disaster or emergency;
(f) Recommending that  animal shelters, humane societies, veterinary offices, boarding kennels,
breeders, grooming facilities, animal testing facilities and any other  entity that normally houses
companion  animals  or service animals create evacuation plans for the animals housed at their fa-
cilities;
(g) Establishing recommended minimum holding periods for companion  animals or service ani-
mals that are sheltered during a major disaster or an emergency; and
(h) Creating and  promoting an educational campaign for owners of companion animals or service
animals that will:
(A) Encourage owners to plan  for and incorporate their animals in the owners’ personal plans
in the event of a major disaster or an emergency; and
(B) Inform owners of companion animals or  service animals about the animal emergency oper-
ations plan prepared under this section.
SECTION 56.
 ORS 401.978 is amended to read:
401.978. (1) As used in this section,  “livestock” means cattle, horses, sheep and any other ani-
mals designated by the State Department of Agriculture.
(2) The State Department of  Agriculture, in cooperation with the [ Office] Oregon Department
of Emergency Management and local governments,  shall prepare a written livestock emergency op-
erations plan that provides for the evacuation, transport and temporary sheltering of livestock  dur-
ing a major disaster or an emergency.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 30
(3) The State Department  of Agriculture , in developing the plan, shall consider:
(a) Methods for providing adequate food and water for livestock during a major disaster or  an
emergency;
(b) Methods for providing livestock  with adequate shelter or protection from harsh weather
conditions during a major disaster or an emergency;
(c) Creating and promoting an educational campaign for owners of livestock that will:
(A) Encourage owners to plan for and incorporate their livestock in the owners’ personal  plans
in the event of a major disaster or an emergency; and
(B) Inform owners of livestock  about the livestock emergency operations plan prepared under
this section; and
(d) Any other methods or arrangements that the  department determines would protect livestock
during a major disaster or an emergency.
SECTION 57.
 ORS 402.015 is amended to read:
402.015. In carrying out the provisions of ORS chapter  401, the Governor and the executive of-
ficers or governing bodies of the counties and cities  may request and utilize the services, equipment,
supplies and facilities of existing departments, offices and agencies of the state and of  local gov-
ernments. The officers and personnel of all local government departments, offices  and agencies may
cooperate with, and extend such services and  facilities to the Governor, to the [ Office] Oregon
Department of Emergency Management and to emergency management agencies  and emergency
service agencies upon request.
SECTION 58.  ORS 402.020 is amended to read:
402.020. The state shall reimburse a local government for the compensation  paid and the actual
and necessary travel, subsistence and maintenance  expenses of employees of the local government
while actually serving at the direction of the Governor or the Director of  the [ Office] Oregon De-
partment of Emergency Management in a state function or capacity.
SECTION 59.  ORS 402.210 is amended to read:
402.210. (1)  There is created an intrastate mutual assistance agreement called the Oregon Re-
source Coordination Assistance Agreement.
(2)(a) The state government and, except as provided in this  subsection, each local government
is a participant in the agreement.
(b) A local government may opt  out of participation in the agreement by adopting a resolution
or ordinance so declaring and transmitting a copy of the resolution or ordinance to the  Director of
the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management.
(c) An opt-out by  a local government under this subsection is effective upon receipt by the di-
rector of a copy of the resolution or ordinance.
(3)(a) A tribal government is not a participant in the  agreement unless it opts in as described
in this subsection.
(b) A tribal  government may opt in to participation in the agreement by adopting a resolution
so declaring  and transmitting the resolution to the director [ of the Office of Emergency
Management].
(c) An opt-in by a tribal government is effective  upon receipt by the director of a copy of the
resolution.
(4) The agreement streamlines the process by which a participant:
(a) Requests assistance from another participant whenever an event occurs; and
(b) Temporarily acquires resources from another participant for training, drills or exercises.
(5) The agreement does not:
(a) Require a participant to provide resources to a requesting participant.
(b) Preclude a participant from entering into any other agreement with another participant.
(c) Affect any other agreement to which a participant is a party or may become a party.
(6) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management shall develop, adopt and  dis-
seminate:
(a) Guidelines and procedures for requesting and providing assistance under the agreement;
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 31
(b) Requirements for recordkeeping by participants; and
(c) Other procedures and guidelines that the [ office] department considers necessary to imple-
ment the agreement in an effective and efficient manner.
SECTION 60.
 ORS 402.230 is amended to read:
402.230. (1) The intent of the intrastate mutual assistance agreement created under ORS 402.210
is to provide for nonreimbursable assistance to a requesting participant.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this  section, a responding participant may request re-
imbursement and a requesting participant may reimburse the responding participant.
(3) A request for  reimbursement must be made and agreed to in writing prior to the provision
of resources by the responding participant.
(4) Request and provision of  reimbursement are the sole responsibility of the requesting and
responding participants. The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management is  not re-
sponsible for requesting or  providing reimbursement unless the [ office] department is a requesting
or responding participant.
(5) If a dispute regarding reimbursement arises between a requesting participant and  a re-
sponding participant, the involved participants shall make  every effort to resolve the dispute within
30 days of written notice of the dispute given by the participant asserting  noncompliance to the
other participant.
(6) If  the participants cannot resolve the dispute within 90 days after receipt of the notice of
alleged noncompliance, either participant in the dispute may submit the dispute to  arbitration under
the commercial arbitration rules of the American Arbitration Association.
SECTION 61.  ORS 403.120 is amended to read:
403.120. (1) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, adopt  rules relating to the emergency communications
system, as deemed necessary by the [ office] department.
(b) Plan, implement, administer, operate and maintain the emergency communications  system
required to fulfill the requirements of ORS 403.115.
(c) At the request of a 9-1-1  jurisdiction, act as an agent of the 9-1-1 jurisdiction for the purposes
of purchasing and maintaining equipment and services required to  conform to applicable laws and
rules adopted by the [ office] department.
(d) Report  biennially to the Legislative Assembly the progress made in implementing ORS
305.823 and 403.105 to 403.250. The report must include:
(A) Financial information concerning the revenues collected, distributed  and expended by state
agencies and 9-1-1 jurisdictions for the purposes of complying with ORS 403.105 to 403.250; and
(B) Account and subaccount balances.
(2) The [ office] department may enter into and  administer contracts for goods and services re-
lated to the emergency communications system.
(3) The [ office] department  may establish advisory committees and study groups to  study and
advise on:
(a) The planning and administration of public safety answering points; and
(b) Issues impacting  the emergency communications system or individual public safety answering
points.
SECTION 62.
 ORS 403.130 is amended to read:
403.130. (1) A 9-1-1 jurisdiction shall  create and maintain a 9-1-1 jurisdiction plan for emergency
communications services provided  within a 9-1-1 service area pursuant to ORS 403.105 to 403.250
and rules adopted by the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management. The 9-1-1 juris-
diction shall submit the 9-1-1 jurisdiction plan to:
(a) The [ office] department;
(b) Public and private safety agencies within the 9-1-1 service area; and
(c) Any other public or private entity within the 9-1-1 service area that may be affected.
(2) The 9-1-1 jurisdiction plan must describe the capital and  recurring costs to provide the
components of the emergency communications system within the 9-1-1 service area.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 32
(3) The  [ office] department shall review the 9-1-1 jurisdiction plan for compliance with the re-
quirements imposed under ORS 403.105 to 403.250 and rules adopted by the [ office] department, and
if the plan is:
(a) In compliance, the [ office] department shall approve the plan.
(b) Not in compliance, the [ office] department shall reject the plan.
(4) If the  [ office] department rejects the 9-1-1 jurisdiction plan under subsection (3) of this sec-
tion:
(a) The 9-1-1 jurisdiction shall revise and resubmit the plan within 90 days after  the date the
[office] department rejects the plan; and
(b) The [ office] department  shall review the revised plan and either approve  or reject the re-
vised plan within 90 days after the date the [ office] department receives the revised plan.
(5) Each 9-1-1 jurisdiction shall submit to the [ Office of Emergency Management ] department in
writing within 30 days any change to a public safety answering point that alters  the approved 9-1-1
jurisdiction plan on file with the [ office] department. The changes may include, but  are not limited
to:
(a) The address of the public safety answering point;
(b) Telephone numbers used to satisfy requirements set forth in ORS 403.115;
(c) Director changes;
(d) Agencies served by the 9-1-1 jurisdiction; and
(e) The method used to direct an emergency call once received by  the primary public safety
answering point.
(6) If an established 9-1-1 jurisdiction proposes to move a public  safety answering point to an-
other location or a governing body proposes to establish  a new 9-1-1 jurisdiction with a new primary
public safety answering  point, and if either of these proposals will result in control of the 9-1-1
service area by an agency or agencies other than the  agency or agencies identified in the approved
9-1-1 jurisdiction plan filed  with the [ office] department , the 9-1-1 jurisdiction or governing body
shall submit a revised 9-1-1 jurisdiction plan setting forth the changes to:
(a) The [ Office of Emergency Management ] department;
(b) Public and private safety agencies in the 9-1-1 service area; and
(c) Any other public or private entity in the 9-1-1 service area that may be affected.
(7) In addition to meeting the requirements  imposed under ORS 403.105 to 403.250 and rules
adopted pursuant to ORS 403.120, the revised 9-1-1 jurisdiction plan  must describe the capital and
recurring costs for the proposed components of  the emergency communications system within the
9-1-1 service area.
(8) The [ office] department shall review the revised 9-1-1  jurisdiction plan for compliance with
the requirements imposed under ORS 403.105 to 403.250 and rules adopted pursuant to ORS  403.120
and, if the [ office] department determines that the plan is in compliance, approve the plan.
(9) The  [ office] department  may not approve a revised 9-1-1 jurisdiction plan submitted under
subsection  (6)  of this section unless the revised plan is accompanied by written approval of the
governing bodies of all public and private  safety agencies affected by or providing service in the
9-1-1 service area.
SECTION 63.
 ORS 403.132 is amended to read:
403.132. (1) At  the request of a law enforcement agency, a provider of communications service
for cellular devices shall provide the  call location information, or the best available location infor-
mation, of a cellular device that is:
(a) Used to place an emergency call requesting emergency assistance from  the law enforcement
agency;  or
(b) Reasonably believed to be in  the possession of an individual that the law enforcement agency
reasonably  believes  is in an emergency situation that involves the risk of death or serious physical
harm to the individual.
(2) To facilitate requests for  call location information, or the best available location information,
from a law enforcement agency under this section:
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 33
(a) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management shall:
(A) Maintain a database containing emergency contact information for providers  of communi-
cations  service  for cellular devices that are registered to do business in this state or that submit
to the jurisdiction of this state; and
(B) Make  the information immediately available upon request to a public safety answering point
in this state.
(b) A provider that is registered to do business in this state, or that submits to the jurisdiction
of this state, shall  submit emergency contact information for the provider to the [office]
department.
(3) Emergency contact  information submitted by a provider of communications service for cel-
lular devices under this section must be submitted by June 15 of each year or immediately  after a
change in contact information.
(4) Notwithstanding the limitations of ORS 403.135 (3), a cause of  action does not arise against
a provider  of communications service for cellular devices or the officers, employees or agents of the
provider for providing call location information, or the best  available location information, in good
faith as required by this section.
(5) The [ office] department may adopt rules to implement this section.
(6) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Kelsey Smith Act.
SECTION 64.
 ORS 403.160 is amended to read:
403.160. (1) All disputes between a governing body, 9-1-1 jurisdiction  and public or private safety
agency regarding the emergency communications system must be mediated if  the dispute cannot be
resolved in accordance with a written agreement. When a governing body  or 9-1-1 jurisdiction ob-
tains knowledge that a dispute exists and cannot  be resolved by the agencies, the governing body
or the 9-1-1 jurisdiction shall notify the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency  Management of
the dispute in writing. Within 30 days after this notification, the disputing agencies shall mutually
select a mediator and notify the [ office] department in writing of this selection. If a mediator is  not
mutually selected by  the agencies within this period, the Director of the [ Office] Oregon Depart-
ment of  Emergency Management shall select a mediator from the list of mediators established under
subsection (3) of this section. Once selected, the mediator shall establish a schedule for the  medi-
ation process. The disputing agencies shall resolve the dispute within 60 days after the  date the
mediator is agreed upon or selected unless the agencies mutually agree in writing to an extension
of this deadline. A copy of all extensions must be submitted to the [ office] department.
(2) When the mediation process in  subsection (1) of this section ends, the mediator shall notify
the [ office] department in writing of the outcome of the mediation. If  the agencies are not able to
resolve their dispute through mediation, the 9-1-1 jurisdiction or governing body and public  or pri-
vate safety agency or  agencies shall submit the dispute to arbitration. The agencies shall select an
arbitrator within 30 days after the end of the mediation. If the disputing  agencies are unable to
mutually select an arbitrator within this period, the director shall request the presiding  judge for
the judicial district in which the 9-1-1 service area is  located to select an arbitrator. The arbitrator
shall hear and decide the dispute within 30 days after selection unless the agencies  mutually agree
in writing to an extension of this deadline. A party to an arbitration  under this subsection may seek
confirmation, vacation, modification or correction of the arbitrator’s decision as provided  in ORS
36.700, 36.705 and 36.710. A court may vacate a decision only if there is a basis to vacate  the deci-
sion as described in ORS 36.705 (1)(a) to (d). The court may modify  or correct a decision only for
the grounds given in ORS 36.710.
(3) The [ office] department  shall establish a roster of mediators qualified to  mediate disputes
under subsection (1) of this section. This list may be used by the disputing agencies when selecting
a mediator.
(4) Unless otherwise agreed upon, the costs of the mediation or arbitration, including  the
mediator’s or arbitrator’s fees, must be divided equally among the disputing agencies.
SECTION 65.
 ORS 403.165 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 34
403.165. (1) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management may  institute pro-
ceedings against a public or private safety agency, a 9-1-1 jurisdiction  or other person to compel
compliance with or to restrain further violation of ORS 305.823  and 403.105 to 403.250 or rules
adopted pursuant to ORS 403.120.
(2) Proceedings authorized by subsection (1) of this section may be instituted without  official
notice, hearing or order provided in ORS chapter 183. However, proceedings brought  against a
telecommunications utility must be brought before the Public Utility Commission as provided  by
ORS chapter 756.
SECTION 66.  ORS 403.170 is amended to read:
403.170. (1) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of  Emergency Management may enter into an
agreement with the Confederated Tribes of the Warm  Springs Reservation of Oregon for the purpose
of forming an entity to participate in the emergency communications system.
(2) An entity formed under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Is a 9-1-1 jurisdiction for purposes of ORS 305.823 and 403.105 to 403.250.
(b) Shall comply with all state and federal law applicable to 9-1-1 jurisdictions.
(c) Shall operate  within a 9-1-1 service area that includes the Warm Springs Indian Reservation.
(d) May  operate a primary public safety answering point to provide emergency communications
services within its 9-1-1 service area.
(3) As used  in this section, “emergency communications system,” “primary public safety an-
swering point,” “9-1-1 jurisdiction” and “9-1-1 service area” have the meanings  given those terms in
ORS 403.105.
SECTION 67.
 ORS 403.235 is amended to read:
403.235. (1) The Emergency Communications Account is  established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund [ in the State Treasury ]. All  moneys received by the
Department of Revenue pursuant to ORS 403.200 to 403.230 and interest thereon  must be paid to the
State Treasurer to be held in a suspense account established under ORS  293.445. After payment of
refunds, the balance of the moneys received  must be paid into the State Treasury and credited to
the Emergency Communications Account. Interest earned by the account  must be credited to the
9-1-1 Subaccount established under subsection (2) of this section. All moneys in the Emergency
Communications Account are continuously appropriated to  the [ Office] Oregon Department  of
Emergency Management and must be used for the purposes described in ORS 403.240.
(2) The 9-1-1  Subaccount is established as a subaccount of the Emergency Communications Ac-
count. Thirty-five  percent of the amount in the Emergency Communications Account on the date of
distribution must be credited to the  9-1-1 Subaccount. Interest earned by the subaccount must be
credited  to  the subaccount. All moneys in the subaccount are continuously appropriated to the [ Of-
fice] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management and must be  used for the purposes described
in ORS 403.240 (3), (4) and (5).
SECTION 68.  ORS 403.240, as amended by section  4, chapter 653, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
403.240. (1) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management shall distribute quar-
terly the entire amount of the moneys in the Emergency Communications  Account. The [ office] de-
partment shall pay the following amounts from the account:
(a) Administrative costs  incurred during the preceding calendar quarter by the Department of
Revenue in carrying out ORS 403.200 to 403.230 in an amount that does not exceed six-tenths  of one
percent of the amount in the account on the date of distribution, or actual expenses incurred by  the
department, whichever is less.
(b) Administrative costs to  be incurred during the calendar quarter by the [ Office] Oregon De-
partment of Emergency Management in carrying out its duties under  ORS 305.823 and 403.105 to
403.250. The amount to be paid under this paragraph may not exceed 2.4 percent of the  amount in
the account on the date of distribution, and, on or before the next date of  distribution, the [ office]
department shall repay to the account any amount  received under this paragraph that exceeds the
actual expenses incurred by the [ office] department in the quarter.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 35
(2) The [ office] department may:
(a) Provide funding for the Oregon Emergency Response System in  an amount that does not
exceed 15 percent of the legislatively approved budget for the Oregon  Emergency Response System
subject to availability of funds within the limit  for administrative costs in subsection (1)(b) of this
section.
(b) Prescribe the manner in which funding is provided to  the Oregon Emergency Response Sys-
tem under this subsection.
(3) The [ office] department  shall use funds in the 9-1-1 Subaccount to  pay for costs incurred
during the  preceding calendar quarter for emergency communications services provided by a 9-1-1
jurisdiction under ORS 403.105  to 403.250. The [ office] department  may not disburse funds in the
9-1-1 Subaccount to a 9-1-1 jurisdiction that does not have an approved 9-1-1  jurisdiction plan under
ORS 403.130. The [ office] department  shall make payments for costs  of the emergency communi-
cations system on behalf of a 9-1-1 jurisdiction, or make  reimbursement to the 9-1-1 jurisdiction for
such costs, only after a  reimbursement or payment request has been submitted to the [ office] de-
partment in the manner prescribed by the  [office] department. Reimbursement or payment requests
for recurring and nonrecurring  charges necessary to enable the 9-1-1 jurisdiction to comply with
ORS 403.105 to  403.250 must be submitted directly to the [ office] department . The costs
reimbursable or payable under this subsection are only those costs incurred for:
(a) Modification of network routers or servers, central office switching and trunking equipment
or other transport equipment;
(b) Network development, hosting services, operation and maintenance;
(c) Database development, operation and maintenance;
(d) On-premises equipment procurement, maintenance and replacement;
(e) Conversion of pay station telephones required by ORS 403.140;
(f) Collection of the tax imposed by ORS 403.200 to 403.230;
(g) Addressing if the reimbursement or payment request is consistent with rules adopted  by the
[office] department; and
(h) An employee of a 9-1-1  jurisdiction obtaining certification as a telecommunicator or emer-
gency medical dispatcher from the Department of Public Safety  Standards and Training under ORS
181A.560.
(4) Subject to availability of funds, the [ office] Oregon  Department of Emergency Manage-
ment shall  provide funding to 9-1-1 jurisdictions based on cost information provided in their final
plan under ORS 403.130. The [ office] department shall approve 9-1-1  jurisdiction plans that meet the
requirements set forth in ORS 403.115 (2) and  (4). The [ office] department  shall limit funding for
costs incurred prior to the preceding calendar quarter to charges associated with database  devel-
opment, network and on-premises equipment that satisfies the requirements of ORS 403.115 (2) and
(4). The [ office] department  shall prescribe the manner in which funding is provided under  this
subsection.
(5) 9-1-1 jurisdictions may use funds distributed to the jurisdiction from an  account or subac-
count established in ORS 403.235 to repay loans from the Special Public Works Fund if the loans
were used for purposes that are allowable under ORS 403.105 to 403.250.
(6) The [ office] department  shall retain amounts  remaining in the 9-1-1 Subaccount and may
distribute the amounts in a subsequent quarter for those purposes set forth in subsections  (3), (4)
and (5) of this section.
(7) The [ office] department shall review reimbursement or payment requests for costs identified
in subsection (3) of this section, necessary to comply  with ORS 403.105 to 403.250, for the appro-
priateness of the costs claimed. The [ office] department shall approve or reject the reimbursement
or payment requests.
(8) After all amounts under subsections (1) and (2) of this section and ORS 403.235  (2) have been
paid, the [ office] department shall allocate the balance of the  Emergency Communications Account
to cities on a per capita basis and to counties on a per capita basis of each county’s  unincorporated
area for distribution directly to 9-1-1 jurisdictions as directed by the city or county. However, each
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 36
county must be credited a minimum of one percent of the balance of the account after  the amounts
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section and ORS 403.235 (2) have been paid.
(9) 9-1-1 jurisdictions shall submit an accounting report to  the [ office] department annually. The
report must be provided in the  manner prescribed by the [ office] department and must include but
not be limited to:
(a) Funds received and  expended under subsection (8) of this section for the purposes of fulfilling
the requirements of ORS 403.115;
(b) Local funds received and expended for the purposes of fulfilling the requirements of  ORS
403.115; and
(c) Local funds received and expended for the  purposes of providing emergency communications
services.
SECTION 69.  ORS 403.250 is amended to read:
403.250. (1) The Director of  the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management shall
establish by  administrative rule the minimum standards for a primary public safety answering point.
(2) If a primary public safety answering point does  not meet the minimum standards established
under subsection (1) of this section within 45 days after receipt of  written notice from the [ Office]
Oregon Department  of Emergency Management, the [ office] department shall designate an alter-
nate primary public safety answering point that  meets the minimum standards and cause calls to
be rerouted to the designated primary public safety answering point.
SECTION 70.  ORS 403.415 is amended to read:
403.415. (1) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emer-
gency Management shall enter into a contract with a  2-1-1 system facilitator to design, implement
and support a statewide 2-1-1 system.
(2) The contract shall  ensure that the 2-1-1 system facilitator develops and maintains a statewide
resources database that contains information regarding services after an emergency  and health and
human services input by designated regional information centers.
(3) In  awarding the contract under subsection (1) of this section, the [ office] department shall
ensure that the 2-1-1  system facilitator has the funds and the financial capacity to carry out the
terms of the contract and that the contract is cost-neutral to the [ office] department.
SECTION 71.  ORS 403.425 is amended to read:
403.425. Before a state agency that provides health and human services establishes  a new public
information  hotline,  the state agency shall consult with the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emer-
gency Management about using the 2-1-1 system to provide public access to the information.
SECTION 71a. If House Bill 2119  becomes law, section 71 of this 2021 Act (amending ORS
403.425) is repealed.
SECTION 72.  ORS 403.430 is amended to read:
403.430. (1) The [ Office] Oregon  Department  of Emergency Management may accept contrib-
utions of moneys  and assistance from the federal government or its agencies or from any other
source, public or  private, and agree to conditions placed on the moneys not inconsistent with the
purpose of establishing a statewide 2-1-1 system.
(2) The [ office] department may, from contributions of moneys received under subsection (1) of
this section, provide grants to the 2-1-1 system facilitator to enable the  provision of 2-1-1 service 24
hours per day, seven days per week.
SECTION 72a. If House Bill 2119  becomes law, section 72 of this 2021 Act (amending ORS
403.430) is repealed.
SECTION 73.  ORS 403.435 is amended to read:
403.435. The 2-1-1 Account is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct  from the
General Fund. All moneys received by the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management
for the 2-1-1 system under ORS 403.430 shall be deposited into the account and are continuously
appropriated to the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management to be  used only for the
implementation and support of the 2-1-1 system.
SECTION 74.
 ORS 403.450 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 37
403.450. (1)  The State Interoperability Executive Council is created under the State Chief In-
formation Officer to be the statewide interoperability governing body  serving as the primary steer-
ing group for the  Oregon Statewide Communication Interoperability Plan. The membership of the
council consists of:
(a) Two members from the Legislative Assembly, as follows:
(A) The President of the Senate shall appoint one member from the Senate with an interest in
public safety communications infrastructure; and
(B) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one  member from the House of
Representatives with an interest in public safety and emergency communications infrastructure.
(b) The following members appointed by the Governor:
(A) One member from the Department of State Police;
(B) One member from the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management;
(C) One member from the State Forestry Department;
(D) One member from the Department of Corrections;
(E) One member from the Department of Transportation;
(F) One member from the office of the State Chief Information Officer;
(G) One member from the Oregon Health Authority;
(H) One member from the Oregon Military Department;
(I) One member from the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training;
(J) One member from the Oregon Broadband Advisory Council;
(K) One member of an Indian tribe as defined in ORS  97.740 or a designee of an Indian tribe;
and
(L) One member of the public.
(c) The following members appointed by the Governor with the concurrence of the  President of
the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives:
(A) One member from the Oregon Fire Chiefs Association;
(B) One member from the Oregon Association Chiefs of Police;
(C) One member from the Oregon State Sheriffs’ Association;
(D) One member from the Association of Oregon Counties;
(E) One member from the League of Oregon Cities;
(F) One member from the Special Districts Association of Oregon;
(G) One member who is an information technology officer of an Oregon city;
(H) One member who is an information technology officer of an Oregon county;
(I) One member who represents a nonprofit professional organization interested in the en-
hancement of public safety communications systems; and
(J) One member of the public who works or resides in Federal  Communications Commission
Region 35.
(2) Each agency or organization  identified in subsection (1)(b)(A) to (J) and (1)(c)(A) to (H) of
this section shall recommend an individual  from the agency or organization for membership on the
council.
(3) Members of the council are not entitled to compensation, but in the discretion  of the State
Chief Information Officer may be reimbursed from funds available to the office of  the State Chief
Information Officer for actual and necessary travel and other expenses the members incur in  per-
forming the members’ official duties in the manner and amount provided in ORS 292.495.
(4) Members of the Legislative Assembly  appointed to the council are nonvoting members and
may act in an advisory capacity only.
SECTION 75.
 ORS 465.505 is amended to read:
465.505. (1) In addition to any other applicable federal or state law and  regulation, the following
waste minimization requirements shall apply to dry cleaning facilities:
(a) All wastes  meeting the state and federal criteria for hazardous waste, excluding wastewater,
generated at any dry cleaning facility and containing dry  cleaning solvents, including residues and
filters, shall be managed and disposed of, regardless of quantity generated, as hazardous wastes  in
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 38
accordance with federal and state laws otherwise applicable  to management of hazardous wastes,
except that, as to the cleanup of releases of dry cleaning solvents, ORS 465.503  shall apply rather
than ORS 466.205;
(b) Wastewater  contaminated with dry cleaning solvents from the water separation process of
dry cleaning machines may  not be discharged into any sanitary sewer or septic tank or into the
waters of this state;
(c) Dry cleaning  operators shall manage solvent contaminated wastewater generated in the wa-
ter separation process in accordance with rules adopted by the Environmental  Quality Commission;
(d) A dry  cleaning facility may not include operation of transfer-type dry cleaning equipment
using perchloroethylene;
(e) All newly installed dry cleaning systems using perchloroethylene shall be of  the dry-to-dry
type and be equipped with integral refrigerated condensers with an outlet  temperature sensor for
the control of perchloroethylene emissions;
(f) All existing dry cleaning systems using perchloroethylene  shall install refrigerated
condensers, or an equivalent;
(g) Every dry cleaning facility shall  install secondary containment systems capable of containing
dry cleaning solvent under and around each machine or item of equipment in which any dry cleaning
solvent is used, treated or stored; and
(h) All perchloroethylene dry cleaning solvent shall be delivered to dry cleaning facilities by
means of closed, direct-coupled delivery systems.
(2) The  Department of Environmental Quality may authorize the use of alternative measures at
a dry cleaning facility in lieu of one or more of the measures described under subsection  (1) of this
section upon proof satisfactory  to the department that the alternative measures can provide equiv-
alent protection  for public health and the environment, can achieve equivalent waste minimization
and are consistent with other applicable laws and regulations.
(3) Every dry cleaning and dry store operator shall provide  annually to the department on forms
to be supplied by the department, information regarding  compliance with the waste minimization
requirements set forth in subsection (1) of  this section and any other information as the department
considers necessary for carrying out the purposes of ORS 465.200 and 465.500 to 465.545.
(4) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a dry cleaning operator for a facility having a re-
lease of dry cleaning solvents shall immediately report any  release exceeding one pound to the no-
tification system managed by  the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management pursuant
to ORS 401.094.
(5) The Environmental  Quality Commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement ORS
465.200 and  465.500 to 465.545, including but not limited to rules implementing the recommendations
of the advisory group established  under ORS 465.507 or requiring the implementation of new waste
minimization technologies.
SECTION 76.
 ORS 466.635 is amended to read:
466.635. Any person owning or having control over any oil  or hazardous material who has
knowledge of a spill or release shall immediately notify the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emer-
gency Management as soon as that person knows the spill or release is a reportable quantity.
SECTION 77.  ORS 824.088 is amended to read:
824.088. (1) Each railroad that gives notice to the United States Department of Transportation
of an incident that occurs during the course of  transporting hazardous materials as defined by fed-
eral regulations shall also give  notice of the incident to the Director of the [ Office] Oregon De-
partment of Emergency Management.
(2) As soon as reasonably practicable, each railroad shall  notify the director by telephone or
similar means of communication of any derailment  or fire involving or affecting hazardous material.
(3) To facilitate expedited and accurate  notice to the director under this section, each train
transporting hazardous materials in this state shall be  equipped with at least two radio
transmitter-receivers in good working order. In  addition, 18 months after October 4, 1977, trains
over 2,000 feet in length that are transporting  hazardous materials shall be equipped with a radio
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 39
handset in good working order capable of communicating with the radio  transmitter-receivers. If the
equipment required under this section does not function while the train is en route, the train may
proceed to the next point of crew change where the equipment shall be replaced or repaired.
SECTION 78.
 ORS 30.269 is amended to read:
30.269. (1) Punitive damages may not be awarded on any claim subject to ORS 30.260 to 30.300.
(2) Claims  subject to ORS 30.260 to 30.300 are not subject to the limitation imposed by ORS
31.710.
(3) A court may not  apply the limitations imposed on recovery under ORS 30.271, 30.272 and
30.273 until after the entry of a verdict  or a stipulation by the parties to the amount of the damages.
(4) The limitations imposed under ORS 30.271 (2) and  30.272 (2) on single claimants include
damages claimed for loss of services or loss of support arising out of the same tort.
(5) If two or more claimants recover  on a claim that arises out of a single accident or occur-
rence, and the recovery is subject to a limitation  imposed by ORS 30.271 (3), 30.272 (3) or 30.273
(2)(b), any party to the  action in which the claim is made may apply to the court to apportion to
each claimant  the proper share of the amount allowed by ORS 30.271 (3), 30.272 (3) or 30.273 (2)(b).
The share apportioned to each claimant shall be in the proportion that the ratio of the award or
settlement made to  the claimant bears to the aggregate awards and settlements for all claims arising
out of the accident or occurrence.
(6) Liability of any public body and one or more of  its officers, employees or agents, or two or
more officers, employees or agents of a public body, on claims arising out of a single accident or
occurrence,  may  not exceed in the aggregate the amounts allowed by ORS 30.271, 30.272 and 30.273.
(7) ORS 30.271, 30.272 and 30.273 do not apply to a claim arising in connection with  a nuclear
incident covered by an insurance or indemnity agreement under 42 U.S.C. 2210.
(8) For the purposes of the limitations imposed  by ORS 30.271, 30.272 and 30.273, events giving
rise to a [ proclamation] declaration  of a state of emergency under ORS 401.165, or a
[proclamation] declaration of a state of  public health emergency under ORS 433.441,  do not con-
stitute a single accident or occurrence.
SECTION 79.
 ORS 401.364 is amended to read:
401.364. (1) A qualified emergency service volunteer is an agent of a public body under ORS
30.260 to 30.300 for the purpose of acts and  omissions of the volunteer that are within the course
and scope of the volunteer’s duties if the acts or omissions occur:
(a) While the volunteer is performing emergency service activities under the direction of the
public body during a  state of emergency declared under this chapter, or during a state of public
health emergency [ proclaimed] declared under ORS 433.441; or
(b) While the volunteer is engaged in training being conducted or approved by a public body for
the purpose of preparing the volunteer to perform emergency services.
(2) A public body shall defend, save harmless and indemnify a qualified emergency service  vol-
unteer as required by ORS 30.285 for any  tort claim arising out of an act or omission described in
subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 80.  ORS 401.655 is amended to read:
401.655. During a state of emergency declared under ORS 401.165 or a state  of public health
emergency [ proclaimed] declared under ORS 433.441, a health care provider who is licensed, certi-
fied or otherwise authorized or permitted by the laws of another state to administer health care
services and who is registered under ORS 401.654 may administer health care services in this  state
as if the health care provider were licensed in this state.
SECTION 81.
 ORS 401.657 is amended to read:
401.657. (1) The Oregon Health Authority may designate all or  part of a health care facility or
other location as an emergency health  care center. If the Governor declares a state of emergency
under ORS  401.165, or [ proclaims] declares a state of public health emergency under ORS 433.441,
emergency health care centers may be used for:
(a) Evaluation and referral of individuals affected by the emergency;
(b) Provision of health care services; and
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 40
(c) Preparation of patients for transportation.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may enter into cooperative agreements  with a local public
health authority, as defined in ORS 431.003, that allow  the local public health authority to designate
emergency health care centers under this section.
(3) An emergency  health care center designated under this section must have an emergency
operations plan and a credentialing plan that governs the use  of emergency health care providers
registered under ORS  401.654 and other health care providers who volunteer to perform health care
services at the  center under ORS 401.651 to 401.670. The emergency operations plan and creden-
tialing plan must comply with  rules governing those plans adopted by the Oregon Health Authority.
SECTION 82.
 ORS 401.658 is amended to read:
401.658. (1) The Oregon Health Authority may  include in the emergency health care provider
registry established under  ORS 401.654 a person who was previously licensed, certified or otherwise
authorized to provide health care services in Oregon by a health professional regulatory board if:
(a) The person was licensed, certified or otherwise authorized to provide health  care services
not more than 10 years before entry in the registry; and
(b) The person meets such other criteria as may be established by the authority.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law prohibiting a person from providing health care  services
without a license, certificate or other authorization from a health professional  regulatory board, a
person entered in the emergency  health care provider registry under subsection (1) of this section
may provide health care services during a state of  emergency declared under ORS 401.165 or a state
of public health emergency  [proclaimed] declared under ORS 433.441 without a license, certification
or other authorization if:
(a) The person is in compliance with all rules adopted by the authority  for persons providing
health care services under this section; and
(b) The authority has directed the person to provide health care services under ORS 401.661 (1).
(3) The authority may adopt rules, after consulting with  the appropriate health professional
regulatory boards, that establish criteria and requirements for including persons  in the emergency
health care provider registry under this section, including but not limited to:
(a) Educational requirements;
(b) Training requirements;
(c) Verification  of previous licenses, certifications or other authorization by a health profes-
sional regulatory board;
(d) Verification that the previous licenses, certifications or other authorization  of the person
was not revoked by reason of unprofessional conduct or any other reason that would  affect the
person’s ability to safely provide health care services; and
(e) Limitations on the type of health care services that may be provided by the person under this
section and the places at which those services may be provided.
SECTION 83.
 ORS 401.661 is amended to read:
401.661. If the Governor declares a state of emergency under ORS 401.165 or  [ proclaims] de-
clares a state of public health emergency under ORS 433.441:
(1) The Oregon Health Authority, in conjunction with the  Department of Human Services for
facilities  licensed  by the department, may direct emergency health care providers registered under
ORS 401.654 who are willing to provide health care  services to proceed to any place in this state
where health care services are required by reason of the emergency or crisis;
(2) Pursuant to the Emergency Management Assistance Compact and the  Pacific Northwest
Emergency  Management  Arrangement, the Oregon Health Authority may direct emergency health
care providers registered under ORS 401.654 who are willing to provide health  care services in an-
other state to proceed to another state where emergency health care  services are required by rea-
son of an emergency in that state; and
(3) Any emergency health care provider registered under ORS 401.654 or other health care
provider may volunteer to perform health care services described in ORS  401.657 at any emergency
health care center or health care facility in the manner provided by ORS 401.664.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 41
SECTION 84.  ORS 401.667 is amended to read:
401.667. (1) If the Governor declares  a state of emergency under ORS 401.165, or [ proclaims]
declares a state of public health emergency under ORS 433.441, emergency health  care providers
registered under ORS  401.654 and other health care providers who volunteer to perform health care
services under ORS 401.651 to 401.670 are agents of the state under ORS 30.260 to 30.300 for  the
purposes of any claims arising out of  services that are provided under ORS 401.651 to 401.670 pur-
suant to directions from a  public body and that are within the course and scope of the health care
provider’s duties, without regard to whether the health  care provider is compensated for the ser-
vices.
(2) If the Governor declares a state of emergency under ORS 401.165, or [ proclaims] declares a
state of public health emergency under ORS 433.441, health care facilities designated under ORS
401.657 and other  persons operating emergency health care centers designated under ORS 401.657
are agents of the state under ORS 30.260 to 30.300 for the purposes of  any claims arising out of
services that are provided through those centers or facilities under ORS 401.651 to  401.670 pursuant
to directions from a public body and that are within the course  and scope of the duties of the health
care facility or other person, without  regard to whether the health care facility or other person is
compensated for the services.
(3) An emergency  health care provider registered under ORS 401.654 participating in training
authorized by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS  401.651 to 401.670 is an agent of the state
under ORS 30.260 to 30.300 for the purposes of any claims arising out of that training.
(4) The provisions  of subsection (2) of this section apply only to emergency health care centers
or health care facilities that have adopted emergency operations plans and credentialing plans  that
govern the use of emergency health care providers registered under ORS 401.654 and other  health
care providers who volunteer to perform health care services under ORS 401.651 to  401.670. An
emergency operations plan and a credentialing plan must comply with rules governing  those plans
adopted by the authority.
SECTION 85.
 ORS 433.448 is amended to read:
433.448. (1)(a) During a  state of public health emergency [ proclaimed] declared  under ORS
433.441 or during a state of emergency declared under ORS 401.165 that is  related to a state of
public health emergency that has  not expired, the immunization registry and tracking and recall
system established under ORS 433.094 may be used as  a vaccination management and tracking sys-
tem for the purpose of preventing the spread of diseases that can  be prevented by vaccination or for
tracking the mass administration of antibiotic prophylaxis.
(b) When being used  as authorized by this section, an immunization registry may include persons
of any age,  and vaccination records may be shared with authorized users of the registry for purposes
related to the [ proclaimed] declared state of public health emergency without obtaining the prior
authorization of the clients of the registry.
(2) As used in this section,  “client” and “immunization registry” have the meaning given those
terms in ORS 433.090.
SECTION 86.  Section 1, chapter 85, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  The Fuel Storage Facility Compatibility Fund is  established in the State Treasury, sep-
arate and distinct from the General  Fund. Interest earned by the Fuel Storage Facility Compatibility
Fund shall be credited to the  fund. The Fuel Storage Facility Compatibility Fund consists of any
moneys deposited in the fund from  whatever source and may include moneys appropriated, allocated,
deposited or transferred to the fund  by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise and interest earned
on moneys in the fund. The moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the [ Office]
Oregon Department  of Emergency Management for  the purposes specified in section 3 , chapter
85, Oregon Laws 2016  [ of this 2016 Act ].
SECTION 87.  Section 3, chapter  85, Oregon Laws 2016, as amended by section 1, chapter 516,
Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 42
Sec. 3.  (1) The  [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management shall develop a grant
program for the purpose of installing  generator connectors on fuel sources at cardlock facilities in
this state.
(2) Pursuant to the grant program:
(a) The [ office] department may solicit and receive applications for grants from owners or op-
erators of cardlock facilities in this state. The [ office] department shall establish standards for the
qualification of applicants.
(b) The [ office] department shall establish criteria by which  to determine which applicants will
receive grants, with the goal  of maximizing the availability of fuel to emergency response personnel
in the case of emergency.
(c) The [ office] department shall enter into agreements with grant recipients that require grant
recipients to install generator connectors on cardlock facilities.
(d) The [ office] department shall specify one or  more types of generator connectors that a grant
recipient must install. In specifying types of generator connectors, the [ office] department shall
consult with the Department of  Transportation and the State Fire Marshal and shall have the goal
of maximizing the compatibility of cardlock facilities in this state with generators possessed or
controlled by the [ office] Oregon Department of Emergency  Management , the [ department] De-
partment of Transportation  and the Oregon National Guard.
(e) The [ office] Oregon Department of Emergency Management  may not issue grants in  ex-
cess of $10,000 per cardlock facility.
(3) The [ office] Oregon Department of Emergency Management  shall adopt  rules to admin-
ister and implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 88.
 Section 4, chapter 85, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  The State Fire Marshal, while conducting an annual safety inspection as described  in
ORS 480.375 of  a cardlock facility that received a grant under the program established under section
3, chapter 85, Oregon Laws 2016  [ of this 2016  Act ], shall inspect generator connectors installed
pursuant to the  grant program. If the State Fire Marshal determines that generator connectors in-
stalled pursuant to the grant  program meet safety requirements and are otherwise properly in-
stalled, the State Fire Marshal shall deliver a letter certifying  the determination to the [ Office]
Oregon Department  of Emergency Management.
SECTION 88a.  ORS 469.533 is amended to read:
469.533. Notwithstanding ORS chapter 401, the State  Department of Energy in cooperation with
the Oregon Health Authority and the [ Office] Oregon Department  of  Emergency Management shall
establish rules for the protection of health  and procedures for the evacuation of people and com-
munities who would be  affected by radiation in the event of an accident or a catastrophe in the
operation of a nuclear power plant or nuclear installation.
SECTION 88b. ORS 404.100 is amended to read:
404.100. The Director of the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management  shall ap-
point a Search and Rescue Coordinator to:
(1) Coordinate the search and rescue function of the  [Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency
Management;
(2) Coordinate the activities of state and federal agencies involved in search and rescue;
(3) Establish liaison with the Oregon  State Sheriffs’ Association and other public and private
organizations and agencies involved in search and rescue;
(4) Provide on-scene search and rescue coordination when requested by an authorized person;
(5) Coordinate and process requests for the use of volunteers and equipment;
(6) Assist in developing training and outdoor education programs;
(7) Gather statistics in search and rescue operations; and
(8) Gather and disseminate resource information  of personnel, equipment and materials available
for search and rescue.
SECTION 88c.
 ORS 404.105 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 43
404.105. The [ Office] Oregon  Department  of Emergency Management shall establish and main-
tain a program for the air search and rescue of lost aircraft and persons and for the air support of
other emergency situations. The program  established under this section may include, but is not
limited to, the following:
(1) The formation of a volunteer air search and  rescue organization and provision of appropriate
training to this organization.
(2) Directing, coordinating and performing  air activities in conjunction with air search and
rescue and other emergency situations.
(3) Entering into agreements with private persons, volunteer organizations, and federal,  state
and local agencies for air search and rescue and other emergency activities.
(4) Such other related activities as may be deemed necessary  and appropriate by the Director
of the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management.
SECTION 88d.
 ORS 404.110 is amended to read:
404.110. (1) The sheriff of each county has the responsibility for search and rescue  activities
within the  county. The duty of a sheriff under this subsection may be delegated to a deputy or other
qualified person.
(2) If the sheriff does not accept the responsibility for search and  rescue activities, the chief
executive of the county shall direct the county emergency program manager appointed  under ORS
401.305 to perform the duties and responsibilities required under ORS 404.100 to 404.270.
(3) A sheriff or other person performing  the duties of the sheriff under this section shall notify
the [ Office] Oregon  Department  of Emergency Management of each search and rescue in the
county and shall request the assignment of incident numbers for each search and rescue.
(4) When search and rescue activities occur in a multicounty area:
(a) The sheriff of one county, or  the other person performing the duties of the sheriff of one of
the counties under this section, shall take charge, or the counties shall  form a unified command, as
outlined in  the National Incident Management System Incident Command System established by
Homeland Security Presidential Directive 5 of February 28, 2003; or
(b) If the appropriate sheriff or other  person does not assume command as described in para-
graph (a) of this subsection, the sheriff who received the initial call  shall take charge of the multi-
county search and rescue.
SECTION 88e.
 ORS 404.120 is amended to read:
404.120. (1) The sheriff of each county shall adopt a search and  rescue plan for the county. The
search and rescue plan shall set forth search and rescue  policies, including policies for implemen-
tation of multicounty search and  rescue activities, for the county that comply with the relevant
provisions of the National  Incident Management System Incident Command System established by
Homeland Security Presidential Directive 5 of February 28,  2003, and shall describe procedures for
implementing those policies.  A county search and rescue plan shall list and describe materials, mu-
tual aid agreements, equipment and personnel available  within the county for search and rescue
incidents. The plan shall also include:
(a) A detailed description of activities and circumstances that  constitute search and rescue in
the county.
(b) Identification of  volunteer organizations available to the county for use for search and res-
cue.
(c) Procedures for  contacting and requesting assistance from volunteer organizations during
search and rescue activities.
(d) Procedures for contacting and requesting available assistance  from other agencies and
groups.
(e) Minimum standards for individuals whose technical or  professional skills may be required for
search and rescue.
(2) A county search and rescue plan adopted under this section shall require a person in charge
of a search and rescue to complete a fact sheet for the incident. The fact sheet  shall contain the
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 44
incident number assigned under ORS 404.130 for search and rescue and such other information  re-
quired under the search and rescue plan of the county.
(3) The sheriff of each county shall review and, if necessary or desirable, revise the  search and
rescue plan annually. After the initial adoption of a search  and rescue plan under this section and
after each annual review or revision  of the plan, the sheriff shall submit the plan to the Search and
Rescue Coordinator appointed under ORS 404.100.
(4) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management, after consultation with the
Oregon State Sheriffs’ Association, may establish guidelines for county search and rescue plans.
(5) The [ Office of Emergency Management ] department shall annually publish  and distribute to
the sheriff of each county a search and rescue  resource inventory, which shall include materials,
equipment and personnel available from counties,  agencies and the State of Oregon for use in search
and rescue incidents.
SECTION 88f.  ORS 404.125 is amended to read:
404.125. (1) After a search and rescue, the sheriff of the county in which the search  and rescue
took place shall conduct a critique of the incident:
(a) If, in the opinion of the sheriff, the critique would be useful; or
(b) Upon request from an individual directly involved in the incident.
(2) As  part of the critique, the sheriff shall examine the search and rescue report and may re-
ceive testimony and information from persons involved in the incident.
(3) When a critique of a search and rescue is conducted under this  section, the sheriff shall
prepare findings of  fact concerning the search and rescue, including the investigatory component,
and may prepare recommendations for the conduct of future  incidents or propose amendments to the
search and rescue plan under which the search and rescue was conducted.
(4) If amendments to the search and rescue plan are proposed and  adopted, the sheriff shall file
the amended search and rescue  plan with the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Manage-
ment.
(5) The [ office] department  shall, in consultation with the Oregon State Sheriffs’ Association,
develop a standardized critique form to be used in the search and rescue critiques performed by a
sheriff under this section.
SECTION 88g.
 ORS 404.200 is amended to read:
404.200. As used in ORS 404.200 to 404.215:
(1) “Qualified search and rescue volunteer” means [ a person who is ]:
(a) A person who is  registered with the [ Office] Oregon  Department  of Emergency Manage-
ment to conduct search and rescue activities;
(b) A person who is  registered with a sheriff to conduct search and rescue activities;
(c) A  member of a designated search and rescue organization that is registered with a sheriff
or the [ Office of Emergency Management ] department; or
(d) A person who  is acknowledged in writing as a qualified search and rescue volunteer by the
[Office of Emergency Management ] department , or by a sheriff or  the designee of a sheriff, at the
scene of a search or rescue.
(2) “Search and rescue activities” means:
(a) Searching for, rescuing or recovering any person who is missing, injured or deceased; and
(b) Training to perform  the activities described in paragraph (a) of this subsection that is either
conducted or approved by a public body.
SECTION 88h.
 ORS 433.441 is amended to read:
433.441. (1) Upon the occurrence of a public health emergency, the Governor may declare a state
of public health emergency as authorized by ORS 433.441 to 433.452 to protect the public health.
(2) A [ proclamation] declaration of a state of public health emergency must specify:
(a) The nature of the public health emergency;
(b) The political subdivision or geographic area subject to the [ proclamation] declaration;
(c) The conditions that have brought about the public health emergency; and
(d) The duration of the state of public health emergency, if the duration is less than 14 days.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 45
(3) During a declared public health emergency, the Governor may:
(a) Close, order the evacuation of or order the decontamination of  any facility the Governor
has reasonable cause to believe may endanger the public health.
(b) Regulate or restrict by any means necessary the use, sale  or distribution of food, fuel, med-
ical supplies, medicines or other goods and services.
(c) Prescribe modes of transportation, routes and destinations required for  the evacuation of
individuals or the provision of emergency services.
(d) Control or limit entry into, exit  from, movement within and the occupancy of premises in any
public area subject to or threatened by a public health emergency  if such actions are reasonable
and necessary to respond to the public health emergency.
(e) Authorize pharmacists licensed under ORS chapter 689  to administer vaccines to persons
who are three years of age or older.
(f) Take any other action that may be  necessary for the management of resources, or to protect
the public during a public health  emergency, including any actions authorized under ORS 401.168,
401.185, 401.188 and 401.192.
(4) Nothing in  ORS 433.441 to 433.452 limits the authority of the Governor to declare a state
of emergency under  ORS 401.165. If a state of emergency is declared as authorized under ORS
401.165, the Governor may implement any action authorized by ORS 433.441 to 433.452.
(5) A [ proclamation] declaration of a state of public health emergency  expires when terminated
by a declaration of  the Governor or no more than 14 days after the date the public health emer-
gency is [ proclaimed] declared unless the Governor expressly extends the [ proclamation] declaration
for an additional 14-day period.
(6) When real or personal property is  taken under power granted by this section, the owner of
the property shall be entitled to reasonable compensation from the state.
RENAMING AND REORGANIZATION OF
THE OFFICE OF THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL
SECTION 89. (1) The amendments to ORS 476.020 by section 90 of this  2021 Act are in-
tended to change the name of the office of the State Fire Marshal to the Department of  the
State Fire Marshal and establish that entity as a state agency independent from  the De-
partment of State Police.
(2) For the purpose of harmonizing and clarifying  statutory law, the Legislative Counsel
may substitute for words designating the “office of the State Fire Marshal,” wherever  they
occur in statutory law, other words designating the  “Department of the State Fire
Marshal.”
SECTION 90.  ORS 476.020 is amended to read:
476.020. (1) The [ office of ] Department of  the  State Fire Marshal is established . [ in the De-
partment of State Police. The State Fire Marshal shall be appointed by and be administratively  re-
sponsible to the Superintendent of State Police, and shall serve at the pleasure  of the superintendent.
The State Fire Marshal shall retain all current authority of the office and shall be responsible  for the
implementation of its mission and programs. ] The department is under the supervision and con-
trol of the State Fire Marshal.
(2) The Governor shall appoint the State Fire Marshal, who holds the office at the
pleasure of the Governor. The appointment of the State Fire Marshal  is subject to confir-
mation by the Senate in the manner prescribed by ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(2) The State Fire Marshal shall be qualified  to direct the technical and executive work of the
[agency] department as determined by the  [ superintendent] Governor  and shall have education or
training related to the programs of the [ agency] department and significant  experience in managing
fire protection or related programs.
(3) The State Fire Marshal shall be paid a  salary as provided by law or, if not so provided,
as prescribed by the Governor.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 46
(4) Subject to the approval of the Governor, the State Fire Marshal may organize  and
reorganize the administrative structure of the department as the State Fire Marshal con-
siders appropriate to properly conduct the work of the department.
(5) The State Fire Marshal may divide the functions of the department into administra-
tive divisions. Subject to  the approval of the Governor, the State Fire Marshal may appoint
an individual to administer each division. The administrator of each  division serves at the
pleasure of the State Fire Marshal and is not subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 240.
Each individual appointed under this subsection must be well qualified  by technical training
and experience in the functions to be performed by the individual.
(Finance)
SECTION 91.
(1) The unexpended balances of amounts authorized to be expended by the
Department of State Police for purposes of the  office of the State Fire Marshal for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from revenues dedicated,  continuously appropriated, appro-
priated or otherwise made available for the purpose  of administering and enforcing the du-
ties, functions and powers transferred by the amendments to ORS  476.020 by section 90 of
this 2021 Act are transferred to and are available for  expenditure by the Department of the
State Fire Marshal for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023.
(2) The  expenditure classifications, if any, established by Acts authorizing or limiting
expenditures by the office of the State Fire Marshal remain  applicable to expenditures by the
Department of the State Fire Marshal under this section.
(Action, Proceeding, Prosecution)
SECTION 92. The transfer of duties, functions and powers to the Department of the
State Fire Marshal by the amendments to  ORS 476.020 by section 90 of this 2021 Act does
not affect any action, proceeding or prosecution involving or with  respect to such duties,
functions and powers begun before  and pending at the time of the transfer, except that the
Department of the State Fire Marshal is substituted for the office  of the State Fire Marshal
in the action, proceeding or prosecution.
(Liability, Duty, Obligation)
SECTION 93. (1) Nothing in the amendments to ORS 476.020 by section 90 of  this 2021
Act relieves a person of a liability, duty  or obligation accruing under or with respect to the
duties, functions and powers transferred by the amendments to ORS 476.020 by section  90
of this 2021 Act. The Department of the State Fire Marshal may undertake  the collection or
enforcement of any such liability, duty or obligation.
(2) The rights and obligations of the office of the State Fire  Marshal legally incurred
under contracts, leases and business transactions executed, entered into or begun before  the
operative date specified in section 155a of this 2021 Act are transferred to the Department
of the State Fire Marshal. For the purpose of  succession to these rights and obligations, the
Department of the State Fire Marshal is  a continuation of the office of the State Fire Mar-
shal and not a new authority.
(Rules)
SECTION 94.
Notwithstanding the transfer of duties, functions and  powers by the
amendments to ORS 476.020 by section 90 of this 2021 Act, the rules of  the office of the State
Fire Marshal in effect on the operative date specified in section 155a of this 2021 Act continue
in effect until superseded or repealed by rules of the Department of the State Fire  Marshal.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 47
References in rules of  the office of the State Fire Marshal to the office of the State Fire
Marshal or an officer or employee of the office of the State Fire Marshal are considered to
be references to the Department of the State Fire  Marshal or an officer or employee of the
Department of the State Fire Marshal.
SECTION 95.
Whenever, in any statutory law or  resolution of the Legislative Assembly
or in any rule, document, record or  proceeding authorized by the Legislative Assembly, ref-
erence is made to the  office of the State Fire Marshal or an officer or employee of the office
of the State Fire  Marshal, the reference is considered to be a reference to the Department
of the State  Fire Marshal or an officer or employee of the Department of the State Fire
Marshal. Whenever, in any  statutory law or resolution of the Legislative Assembly or in any
rule, document, record  or proceeding authorized by the Legislative Assembly, reference is
made to the State Fire Marshal, the reference is considered  to be a reference to the De-
partment of  the State Fire Marshal, the State Fire Marshal or both, as the context requires.
(Interim State Fire Marshal)
SECTION 96. The State Fire Marshal  on the operative date specified in section 155a of
this 2021 Act shall serve as the initial State Fire Marshal at the  pleasure of the Governor
and without the need for confirmation by the Senate.
NOTE: Sections 97 through 107 were deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not re-
numbered.
(Conforming Amendments)
SECTION 108. ORS 182.535 is amended to read:
182.535. For purposes of  ORS 182.535 to 182.550, “natural resource agency” means the Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality,  the State Department of Agriculture, the Water Resources Depart-
ment, the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, the State Forestry  Department, the Department
of State Lands, the Department  of Education, the State Department of Geology and Mineral Indus-
tries, the Department of Land Conservation and Development, the  State Marine Board, the Public
Utility Commission, the Department of Transportation, the Department of the  State Fire Marshal
and the Oregon Health Authority.
SECTION 109. ORS 183.457 is amended to read:
183.457. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 8.690, 9.160 and 9.320, and unless otherwise authorized by an-
other law, a person participating in a contested case hearing conducted  by an agency described in
this subsection may be represented by an attorney or by an authorized representative subject to  the
provisions of subsection (2) of this section.  The Attorney General shall prepare model rules for
proceedings with lay representation  that do not have the effect of precluding lay representation.
No rule adopted by  a state agency shall have the effect of precluding lay representation. The
agencies before which an authorized representative may appear are:
(a) The State Landscape Contractors Board in the administration of the Landscape  Contractors
Law.
(b) The State Department of Energy and the Energy Facility Siting Council.
(c) The Environmental Quality Commission and the Department of Environmental Quality.
(d) The Department of Consumer and Business Services for proceedings  in which an insured
appears pursuant to ORS 737.505.
(e) The Department of Consumer and  Business Services and any other agency for the purpose
of proceedings to enforce the state building code, as defined by ORS 455.010.
(f) The Department of the  State Fire Marshal [ in the Department of State Police ].
(g) The Department of  State Lands for proceedings regarding the issuance or denial of fill or
removal permits under ORS 196.800 to 196.825.
(h) The Public Utility Commission.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 48
(i) The Water Resources Commission and the Water Resources Department.
(j) The Land Conservation and Development Commission and the Department of Land  Conser-
vation and Development.
(k) The State Department of Agriculture, for purposes of hearings under ORS 215.705.
(L) The Bureau of Labor and Industries.
(2) A person participating in a contested case hearing as provided in  subsection (1) of this sec-
tion may appear by an authorized representative if:
(a) The  agency conducting the contested case hearing has determined that appearance of such
a person by an authorized representative will not hinder the orderly and timely development of  the
record in the type of contested case hearing being conducted;
(b) The agency  conducting the contested case hearing allows, by rule, authorized representatives
to appear on behalf of such participants in the type of contested  case hearing being conducted; and
(c) The officer presiding at the  contested case hearing may exercise discretion to limit an au-
thorized representative’s presentation of evidence, examination and cross-examination of witnesses,
or presentation of factual  arguments to ensure the orderly and timely development of the hearing
record, and shall not allow an authorized representative to present legal arguments except  to the
extent authorized under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The officer presiding at  a contested case hearing in which an authorized representative ap-
pears under the provisions of this section may allow the authorized representative to  present evi-
dence, examine and cross-examine witnesses, and make arguments relating to the:
(a) Application of statutes and rules to the facts in the contested case;
(b) Actions taken by the agency in the past in similar situations;
(c) Literal meaning of the statutes or rules at issue in the contested case;
(d) Admissibility of evidence; and
(e) Proper procedures to be used in the contested case hearing.
(4) Upon judicial review, no limitation imposed by an  agency presiding officer on the partic-
ipation of an authorized representative shall be the basis for  reversal or remand of agency action
unless the limitation resulted in substantial prejudice  to a person entitled to judicial review of the
agency  action.
(5) For the purposes of this  section, “authorized representative” means a member of a partic-
ipating partnership, an authorized officer or regular employee  of a participating corporation, asso-
ciation or organized group, or  an authorized officer or employee of a participating governmental
authority other than a state agency.
SECTION 110.
 ORS 264.348 is amended to read:
264.348. Copies of the fire prevention code  referred to in ORS 264.342 shall be filed with the
[State Fire Marshal’s office ] Department of the State Fire Marshal  and a copy shall  be posted at
each fire station within the domestic water supply district.
SECTION 111. ORS 443.760 is amended to read:
443.760. (1) Adult foster homes  that are certified as residential homes as defined in ORS 197.660
must meet all state and local building, sanitation, utility and fire code requirements applicable to
single family dwellings. However, by rule, the licensing agency may adopt  more stringent standards
upon a finding that there is a significant health or safety threat to residents that necessitates a
standard not imposed on other single family dwellings.
(2) In adopting more  stringent standards, the licensing agency shall consult with the Department
of Consumer and Business Services and the [ office] Department of the  State Fire Marshal to ensure
that the provider has the ability to evacuate all residents from an adult foster home within:
(a) Three minutes; or
(b) A period that meets applicable fire,  life and safety requirements if the adult foster home has
an interior sprinkler system approved by the appropriate regulatory authorities.
(3) If a licensed provider rents or leases the premises where the adult foster  home is located,
the lessor shall charge a flat rate for the lease or rental.
SECTION 112.
 ORS 453.327 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 49
453.327. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision  of ORS 453.307 to 453.414 and 476.030, the
public is permitted access to records retained under ORS 453.322 relating to hazardous substances
not otherwise  protected as a trade secret or by a confidentiality agreement described in ORS 453.332
and 453.337. A person requesting information under this  section may be required to complete the
form provided by  the Department of the  State Fire Marshal pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) If, in the discretion of the State Fire Marshal, it is necessary to protect  the public safety
and welfare, the State Fire Marshal may require a person requesting  information under subsection
(1) of  this section to complete a form developed by the State Fire Marshal. The form shall require
the person making the request for information to provide  the name and address and proof of identity
of the person making the request.
SECTION 113.
 ORS 453.342 is amended to read:
453.342. Any fire department,  emergency service personnel or law enforcement agency respond-
ing to an incident of injury to a human, wildlife, domestic animal or  property resulting from a haz-
ardous substance emergency shall  make a report of the incident, in writing, to the [ office]
Department of the State Fire Marshal. The State Fire Marshal annually shall  summarize all inci-
dents reported to the [ State Fire Marshal ] department and the  information received as a result of
the survey conducted under ORS 453.317. The  State Fire Marshal shall submit a copy of the sum-
mary to:
(1) The Governor;
(2) The Legislative Assembly;
(3) The Department of Environmental Quality;
(4) The Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(5) The Department of Transportation;
(6) The Environmental Health Sciences Center at Oregon State University;
(7) The [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management;
(8) The Oregon Health Authority; and
(9) Every public library as defined in ORS 357.400.
SECTION 114.
 ORS 453.362 is amended to read:
453.362. In order to conduct  the hazardous substance survey under ORS 453.317, the State Fire
Marshal may obtain employers’ names and addresses from the Department of Consumer and  Busi-
ness Services. The Department of the  State  Fire Marshal shall pay for the expenses incurred by
the Department of Consumer and Business Services in providing such information.
SECTION 115. ORS 453.392 is amended to read:
453.392. (1) As part of the plan for the effective implementation of  a statewide hazardous mate-
rial emergency response system established by rule under ORS 453.374, the State Fire Marshal  shall
adopt by rule a plan for the coordinated response to oil or  hazardous material spills or releases that
occur during rail transport. The plan adopted under this subsection:
(a) Shall address with a specific focus on oil or hazardous  material spills or releases that occur
during rail transport all required provisions under ORS 453.374;
(b) May include requirements and incentives for local governments and other  responders to
participate in ongoing training programs;
(c) Shall  provide a system for identifying where hazardous material response resources owned
by railroads are located  throughout this state and how access to those resources is to be coordi-
nated;
(d) Shall include a recurring, three-year training cycle of statewide training exercises that:
(A) Commences with a triennial tabletop exercise that includes the Department of  Environ-
mental Quality, the  Department of Transportation, the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency
Management, state and  local responders, federally recognized Indian tribes in this state and rail-
roads that operate in this state;
(B) Includes, in the second year of the training cycle, a triennial statewide functional  exercise
to test and evaluate response capabilities, functional groups, plans, incident  command staff and
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 50
emergency operations centers in their abilities to respond to an oil  or a hazardous material spill or
release that occurs during rail transport; and
(C) Includes provisions for the planning,  preparation and implementation, in the third year of
the training cycle, of a triennial full-scale, multiagency, multijurisdictional and multidisciplinary  oil
or hazardous material spill or release training exercise that:
(i) Involves training for all manner of personnel necessary for  a coordinated response to an oil
or a hazardous material spill or release;
(ii) Is intended to examine or validate  the planning, coordination and command and control de-
cisions that may be made in the event of an oil or hazardous material spill or  release and to also
examine or validate response-specific capabilities or functions; and
(iii) Involves training that covers the entire sequence  of events that take place during an oil
or hazardous material spill or release incident that occurs during rail transport; and
(e) Shall include any other information deemed necessary by the [ office] Department  of the
State Fire Marshal to provide coordinated response to  oil or hazardous material spills or releases
that occur during rail transport.
(2) The [ office of the  State Fire Marshal ] department shall annually coordinate with local gov-
ernments, other state agencies involved in  hazardous material emergency response, other responders
and representatives of the railroad industry to prepare a report on the coordinated  response plan
adopted under this section and shall:
(a) Make the report  available as an appendix to the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency
Management’s oil  and hazardous material response emergency operations plan developed pursuant
to ORS 401.092; and
(b) No later than February 1 of each year, submit  the report to the Legislative Assembly in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245.
(3) The report required by subsection (2) of this section shall  include, but need not be limited
to, the following in relation to oil and hazardous material emergency response for rail transport:
(a) An inventory of all emergency response resources available in this  state, including informa-
tion on:
(A) The location of, and the means of access to, the resources;
(B) Whether the resources are publicly or privately maintained; and
(C) Additional resources that are needed to provide for adequate response;
(b) Suggested changes to the structure for  the continued coordination between state agencies
and industry;
(c) Possible revisions  to the response roles or responsibilities of state agencies, local govern-
ments and railroads; and
(d) Strategies for ensuring adequate funding at  the state and local government levels to cover
the training, equipment and administrative costs  associated with providing comprehensive response
and equipment.
SECTION 116.
 ORS 453.394 is amended to read:
453.394. (1) The Oil and Hazardous Material  Transportation by Rail Action Fund is established
in the State Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. The Oil and Hazardous Material
Transportation by Rail Action  Fund shall consist of all moneys placed in the fund as provided by
law and any gifts, grants, donations, endowments  or bequests from any public or private source.
Interest earned by the fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to [ the Department of State Police for
use by  the office ] the Department  of the State Fire Marshal only for the payment of costs associ-
ated with the development and effective implementation of the  plan adopted under ORS 453.392 for
the coordinated response to oil or hazardous material spills or releases that occur  during rail
transport.
SECTION 117. ORS 453.520 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 51
453.520. (1) The Governor shall designate the [ office] Department  of the State  Fire Marshal as
the state emergency response commission as required by the Emergency  Planning and Community
Right-to-Know Act of 1986 (42 U.S.C. 11001 et seq.).
(2) The [ office] department shall:
(a) Provide, in a timely manner, advice to a state agency that is required to  consult with the
[office] department about programs that involve hazardous materials or hazardous substances; and
(b) Undertake all  duties of a state emergency response commission required by the Emergency
Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act  of 1986 (42 U.S.C. 11001 et seq.) including but not lim-
ited to:
(A) Designating emergency planning districts;
(B) Establishing local emergency planning committees within emergency planning  districts and
appointing members to the local emergency planning committees; and
(C) Providing comments on local emergency plans.
SECTION 118.
 ORS 453.825 is amended to read:
453.825. (1) The Department of Transportation shall coordinate development of a  single plan and
procedure for the regulation  of the transportation of hazardous material and waste and radioactive
material and waste in Oregon.
(2) In developing the plan under subsection (1) of this section, the  Department of Transportation
shall cooperate with the [ office] Department  of the State Fire Marshal.
(3) As used in this section, “hazardous waste” has the meaning  given that term in ORS 466.005.
SECTION 119. ORS 466.620 is amended to read:
466.620. In  accordance with the applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183, the Environmental
Quality Commission shall  adopt an oil and hazardous material emergency response master plan
consistent with the plan adopted by the Department of Transportation under ORS 453.825  and
453.835, and after consultation with  the [ office] Department  of the State Fire Marshal, the Oregon
State Police, the Oregon Fire Chiefs Association and any other appropriate  agency or organization.
SECTION 120. ORS 468B.365 is amended to read:
468B.365. (1) The Department of Environmental Quality  shall approve a contingency plan re-
quired under ORS 468B.345 only if  it determines that the plan meets the requirements of ORS
468B.345 to 468B.360 and:
(a) The covered vessel or facility demonstrates evidence of compliance with ORS 468B.390; and
(b) If implemented, the plan is capable,  to the maximum extent practicable in terms of personnel,
materials and equipment, of removing oil promptly and  properly and minimizing any damage to the
environment.
(2) An owner or operator of a covered vessel or facility shall notify the department in writing
immediately of any significant change affecting the contingency plan, including  changes in any fac-
tor set forth in this section or in rules  adopted by the Environmental Quality Commission. The de-
partment may require the owner or operator to update a  contingency plan as a result of these
changes.
(3) A holder of an approved contingency plan does not violate the terms of  the contingency plan
by furnishing to another plan holder, after  notifying the department, equipment, materials or per-
sonnel to assist the other plan holder  in a response to an oil discharge. The plan holder shall re-
place or return the transferred equipment, materials and personnel as soon as feasible.
(4) The department may  attach any reasonable term or condition to its approval or modification
of a contingency plan that the department determines is necessary to insure that the applicant:
(a) Has access to  sufficient resources to protect environmentally sensitive areas and to prevent,
contain, clean up and mitigate potential oil discharges from the facility or tank vessel;
(b) Maintains personnel levels sufficient to carry out emergency operations; and
(c) Complies with the contingency plan.
(5) The contingency plan must provide  for the use by the applicant of the best technology
available at the time the contingency plan was submitted or renewed.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 52
(6) The department may require an applicant or a holder  of an approved contingency plan to
take steps necessary to demonstrate its ability to carry out the contingency plan, including:
(a) Periodic training;
(b) Response team exercises; and
(c) Verification of access to inventories of equipment, supplies and personnel identified  as
available in the approved contingency plan.
(7) The department may consider evidence that  oil discharge prevention measures such as dou-
ble hulls or double  bottoms on vessels or barges, secondary containment systems, hydrostatic test-
ing, enhanced vessel traffic systems or enhanced  crew or staffing levels have been implemented and
in its discretion, may make exceptions to the requirements of this section  to reflect the reduced risk
of oil discharges from the facility or tank vessel for which the plan is submitted or being modified.
(8) Before the department approves or modifies a contingency plan required under ORS
468B.345, the department shall provide a copy  of the contingency plan to the State Department of
Fish and Wildlife, the [ office] Department  of the  State Fire Marshal and the Department of Land
Conservation and Development for review. The agencies  shall review the plan according to proce-
dures and time limits established by rule of the Environmental Quality Commission.
(9) Upon approval of a contingency plan, the Department of Environmental Quality shall issue
to the plan holder a certificate stating that  the plan has been approved. The certificate shall include
the name of the facility or tank vessel for which the certificate is issued, the effective date of the
plan and the date by which the plan must be submitted for renewal.
(10) The approval of a contingency plan by the department does not constitute an  express as-
surance regarding the adequacy of the  plan or constitute a defense to liability imposed under ORS
chapters 468, 468A and 468B or any other state law.
SECTION 121.
 ORS 468B.431 is amended to read:
468B.431. (1)  The Department of Environmental Quality shall review a contingency plan for a
high hazard train route submitted under ORS 468B.427  and shall approve the contingency plan if the
plan:
(a) Meets the requirements of ORS 468B.429; and
(b) If implemented, is capable, to the maximum extent practicable  in terms of personnel, mate-
rials and equipment, of removing oil promptly and  properly and minimizing any damage to the en-
vironment.
(2) A railroad that owns or operates a high hazard train route shall notify the department  in
writing promptly of any significant change affecting the contingency plan,  including changes in any
factor set forth in this section. The department may require the railroad to update a  contingency
plan as a result of these changes.
(3) The contingency plan must provide for the use by the  applicant of the best technology
available at the time the contingency plan was submitted or renewed. For purposes of this sub-
section, the technology that provides the greatest degree of protection, taking  into consideration
processes that are currently in use  anywhere in the world, shall be considered the best technology
available. In determining  what is the best technology available, the department shall consider the
effectiveness, engineering feasibility, technological achievability and cost of the technology.
(4)(a) Before the department approves a  contingency plan required under ORS 468B.427, the
department shall provide a  copy of the contingency plan to the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife, the [ office] Department  of the State Fire  Marshal and the Department of Land Conserva-
tion and Development for review.
(b) In addition to providing copies to the agencies listed  in paragraph (a) of this subsection,
before approving or modifying a contingency plan  for a high hazard train route, the Department of
Environmental Quality shall provide a copy of the contingency plan to each federally recognized
Indian tribe that owns land or  enjoys treaty-reserved hunting, fishing or gathering rights that could
be impacted by an oil discharge along any portion of the high hazard train route.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 53
(c) The agencies and tribes that receive copies of a contingency plan  under this subsection shall
review the contingency plan according  to procedures and time limits established by rule of the En-
vironmental Quality Commission.
(5) Upon approval of a contingency plan, the department shall issue to the plan holder a certif-
icate stating that the contingency plan has been approved. The certificate shall include the name
of the high hazard  train route for which the certificate is issued, the effective date of the contin-
gency plan and the date by which the contingency plan must be submitted for renewal.
(6) The approval of a contingency plan by the department does not constitute an express  as-
surance regarding the adequacy of the contingency plan or constitute  a defense to liability imposed
under ORS chapters 468, 468A and 468B or any other state law.
SECTION 122.
 ORS 476.030 is amended to read:
476.030. (1) The State Fire Marshal shall enforce all statutes, and make rules relating to:
(a) The prevention of fires.
(b) The storage and use of combustibles and explosives.
(c) The maintenance and regulation of structural fire safety  features in occupied structures and
overseeing the safety of and directing the  means and adequacy of exit in case of fire from factories,
asylums, hospitals, churches, schools, halls,  theaters, amphitheaters, all buildings, except private
residences, which are occupied  for sleeping purposes, and all other places where large numbers of
persons work, live or congregate from time to  time for any purpose except that structural changes
shall not be required  in buildings built, occupied and maintained in conformity with state building
code regulations applicable at the time of construction.
(d) Standards for equipment  used for fire protection purposes within this state including stand-
ard thread for fire hose couplings and hydrant fittings.
(2) The State Fire Marshal and deputies  shall have such powers and perform such other duties
as are prescribed by law.
(3) If, in the opinion of the State Fire Marshal, a governmental subdivision of  the state has en-
acted adequate regulations generally  conforming to state and national standards concerning fire
prevention, fire safety  measures and building construction requirements for safety, and if the gov-
ernmental subdivision provides reasonable enforcement  of its regulations, the State Fire Marshal
may exempt the area  subject to such regulation either partially or fully from the statutes, rules and
regulations administered by the State Fire Marshal. Prior to adoption of any such exemption,  the
State Fire Marshal may request from  the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training con-
sideration of and recommendations regarding the exemption. The exemption may extend for  a two-
year period, and may be renewed from  time to time, but may be canceled by the State Fire Marshal
following 30 days’  written notice if the State Fire Marshal finds that the governmental subdivision’s
regulations or enforcement thereof are not reasonably sufficient.  The governmental subdivision shall
furnish a copy of such regulations to  the State Fire Marshal and shall file with the State Fire
Marshal any amendment  thereto within 30 days before the effective date of such amendment. The
State Fire Marshal shall designate a person or division within such  governmental subdivision as an
approved authority for exercising functions relating to fire prevention,  fire safety measures and
building construction. Upon request of a local  official having enforcement responsibility and a
showing of unusual fire hazard or other special circumstances, the State  Fire Marshal shall make
investigation and appropriate recommendations.
(4) The State Fire Marshal may investigate or cause an investigation to be made to determine
the probable cause, origin and circumstances of any fire and  shall classify such findings as the State
Fire Marshal may find appropriate to promote fire protection and prevention.
(5) The State Fire Marshal shall provide training in fire safety inspection to the Department of
Human Services, area agencies, the Oregon Health Authority,  community mental health programs,
developmental disabilities programs and  designees of the Long Term Care Ombudsman and the
Residential Facilities Ombudsman. If an adult foster home has been  inspected by the Department
of Human Services, the Oregon  Health Authority, an area agency, a community mental health pro-
gram or a developmental disabilities program and the  agency conducting the inspection reasonably
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 54
believes that the adult foster home is not in compliance with applicable fire safety rules,  the agency
conducting the inspection may request the State Fire  Marshal to inspect or cause an inspection to
be made. If a designee of the Long Term Care Ombudsman or the  Residential Facilities Ombudsman,
in the course of visiting an adult foster home, believes  that the adult foster home is not in compli-
ance with  applicable fire safety rules, the designee shall report the problem to the appropriate
agency to request a fire safety inspection by [ the office of ] the State Fire Marshal or by a designated
representative of the [ office of the ] State Fire Marshal.
(6) Upon the request of the  Department of Human Services, the Oregon Health Authority, an
area agency, a  community mental health program or a developmental disabilities program, the State
Fire Marshal shall inspect or cause an inspection to be made to determine if the adult  foster home
is in compliance with rules jointly adopted by the Department of Human  Services and the State Fire
Marshal establishing fire safety standards for adult foster homes.
(7) As used in subsections (5) and (6) of this section:
(a) “Adult foster home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.705.
(b) “Area agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 410.040.
(c) “Community mental health program” means a program established under ORS 430.620 (1)(b).
(d) “Developmental disabilities program” means  a program established under ORS 430.620 (1)(a).
SECTION 123.
 ORS 476.050 is amended to read:
476.050. The salary of the chief deputy state fire marshal, deputy state  fire marshals, compen-
sation of clerks and other assistants and other expenses of the [ office of ] Department of  the  State
Fire Marshal necessary in the performance of the  duties imposed upon the State Fire Marshal shall
be paid in the same manner as are  other state officers and the expenses of other state departments,
and shall not exceed the  amount paid to the State Treasurer for the maintenance of the [ office of ]
Department of the  State Fire Marshal.
SECTION 124. ORS 476.055 is amended to read:
476.055. (1) All moneys received by the Department of the  State  Fire Marshal shall be paid
into the State Treasury, and shall be placed by the State Treasurer to the credit  of the State Fire
Marshal Fund, except those  moneys received and accounted for under the provisions of ORS
279A.290.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by this section, moneys in the State Fire Marshal Fund  shall
be available and constitute a continuing appropriation for the payment of any expense of the  [State
Fire Marshal ] department  and for the payment of expenses of the Department of Public  Safety
Standards and Training and the Board on Public Safety Standards  and Training relating to training
programs concerning fire services and accreditation of fire service professionals. The Department
of the State Fire Marshal  shall keep on file an itemized statement of all expenses incurred by the
[State Fire  Marshal ] department  and shall approve all disbursements as submitted for payment.
Administrative expenditures made from the State Fire  Marshal Fund shall not exceed a reasonable
amount for the services performed.
SECTION 125. ORS 476.090 is amended to read:
476.090. (1) The Department of the  State Fire Marshal shall keep a record of all fires occurring
in this state  and of all facts concerning the same, including statistics as to the extent of such fires
and the damage caused, whether such losses were covered by insurance, and if so, in  what amount.
All such records shall  be public, except any testimony, information or other evidence taken in an
investigation under ORS 476.010 to 476.090, 476.155 to 476.170, 476.210 to 476.270 and 479.180,  which
shall be considered investigatory information as described in ORS 192.345.
(2) This section shall not apply to forestlands under the jurisdiction of the State Forester.
SECTION 126.
 ORS 476.130 is amended to read:
476.130. (1) The State Fire  Marshal may from time to time cause to be prepared statistical re-
ports on the history  and condition of state fire defenses, and an analysis of contributing factors of
fire causes for the period of the report.  Such reports may be printed at the expense of the [ office]
Department of the State Fire Marshal and sold at a price not to exceed cost  of printing and dis-
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 55
tribution. Receipts from the sale of such material shall  be deposited with the State Treasurer and
shall be placed in the State Fire Marshal Fund.
(2) The State Fire Marshal may  fix a sale price for each copy of any publication of the [ office
of the State Fire Marshal ] department  supplied to private persons interested therein, when such
publication has been approved as provided by law.
SECTION 127. ORS 476.210 is amended to read:
476.210. (1) The municipal  fire marshals, fire department chiefs, constables and other officers
referred to in ORS 476.060 shall investigate the cause, origin and circumstances of each  fire occur-
ring in  their respective cities, villages or townships, by which property has been destroyed or dam-
aged, and shall make an  investigation to determine whether the fire was the result of carelessness
or design. The investigation shall  be commenced immediately after the occurrence of the fire. The
State Fire Marshal may superintend and direct the investigation if the State Fire Marshal  deems it
necessary.
(2) The fire chief of every city, or rural fire protection district shall provide the State Fire
Marshal with a full report of every fire occurring within the jurisdiction of  the fire chief on a form
provided by the Department of the  State Fire Marshal  or approved by the State Fire Marshal.
Whenever the fire chief of every city under 200,000  population finds any fire is of undetermined or
suspicious origin or involves a  death or serious injury, the fire chief shall immediately notify the
State Fire Marshal or a deputy state fire  marshal and shall assemble all known facts and circum-
stances concerning the  fire in an approved report form and shall submit such report to the State
Fire Marshal, or the deputy state fire marshal assigned to the territory in which the fire  originated.
When evidence clearly indicates the  cause of fire to be of incendiary origin, the fire chief shall also
immediately notify the state, county or municipal police agency.
(3) This section shall not apply to forestlands under the jurisdiction of the State Forester.
SECTION 128.
 ORS 476.220 is amended to read:
476.220. (1) The officer  making an investigation of a fire occurring in a city, village or township
shall forthwith notify the State Fire Marshal and, within  one week of the occurrence of the fire,
shall furnish the State Fire Marshal a written statement of all facts relating to its cause and  origin,
and such other information as is required by  forms provided by the Department of  the State Fire
Marshal.
(2) This section shall not apply to forestland under the jurisdiction of the State Forester.
SECTION 129.
 ORS 476.270 is amended to read:
476.270. (1) If an  insurance company has reason to believe that a fire loss to its assured’s real
or personal property was caused by incendiary means, the company  shall immediately make a report
to the [ office] Department  of the State Fire Marshal. The report shall indicate the name of the as-
sured, the date of  the fire, location, occupancy, and facts and circumstances coming to the
company’s knowledge, tending to establish the cause or origin of the fire.
(2) Any federal, state or local public official or authorized  agent thereof having legal authority
to investigate a fire loss of real or personal  property may request any insurance company to provide
relevant information in its possession pertaining to that loss.  Upon request, the company shall re-
lease such information to the official who requests it. For purposes of this subsection, “relevant  in-
formation”  means  information having any tendency to make the existence of any fact that is of
consequence to the investigation more probable or less probable.
(3) In the absence of fraud or malice, no insurance company or its authorized  representative
shall be liable for damages in a civil action or subject to  criminal prosecution for the release of
information required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
SECTION 130. ORS 476.290 is amended to read:
476.290. Whenever a fire is  extinguished pursuant to ORS 476.280, the governing body of the city
or the district board of the rural fire protection district that provided the  fire suppression service
may, on forms furnished by the Department of the  State Fire Marshal for such purposes,  bill the
owner of the  property involved in the fire for the cost of providing the fire suppression service. The
governing body of the city or the district board  of the rural fire protection district that provided the
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 56
fire suppression service  may determine the cost of providing the fire suppression service by use of
a state standardized-costs  schedule as approved by the State Fire Marshal. The cost charged for
providing the fire  suppression service may not be greater than the pro rata cost that would have
been charged by the city or district  for the performance by the city or district of a similar fire
suppression service within its jurisdiction. If the cost is not paid within 30  days after the second
billing, the governing body of the city or the district board of the rural fire protection district  that
provided the fire suppression service may bring an action for  the recovery of the unpaid cost from
the owner of the real property upon which the fire suppression service was rendered.
SECTION 131. ORS 476.680 is amended to read:
476.680. (1) There  is created the Governor’s Fire Service Policy Council. The council shall in-
clude the following nonvoting ex officio members:
(a) The Superintendent of State Police[ , or a designee thereof experienced in the oversight of De-
partment of State Police activities relating to the office of the State Fire Marshal ]; and
(b) The  Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training, or a designee
thereof.
(2) The State Fire Marshal shall serve as executive director of the council, but  is not a member.
The council shall meet at least  quarterly. The council shall select a chairperson and vice chair-
person at the first council meeting of each odd-numbered year.  The council may elect additional
officers as the council determines to be reasonable and necessary.
(3) In addition to the ex officio members  identified in subsection (1) of this section, the Governor
may designate a representative of the Governor to serve as a nonvoting member.  The Governor may
also appoint not more than nine members to serve  on the council for three-year terms. Initial terms
of the appointed members may be adjusted to promote council  stability. An appointed member may
not serve more than  two consecutive terms. A member appointed by the Governor must be a rep-
resentative of one of the following:
(a) The Oregon Fire Chiefs Association or a successor or other organization representing  fire
chiefs.
(b) The Oregon Fire District Directors  Association or a successor or other organization re-
presenting fire district directors.
(c) The Oregon Fire Marshals Association or a successor  or other organization representing fire
marshals.
(d) Property and casualty insurance providers.
(e) Employees of the [ office] Department  of the State Fire Marshal.
(f) The Oregon State Fire Fighters Council or a  successor or other organization representing
professional firefighters.
(g) The Oregon Volunteer Firefighters Association or a  successor or other organization repres-
enting volunteer firefighters.
(h) The League of Oregon Cities or a  successor or other organization representing munici-
palities.
(i) The general public.
(4) Notwithstanding the term of office specified in subsection (3)  of this section, the initial term
of a member appointed by the Governor may be adjusted to limit the number of member terms  ex-
piring in the same year.
(5) To the extent funding is available  from moneys appropriated to the [ office] Department  of
the State Fire Marshal, a member of  the council is entitled to compensation and expenses as pro-
vided in ORS 292.495.
(6) The council shall advise  the Governor and the Superintendent of State Police on fire policy
issues and serve in an advisory capacity to  the State Fire Marshal on strategies for the implemen-
tation of fire and life safety issues. The council may initiate advice to the State Fire Marshal,  the
Superintendent of State Police  and the Governor on any matter related to the mission of the council.
The council may not participate in the discussion of traditional labor relations issues.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 57
(7) The [ office] Department of the State Fire  Marshal shall provide staff services to the council.
All agencies, departments and officers of this state are directed to assist the council  in the per-
formance of its functions and to furnish information and advice as the council considers necessary.
SECTION 132. ORS 476.685 is amended to read:
476.685. The Governor’s  Fire Service Policy Council shall provide a biennial report to the Gov-
ernor [ and the Superintendent  of State Police ] on the overall performance of the [ office] Department
of the State Fire Marshal. The report shall identify significant successes and improvement  opportu-
nities.
SECTION 133. ORS 476.735 is amended to read:
476.735. (1) As used in this section, “sky  lantern” means an unmanned self-contained luminary
device that uses heated air produced by an open flame or produced by another source  to become
or remain airborne.
(2) A person may not release a sky lantern into the airspace of this state.
(3) Violation of this section is a Class A violation.
(4) In addition to any enforcement officer specifically identified in ORS 153.005, a citation for
a violation of this section may be issued by:
(a) The State Fire Marshal, employees of the [ office] Department  of the State Fire Marshal or
assistants to the State Fire Marshal as described in ORS 476.040 or 476.060;
(b) The Director of  the Oregon Department of Aviation or employees specifically designated by
the director under ORS 837.100 to enforce violations;
(c) The State Forester or the State Forestry Department,  or any employee specifically desig-
nated by the State Forester or the department under ORS 477.985 to enforce violations; or
(d) The State Parks and Recreation Director  or any State Parks and Recreation Department
employee specifically designated by the director under ORS 390.050 to enforce violations.
SECTION 134.
 ORS 476.765 is amended to read:
476.765. (1) The State Fire Marshal shall impose civil penalties under ORS 476.995 in the manner
provided by ORS 183.745.
(2) The Attorney General may bring an action at the request of the  [ office] Department  of the
State Fire Marshal, in the name of the state, seeking:
(a) Injunctive relief to prevent or end a violation of ORS 476.760;
(b) To recover civil penalties imposed under ORS 476.995; or
(c) To recover attorney fees and other enforcement costs and disbursements.
SECTION 135.
 ORS 476.806 is amended to read:
476.806. (1) The Cigarette Fire Safety Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate  and
distinct from the General Fund. The Cigarette Fire Safety Fund shall consist of all moneys recov-
ered from the imposition of civil penalties under  ORS 476.995. Interest earned by the Cigarette Fire
Safety Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to [ the Department of State Police for
use by the office ] the Department  of the State Fire Marshal for fire safety, enforcement and  fire
prevention programs.
SECTION 136. ORS 476.925 is amended to read:
476.925. The Fire Protection Equipment Loan Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund.  All moneys in the Fire Protection Equipment Loan  Fund are
continuously appropriated [ continuously] to the  Department of the  State  Fire Marshal to carry
out the provisions of ORS 476.900  to 476.925. Interest earned by moneys in the fund shall be credited
to the fund.
SECTION 137. ORS 478.270 is amended to read:
478.270. (1) The district board shall report monthly to the State Fire Marshal, upon forms pre-
scribed by the State Fire Marshal,  information the State Fire Marshal may require, and shall, at any
time, upon request furnish further report or information required by the State Fire Marshal.
(2) The State Fire Marshal  shall cooperate in the formation, operation and administration of
districts. The Department of the  State Fire Marshal shall prepare and make available uniform
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 58
forms for reports required by this section and other uniform forms and blanks the State Fire Mar-
shal considers advisable.
SECTION 138.
 ORS 478.940 is amended to read:
478.940. Copies of the fire prevention code shall be filed with the [ State Fire Marshal’s  office ]
Department of the State Fire Marshal  and a copy shall be posted at each fire  station within the
district.
SECTION 139. ORS 479.180 is amended to read:
479.180. (1) If the owner, lessee,  agent or occupant is aggrieved by the order of an officer under
the provisions of ORS 476.030,  479.170, 479.210 to 479.220, 480.123 to 480.160, 480.330, 480.340,
480.420 to 480.434 or 480.450 and desires  a hearing, the person may complain or appeal in writing
to the State Fire Marshal within 10 days from  the service of the order. The complaint or appeal
shall set forth the specific grounds of  the complaint or appeal and no other ground shall be con-
sidered thereafter. The complaint or appeal shall be accompanied by a fee of $40 payable  to the
State Fire Marshal, and  the State Fire Marshal may refer the complaint or appeal to the regional
appeal advisory board established for that region by notifying the chairperson of  that board and
sending a copy of the notice to the complainant  or appellant. The board shall fix a time for hearing
and notify the complainant or appellant of the time and place thereof, which shall be within 10  days
after such referral by the State Fire  Marshal. If the State Fire Marshal does not refer the matter
to a regional  appeal advisory board, the State Fire Marshal shall fix a time and place, not less than
five and not more than 10 days thereafter, when and where the complaint or  appeal will be heard
by the State Fire Marshal. Within 10 days after receiving a recommendation from the regional ap-
peal advisory board, or if no referral was made to such board, within 10  days after the hearing be-
fore the State Fire Marshal, the State Fire Marshal may affirm, modify, revoke or vacate the  order
complained of or appealed from. Unless the order is modified, revoked or vacated by the State Fire
Marshal, it shall remain in force  and be complied with by the owner, lessee, agent or occupant, and
within the time fixed in the order or fixed by the State Fire Marshal. If the State Fire Marshal va-
cates or revokes the order complained of or appealed from, or modified it in any  particular other
than extending time for  compliance, the fee paid with the complaint or appeal shall be refunded.
Otherwise, it shall be credited to appropriate state funds, and the State Fire Marshal shall so  notify
the State Treasurer.
(2) If the complainant or appellant under subsection (1) of this section is aggrieved by the final
order of the State Fire Marshal, and if such order necessitates the  expenditure of money or involves
statutory interpretation, the complainant or appellant may, within 10 days thereafter, appeal to the
circuit court of the county in which the property is situated, notifying the State  Fire Marshal of the
appeal within 10 days thereafter, which notice shall be  in writing and delivered personally or by
registered letter to the marshal, or left at the principal office of  the  Department of the  State Fire
Marshal at the state capital. The party so appealing shall, within two days after filing the  appeal,
file with the circuit court in which appeal is made a bond in an amount to  be fixed by the court or
judge, but in no case less than $100, with two sufficient sureties possessing  the qualification of bail
on arrest, the bond to be  approved by the court and conditioned to pay all the costs on the appeal
in case the appellant fails to sustain it or it is dismissed for any cause. In the case of  an appeal
involving an order under ORS 479.170, the circuit court shall hear and determine  the appeal within
10 days after the date of filing the same.
(3) The State Fire Marshal  shall make or have made a certified summary of the proceedings at
the hearing before the regional appeal advisory board or before the State Fire Marshal, and together
with all the evidentiary matter filed [ in the office of the State Fire Marshal ] with the department
or presented to the regional appeal advisory board, transmit them to the circuit court at least three
days prior to the date fixed by the court for hearing when it shall be tried de novo.
SECTION 140.
 ORS 480.230 is amended to read:
480.230. A person desiring a certificate of possession shall apply on  application forms provided
by the [ office] Department of the State Fire Marshal. The forms shall be completed  in full and shall
include:
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 59
(1) The applicant’s legal name, current address and current telephone number;
(2) The applicant’s date of birth;
(3) A statement by the applicant that the applicant is  eligible for a certificate of possession
under ORS 480.225;
(4) The number of the certificate of registration issued under ORS 480.244 for the  explosives
magazine where the applicant intends to store the explosives;
(5) Any other information that the issuing authority may require to readily identify the  appli-
cant;
(6) A certification, signed and dated by the applicant, that the information contained  in the ap-
plication is true; and
(7) A nonrefundable application fee of $50 for a three-year certificate.
SECTION 141.
 ORS 480.450 is amended to read:
480.450. (1) The installer shall notify the State Fire Marshal,  before the last day of each month,
of all new installations made during the preceding month of containers or  receptacles for liquefied
petroleum gas, including installations for private homes and apartments. The installer shall  certify
on a form provided by the State Fire Marshal that all of the new installations  are duly and properly
reported. The State Fire  Marshal may require that the notification include the location and de-
scription of the installation  and the name of the user. All fees due and payable must accompany the
notification. The replacement of empty containers or  receptacles with other containers constructed
in accordance with United States Department of  Transportation specifications is not a new instal-
lation or change in the original installation  that requires notification to the State Fire Marshal or
necessitates further inspection  of the installation. The State Fire Marshal shall collect from the in-
staller an installation fee of $50 for each tank installed or for all tanks at the installation if the total
combined capacity is 200 gallons or less. The State Fire Marshal or deputies of the fire  marshal or
assistants shall inspect a reasonable number of the installations  and maintain a record of the in-
spections in the [ office] records of the Department of the State Fire Marshal.
(2) In addition to any installation or inspection fee, the State Fire Marshal may charge a plan
review fee, not to exceed $100, for any liquefied petroleum gas container and  receptacle plan review
required under a uniform fire code prescribed by the State Fire Marshal by rule.
(3) After  the initial installation, liquefied petroleum gas containers may be inspected once every
10 years except when changes have been made  in the original installation. An installer making
changes must notify the State Fire Marshal of the changes in the same manner  provided in this
section for new installations. The State Fire Marshal shall collect from the owner a fee of $50 for
the inspection of each container. The manner of inspection, requirement of corrections,  satisfaction
of requirements and collection of fees due and payable must conform with  the provisions of ORS
480.410 to 480.460 for new installations. Upon request of the State Fire Marshal, LP gas installation
licensees shall furnish a list of the locations of 10-year old installations that they service.
(4) If, upon inspection of any tank, the new installation  does not comply with the requirements
of the State Fire Marshal, the  State Fire Marshal shall instruct the installer as to what corrections
are necessary for compliance with the State Fire Marshal’s requirements. The installer of the  new
installation shall, within the time set by the State Fire Marshal, not to  exceed 60 days after notifi-
cation, notify the State Fire Marshal  that the new installation complies with the requirements of the
fire marshal. If the installer fails to notify the State Fire Marshal, or the State Fire  Marshal has
reason to believe that the corrections have not been made, the  State Fire Marshal shall reinspect
the new installation and shall collect from the installer an additional fee of $125. The user, not  the
installer, shall pay the additional fee resulting from actions of the  user that require correction to
achieve compliance with the requirements of the State Fire Marshal.
(5) A person who  receives notice from the State Fire Marshal must correct any improper in-
stallation within the time set by the State Fire  Marshal, not to exceed 60 days after receipt of the
notice.
(6) If the fees provided for in this section are due and payable and are not  paid within 30 days
after service of written notice by the State Fire Marshal therefor, or if  the installer fails to notify
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 60
the State Fire Marshal by the last day of the month succeeding the month a new installation is made
or a change is made requiring an inspection, the fees are delinquent and a penalty  equal to the
greater of 10 percent of the fee amount or $30,  is imposed for the delinquency. The State Fire
Marshal shall collect all fees and penalties in the name of the State of Oregon in the same  manner
that other debts are collected.
(7) The provisions of this section do not  apply to liquefied petroleum gas installations if made
entirely within the jurisdiction of a governmental subdivision granted the  exemption provided by
ORS 476.030 (3) and written evidence of the licensing of  the installation by the approved authority
is submitted to the State Fire Marshal. The provisions of this section do  not apply to LP gas in-
stallations made in  manufactured dwellings that are constructed or altered in accordance with ap-
plicable rules of the Department of Consumer and Business Services. The provisions  of this section
do not apply to LP gas installations in a recreational vehicle as defined in ORS 174.101.
SECTION 142.
 ORS 480.460 is amended to read:
480.460. All fees received by the State Fire Marshal under ORS 480.200 to 480.290 and 480.410
to 480.460 shall be paid by the  State  Fire Marshal to the State Treasurer monthly and shall con-
stitute and be an appropriation to the Department of the State Fire  Marshal  available for the
payment of salaries and expenses  of deputies and clerical and other assistants of the State Fire
Marshal.
SECTION 143. ORS 657.665 is amended to read:
657.665. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) to (5)  of this section, all information in the
records of the Employment Department pertaining to the administration of  the unemployment in-
surance, employment service and workforce and labor market information programs:
(a) Is  confidential and for the exclusive use and information of the Director of the Employment
Department in administering the unemployment insurance, employment service and  workforce and
labor market information programs in Oregon.
(b) May not be used in  any court action or in any proceeding pending in the court unless the
director or the state is a party to the action or proceeding or  unless the proceeding concerns the
establishment, enforcement or modification  of a support obligation and support services are being
provided by the Division of Child Support or the district attorney pursuant to ORS 25.080.
(c) Is exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(2) The Employment Department shall disclose information:
(a) To any claimant or legal representative, at a hearing before an administrative law  judge, to
the extent necessary for the proper presentation of an unemployment insurance claim.
(b) Upon request to the United States Secretary  of Labor. The Employment Department shall
disclose the information in a form and containing  the information that the United States Secretary
of Labor may require. The information  disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any other
purpose.
(c) Pursuant  to section 303(a)(7) of the Social Security Act, upon request to any agency of the
United States charged with the administration of public works or assistance  through public em-
ployment. Under this paragraph, the Employment Department  shall disclose the name, address, or-
dinary occupation and employment status of each recipient  of unemployment insurance benefits and
a statement of the recipient’s  right to further benefits under this chapter. The information disclosed
is confidential and may not be used for any other purpose.
(d) Pursuant to section 303(c)(1) of the Social Security  Act, to the Railroad Retirement Board.
Under this paragraph, the Employment  Department shall disclose unemployment insurance records.
The information disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any other  purpose. The costs of
disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid by the board.
(e) Pursuant to section 303(d) of the Social Security Act, upon request to officers and employees
of the United States Department of Agriculture  and to officers or employees of any state Supple-
mental Nutrition Assistance Program agency for the purpose of determining an individual’s eligibil-
ity for or the amount of supplemental nutrition assistance.  The information disclosed is confidential
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 61
and may not be used for  any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph
shall be paid by the United States Department of Agriculture.
(f) Pursuant to section 303(e)(1) and (2)(A)(ii) of the Social Security Act, to  state or local child
support enforcement agencies enforcing child support obligations under Title IV-D of the Social  Se-
curity Act for the purposes  of establishing child support obligations, locating individuals owing child
support obligations and collecting  child support obligations from those individuals. The information
disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any  other purpose. The costs of disclosing infor-
mation under this paragraph shall be paid by the child support enforcement agency.
(g) Pursuant to sections 303(f) and 1137  of the Social Security Act, to agencies participating in
the income and eligibility  verification system for the purpose of verifying an individual’s eligibility
for benefits, or  the amount of benefits, under unemployment insurance, temporary assistance for
needy families, Medicaid, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance  Program, Supplemental Security
Income, child  support enforcement or Social Security programs. The information disclosed is confi-
dential and may not be used for any other purpose. The costs  of disclosing information under this
paragraph shall be paid by the requesting agency.
(h) Pursuant to section 303(h) of the Social Security Act and section 3304(a)(16)(B) of the Federal
Unemployment Tax Act, to the United States  Department of Health and Human Services National
Directory of New Hires. The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be used for any other
purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid by  the United States
Department of Health and Human Services.
(i) Pursuant to section 303(i) of the Social  Security Act, to officers and employees of the United
States Department  of Housing and Urban Development and to representatives of a public housing
agency for the purpose of determining an individual’s eligibility for benefits, or  the amount of ben-
efits, under a  housing assistance program of the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development. The information disclosed is confidential  and may not be used for any other purpose.
The costs of disclosing information under  this paragraph shall be paid by the United States De-
partment of Housing and Urban Development or the public housing agency.
(j) Pursuant to regulations of the United States Secretary  of Health and Human Services issued
under section 3304(a)(16)(A) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, and except as required by  sec-
tion 303 of the Social Security Act,  to the state, a political subdivision or a federally recognized
Indian tribe that has signed an agreement with the  Department of Human Services to administer
Part A  of Title IV of the Social Security Act for the purpose of determining an individual’s eligi-
bility for assistance, or the amount of assistance, under a program funded under Part A of Title  IV
of the Social Security Act. The information disclosed is confidential and may not be used for  any
other purpose.
(k) Upon request,  to the United States Attorney’s Office. Under this paragraph, the Employment
Department may disclose an individual’s employment and wage information in response to  a federal
grand jury subpoena or for the purpose of  collecting civil and criminal judgments, including
restitution and special  assessment fees. The information disclosed is confidential and may not be
used for  any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid
by the United States Attorney’s Office.
(3) The Employment Department may disclose information secured from employing units:
(a) To state agencies, federal agencies,  local government agencies, public universities listed in
ORS 352.002 and the Oregon Health and Science University established under ORS  353.020, to the
extent necessary to properly carry out governmental planning, performance measurement, program
analysis, socioeconomic analysis or policy analysis functions  performed under applicable law. The
information disclosed is confidential and may not be disclosed by the agencies or universities in  any
manner that would identify individuals, claimants,  employees or employing units. If the information
disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the  costs
of disclosing the information shall be paid by the agency or university requesting the information.
(b) As part of a geographic information system. Points on a map may be  used to represent eco-
nomic data, including  the location, employment size class and industrial classification of businesses
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 62
in Oregon. Information presented as  part of a geographic information system may not give specific
details regarding a business’s address, actual employment  or proprietary information. If the infor-
mation disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of  the Employment Department,
the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the party requesting the information.
(c) In accordance with ORS 657.673.
(4) The Employment Department may:
(a) Disclose information to public employees in the performance of  their duties under state or
federal laws relating to the payment of unemployment  insurance benefits, the provision of employ-
ment services and the provision of workforce and labor market information.
(b) At the discretion of the Director of the Employment Department and subject to  an intera-
gency agreement, disclose information to public officials in the performance of  their official duties
administering or enforcing laws within their authority and to  the agents or contractors of public
officials. The public  official shall agree to assume responsibility for misuse of the information by
the official’s agent or contractor.
(c) Disclose information  pursuant to an informed consent, received from an employer or claim-
ant, to disclose the information.
(d) Disclose information to partners under the federal Workforce Innovation and  Opportunity
Act for the purpose of administering state workforce  programs under the Act. The information dis-
closed is confidential and may not  be used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information
under this paragraph shall be paid by the requesting partner.
(e) Disclose the names and addresses of employing units to the Bureau  of Labor and Industries
for the purpose of disseminating information to employing  units. The names and addresses disclosed
are confidential and  may not be used for any other purpose. If the information disclosed under this
paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment  Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the bureau.
(f) Disclose information to the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor  and Industries for the
purpose of performing duties under ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870, 658.005  to 658.245 or 658.405 to
658.511 or ORS chapter 652, 653 or 659A. The information  disclosed may include the names and
addresses of employers and  employees and payroll data of employers and employees. The information
disclosed  is  confidential and may not be used for any other purpose. If the information disclosed
under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the  Employment Department, the costs of dis-
closing the information shall be paid by the bureau.
(g) Disclose information required under ORS 657.660 (3) and  (4) to the Public Employees Re-
tirement System for the purpose of determining the eligibility of  members of the retirement system
for disability under ORS  chapters 238 and 238A. The information disclosed is confidential and may
not be used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this  paragraph shall
be paid by the Public Employees Retirement System.
(h) Disclose to the Oregon Business Development Commission and  the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department information required by the  commission and the department in performing their
duties under ORS 285A.050 and 285B.630 to verify changes in employment levels following direct
employer participation in department programs or indirect participation through municipalities  un-
der ORS 285B.410 to 285B.482. The information disclosed to the  commission and the department may
include an employer’s employment level, total  subject wages payroll and whole hours worked. The
information disclosed is confidential and may not be  used for any other purpose. The commission
and the department may not disclose the information in any manner that would identify an employ-
ing unit or employee except to the extent necessary  to carry out the commission’s and the
department’s duties under ORS 285A.050 and 285B.630. If the information disclosed  under this par-
agraph is not prepared  for the use of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the in-
formation shall be paid by the commission or the Oregon Business Development Department.
(i) Disclose information to the Department of Revenue for the purpose of performing its duties
under ORS 293.250 or under the revenue and tax laws  of this state. The information disclosed may
include the names and addresses of employers  and employees and payroll data of employers and
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 63
employees. The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be disclosed by the Department
of Revenue in any  manner that would identify an employing unit or employee except to the extent
necessary to carry out the department’s duties under ORS 293.250 or in auditing or reviewing any
report or return required or permitted to be filed under the revenue and tax laws  administered by
the department. The Department  of Revenue may not disclose any information received to any pri-
vate collection agency or for  any other purpose. If the information disclosed under this paragraph
is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the  information
shall be paid by the Department of Revenue.
(j) Disclose information  to the Department of Consumer and Business Services for the purpose
of performing its duties under ORS chapters 654 and 656. The information disclosed may include the
name, address, number of employees and industrial classification code of an  employer and payroll
data of employers and employees. The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be disclosed
by the Department of Consumer and Business  Services in any manner that would identify an em-
ploying unit or employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the  department’s duties under
ORS chapters  654 and 656, including administrative hearings and court proceedings in which the
Department of Consumer and Business Services is a party. If the information disclosed  under this
paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment  Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(k) Disclose information to the  Construction Contractors Board for the purpose of performing
its duties under ORS chapter 701. The information disclosed  to the board may include the names
and addresses  of employers and status of their compliance with this chapter. If the information dis-
closed under this paragraph is not  prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs
of disclosing the information shall be paid by the board.
(L) Disclose information  to the State Fire Marshal to assist the State Fire Marshal in carrying
out duties under ORS 453.307 to 453.414. The information  disclosed may include the name, address,
telephone number and industrial classification code of an employer. The information  disclosed is
confidential and may not be disclosed by the State Fire Marshal in any manner that would identify
an employing unit except to the extent necessary to carry out duties under  ORS 453.307 to 453.414.
If the information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the  Employment
Department, the costs of  disclosing the information shall be paid by the [ office] Department  of the
State Fire Marshal.
(m) Disclose information to the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission for the purpose of
performing the commission’s duties under ORS chapter 348 and  Title IV of the Higher Education
Act  of  1965. The information disclosed may include the names and addresses of employers and em-
ployees and payroll data of  employers and employees. The information disclosed is confidential and
may not be disclosed by the commission in  any manner that would identify an employing unit or
employee  except  to the extent necessary to carry out the commission’s duties under ORS chapter
348 or Title IV of the Higher Education Act  of 1965. If the information disclosed under this para-
graph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the  costs of disclosing the infor-
mation shall be paid by the commission.
(n) Disclose information to the Department  of Transportation to assist the Department of
Transportation in carrying out the duties of the Department of Transportation relating to collection
of delinquent and liquidated debts, including  taxes, under ORS 184.610 to 184.665, 184.670 to 184.733
and 805.263, ORS chapter 319 and the Oregon Vehicle Code. The information disclosed may  include
the names and addresses of employers and employees and payroll data of employers and  employees.
The information disclosed is confidential and may not be  disclosed by the Department of Transpor-
tation in any manner that would identify an employing unit or employee except to  the extent nec-
essary to carry out  the Department of Transportation’s duties relating to collection of delinquent
and liquidated debts or  in auditing or reviewing any report or return required or permitted to be
filed under the revenue and tax laws  administered by the Department of Transportation. The De-
partment of  Transportation may not disclose any information received to any private collection
agency or for any other purpose. If the information disclosed under  this paragraph is not prepared
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 64
for the use of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the  information shall be paid by
the Department of Transportation.
(o) Disclose information to the Department of Human Services and  the Oregon Health Authority
to assist the Department of  Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority in the collection of
debts that the Department of Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority are  authorized by
law to collect. The information disclosed  may include the names, addresses and payroll data of em-
ployers and employees. The information disclosed is confidential and may  not be disclosed by the
Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority in a manner  that would identify an
employing unit or employee except to the extent necessary for the collection of  debts as described
in this paragraph. The Department of Human Services and the Oregon  Health Authority may not
disclose information received under this paragraph to a private collection agency or use the infor-
mation for a purpose other than the collection of debts as described in this  paragraph. If the infor-
mation disclosed under this  paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department,
the costs of disclosing the information shall  be paid by the Department of Human Services or the
Oregon Health Authority.
(p) Disclose to the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission  information required by the commission
in evaluating and measuring the performance of alcohol and drug  prevention and treatment pro-
grams under ORS 430.223 or the impact of  the programs on employment. The information disclosed
to the commission may include  total subject wages payroll and whole hours worked. The information
disclosed under this paragraph is confidential and may not be used for  any other purpose. The
commission may not disclose the information in any manner that would identify an employing unit
or employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the commission’s duties under  ORS 430.223.
If the  information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment
Department, the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the commission.
(q) Disclose to any person establishment level information  secured pursuant to this chapter from
federal, state and local government agencies, public universities  listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon
Health and Science University established under ORS 353.020. If  the information disclosed under
this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs  of disclosing
the information shall be paid by the person requesting the information.
(r) Disclose to any person the industrial classification code assigned to an  employing unit. If the
information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the  use of the Employment Depart-
ment, the costs of disclosing  the information shall be paid by the person requesting the information.
(5) The Employment Department  may make public all decisions of the Employment Appeals
Board.
(6) Any officer appointed by  or any employee of the Director of the Employment Department
who discloses confidential information, except with the authority of the director, pursuant  to rules
or as  otherwise required by law, may be disqualified from holding any appointment or employment
with the Employment Department.
(7) Any person or  any officer or employee of an entity to whom information is disclosed by the
Employment Department under this section who divulges or uses the information  for any purpose
other than that specified in the provision of law or agreement authorizing the use  or disclosure may
be disqualified from performing any service under contract or disqualified from holding  any ap-
pointment or employment with the state agency  that engaged or employed that person, officer or
employee. The Employment Department may immediately cancel or  modify any information sharing
agreement with an entity  when a person or an officer or employee of that entity discloses confi-
dential information, other than as specified in law or agreement.
SECTION 143a.
 ORS 657.665, as amended by section 68, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019,  is
amended to read:
657.665. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2)  to (5) of this section, all information in the
records of the Employment  Department pertaining to the administration of the unemployment in-
surance, employment service and workforce and labor market information programs:
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 65
(a) Is confidential and for the exclusive use and information of the Director of the  Employment
Department in administering  the unemployment insurance, employment service and workforce and
labor market information programs in Oregon.
(b) May not be used in  any court action or in any proceeding pending in the court unless the
director or the state is a party to the action or proceeding or  unless the proceeding concerns the
establishment, enforcement or modification  of a support obligation and support services are being
provided by the Division of Child Support or the district attorney pursuant to ORS 25.080.
(c) Is exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(2) The Employment Department shall disclose information:
(a) To any claimant or legal representative, at a hearing before an administrative law  judge, to
the extent necessary for the proper presentation of an unemployment insurance claim.
(b) Upon request to the United States Secretary  of Labor. The Employment Department shall
disclose the information in a form and containing  the information that the United States Secretary
of Labor may require. The information  disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any other
purpose.
(c) Pursuant  to section 303(a)(7) of the Social Security Act, upon request to any agency of the
United States charged with the administration of public works or assistance  through public em-
ployment. Under this paragraph, the Employment Department  shall disclose the name, address, or-
dinary occupation and employment status of each recipient  of unemployment insurance benefits and
a statement of the recipient’s  right to further benefits under this chapter. The information disclosed
is confidential and may not be used for any other purpose.
(d) Pursuant to section 303(c)(1) of the Social Security  Act, to the Railroad Retirement Board.
Under this paragraph, the Employment  Department shall disclose unemployment insurance records.
The information disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any other  purpose. The costs of
disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid by the board.
(e) Pursuant to section 303(d) of the Social Security Act, upon request to officers and employees
of the United States Department of Agriculture  and to officers or employees of any state Supple-
mental Nutrition Assistance Program agency for the purpose of determining an individual’s eligibil-
ity for or the amount of supplemental nutrition assistance.  The information disclosed is confidential
and may not be used for  any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph
shall be paid by the United States Department of Agriculture.
(f) Pursuant to section 303(e)(1)  and (2)(A)(ii) of the Social Security Act, to state or local child
support enforcement  agencies enforcing child support obligations under Title IV-D of the Social Se-
curity Act for the purposes  of establishing child support obligations, locating individuals owing child
support obligations and collecting child support obligations from those  individuals. The information
disclosed is confidential and may not be used  for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing infor-
mation under this paragraph shall be paid by the child support enforcement agency.
(g) Pursuant to sections 303(f) and 1137 of the Social  Security Act, to agencies participating in
the income and eligibility verification system for the purpose of verifying  an individual’s eligibility
for benefits, or the amount of benefits, under unemployment insurance, temporary  assistance for
needy families, Medicaid, the  Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, Supplemental Security
Income, child support enforcement or Social Security programs. The information disclosed is  confi-
dential and may not be used  for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this
paragraph shall be paid by the requesting agency.
(h) Pursuant to section 303(h) of the Social Security Act and section 3304(a)(16)(B) of the Federal
Unemployment Tax Act, to the United States Department  of Health and Human Services National
Directory of New Hires. The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be used for any other
purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid by  the United States
Department of Health and Human Services.
(i) Pursuant to section 303(i) of the Social  Security Act, to officers and employees of the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development and to representatives of a public  housing
agency for the purpose of  determining an individual’s eligibility for benefits, or the amount of ben-
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 66
efits, under a housing assistance program of the United States Department of Housing  and Urban
Development. The information disclosed is confidential and may not be  used for any other purpose.
The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid  by the United States De-
partment of Housing and Urban Development or the public housing agency.
(j) Pursuant to regulations of the United States Secretary  of Health and Human Services issued
under section 3304(a)(16)(A) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, and except as required by  sec-
tion 303 of the Social Security Act,  to the state, a political subdivision or a federally recognized
Indian tribe that has signed an agreement with the  Department of Human Services to administer
Part A  of Title IV of the Social Security Act for the purpose of determining an individual’s eligi-
bility for assistance, or the amount of assistance, under a program funded under Part A of Title  IV
of the Social Security Act. The information disclosed is confidential and may not be used for  any
other purpose.
(k) Upon request,  to the United States Attorney’s Office. Under this paragraph, the Employment
Department may disclose an individual’s employment and wage information in response to  a federal
grand jury subpoena or for the purpose of  collecting civil and criminal judgments, including
restitution and special  assessment fees. The information disclosed is confidential and may not be
used for  any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid
by the United States Attorney’s Office.
(3) The Employment Department may disclose information secured from employing units:
(a) To state agencies, federal agencies,  local government agencies, public universities listed in
ORS 352.002 and the Oregon Health and Science University established under ORS  353.020, to the
extent necessary to properly carry out governmental planning, performance measurement, program
analysis, socioeconomic analysis or policy analysis functions  performed under applicable law. The
information disclosed is confidential and may not be disclosed by the agencies or universities in  any
manner that would identify individuals, claimants,  employees or employing units. If the information
disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the  costs
of disclosing the information shall be paid by the agency or university requesting the information.
(b) As part of a geographic information system. Points on a map may be  used to represent eco-
nomic data, including  the location, employment size class and industrial classification of businesses
in Oregon. Information presented as  part of a geographic information system may not give specific
details regarding a business’s address, actual employment  or proprietary information. If the infor-
mation disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of  the Employment Department,
the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the party requesting the information.
(c) In accordance with ORS 657.673.
(4) The Employment Department may:
(a) Disclose information to public employees in the performance of  their duties under state or
federal laws relating to the payment of unemployment  insurance benefits, the provision of employ-
ment services and the provision of workforce and labor market information.
(b) At the discretion of the Director of the Employment Department and subject to  an intera-
gency agreement, disclose information to public officials in the performance of  their official duties
administering or enforcing laws within their authority and to  the agents or contractors of public
officials. The public  official shall agree to assume responsibility for misuse of the information by
the official’s agent or contractor.
(c) Disclose information  pursuant to an informed consent, received from an employer or claim-
ant, to disclose the information.
(d) Disclose information to partners under the federal Workforce Innovation and  Opportunity
Act for the purpose of administering state workforce  programs under the Act. The information dis-
closed is confidential and may not  be used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information
under this paragraph shall be paid by the requesting partner.
(e) Disclose the names and addresses of employing units to the Bureau  of Labor and Industries
for the purpose of disseminating information to employing  units. The names and addresses disclosed
are confidential and  may not be used for any other purpose. If the information disclosed under this
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 67
paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment  Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the bureau.
(f) Disclose information to the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor  and Industries for the
purpose of performing duties under ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870, 658.005  to 658.245 or 658.405 to
658.511 or ORS chapter 652, 653 or 659A. The information  disclosed may include the names and
addresses of employers and  employees and payroll data of employers and employees. The information
disclosed  is  confidential and may not be used for any other purpose. If the information disclosed
under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the  Employment Department, the costs of dis-
closing the information shall be paid by the bureau.
(g) Disclose information required under ORS 657.660 (3) and  (4) to the Public Employees Re-
tirement System for the purpose of determining the eligibility of  members of the retirement system
for disability under ORS  chapters 238 and 238A. The information disclosed is confidential and may
not be used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this  paragraph shall
be paid by the Public Employees Retirement System.
(h) Disclose to the Oregon Business Development Commission and  the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department information required by the  commission and the department in performing their
duties under ORS 285A.050 and 285B.630 to verify changes in employment levels following direct
employer participation in department programs or indirect participation through municipalities  un-
der ORS 285B.410 to 285B.482. The information disclosed to the  commission and the department may
include an employer’s employment level, total  subject wages payroll and whole hours worked. The
information disclosed is confidential and may not be  used for any other purpose. The commission
and the department may not disclose the information in any manner that would identify an employ-
ing unit or employee except to the extent necessary  to carry out the commission’s and the
department’s duties under ORS 285A.050 and 285B.630. If the information disclosed  under this par-
agraph is not prepared  for the use of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the in-
formation shall be paid by the commission or the Oregon Business Development Department.
(i) Disclose information to the Department of Revenue for the purpose of performing its duties
under ORS 293.250 or under the revenue and tax laws  of this state. The information disclosed may
include the names and addresses of employers  and employees and payroll data of employers and
employees. The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be disclosed by the Department
of Revenue in any  manner that would identify an employing unit or employee except to the extent
necessary to carry out the department’s duties under ORS 293.250 or in auditing or reviewing any
report or return  required or permitted to be filed under the revenue and tax laws administered by
the department. The Department of Revenue may not disclose any information received  to any pri-
vate collection agency or for any other purpose. If the information  disclosed under this paragraph
is not  prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the information
shall be paid by the Department of Revenue.
(j) Disclose information to the Department of Consumer and Business Services for  the purpose
of performing its duties under ORS chapters 654 and 656. The information disclosed may include the
name, address, number of  employees and industrial classification code of an employer and payroll
data of employers and employees. The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be disclosed
by the Department of Consumer and Business Services in any  manner that would identify an em-
ploying unit or employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the  department’s duties under
ORS chapters 654 and 656, including administrative hearings and court proceedings in which  the
Department of Consumer  and Business Services is a party. If the information disclosed under this
paragraph is not prepared for the use  of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(k) Disclose information to the Construction Contractors Board for  the purpose of performing
its duties under ORS chapter 701. The information  disclosed to the board may include the names
and addresses of employers and status of their compliance with this chapter. If the information  dis-
closed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of  the Employment Department, the costs
of disclosing the information shall be paid by the board.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 68
(L) Disclose information to the State Fire Marshal to assist the State Fire Marshal  in carrying
out duties under ORS 453.307 to 453.414.  The information disclosed may include the name, address,
telephone number and  industrial classification code of an employer. The information disclosed is
confidential and may not be disclosed by the State Fire Marshal in any manner that would identify
an employing unit except to the extent necessary to carry out duties under  ORS 453.307 to 453.414.
If the  information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment
Department, the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the [ office] Department  of the
State Fire Marshal.
(m) Disclose information to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission for the purpose of
performing the commission’s duties under ORS chapter  348 and Title IV of the Higher Education
Act of 1965. The information disclosed may include the names and addresses of employers and  em-
ployees and payroll data of employers and employees. The information  disclosed is confidential and
may not be disclosed by the commission in any manner  that would identify an employing unit or
employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the commission’s duties under ORS  chapter
348 or Title IV of the Higher Education Act of  1965. If the information disclosed under this para-
graph is not prepared for the  use of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the infor-
mation shall be paid by the commission.
(n) Disclose information to the Department of Transportation  to assist the Department of
Transportation in carrying out the duties of the Department of Transportation relating to collection
of delinquent and liquidated debts, including  taxes, under ORS 184.610 to 184.665, 184.670 to 184.733
and 805.263, ORS chapter 319 and the Oregon Vehicle Code. The information disclosed may  include
the names and addresses of employers and employees and payroll data of employers and  employees.
The information disclosed is confidential and may  not be disclosed by the Department of Transpor-
tation in any manner  that would identify an employing unit or employee except to the extent nec-
essary to carry out the Department of Transportation’s duties relating to  collection of delinquent
and liquidated debts or in auditing or reviewing any report or return required or  permitted to be
filed under the revenue and tax laws administered by  the Department of Transportation. The De-
partment of Transportation may not disclose any information received to any private  collection
agency or for any other purpose.  If the information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared
for the use of the Employment  Department, the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by
the Department of Transportation.
(o) Disclose information to the Department of Human Services and  the Oregon Health Authority
to assist the Department of Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority  in the collection of
debts that the  Department of Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority are authorized by
law to collect. The information disclosed may include the names, addresses  and payroll data of em-
ployers and employees. The information disclosed  is confidential and may not be disclosed by the
Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority in a manner  that would identify an
employing unit or employee  except to the extent necessary for the collection of debts as described
in this paragraph. The Department  of Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority may not
disclose information received under this paragraph to a private collection agency or use the infor-
mation for a purpose other  than the collection of debts as described in this paragraph. If the infor-
mation disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of  the Employment Department,
the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the  Department of Human Services or the
Oregon Health Authority.
(p) Disclose to the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission  information required by the commission
in evaluating and measuring the  performance of alcohol and drug prevention and treatment pro-
grams under ORS 430.223 or the impact of  the programs on employment. The information disclosed
to the commission may include  total subject wages payroll and whole hours worked. The information
disclosed under this paragraph is  confidential and may not be used for any other purpose. The
commission may not disclose the information in any manner that would identify an employing unit
or employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the commission’s duties under  ORS 430.223.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 69
If the information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the  Employment
Department, the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the commission.
(q) Disclose to any person establishment level information  secured pursuant to this chapter from
federal, state and local government agencies, public universities  listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon
Health and Science University established  under ORS 353.020. If the information disclosed under
this paragraph is  not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing
the information shall be paid by the person requesting the information.
(r) Disclose to any person the industrial classification code assigned to an  employing unit. If the
information disclosed under this paragraph is  not prepared for the use of the Employment Depart-
ment, the costs of disclosing  the information shall be paid by the person requesting the information.
(s) Disclose information to the State Treasurer useful for the purpose of performing the State
Treasurer’s duties under ORS 98.302 to 98.436, 98.992 and 116.253 and the role of an estate  admin-
istrator under ORS 113.235. The information disclosed is confidential and may not be used by the
State Treasurer for any other purpose. If the information  disclosed is not prepared for the use of the
Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the State Treas-
urer.
(5) The Employment Department may make public all decisions of  the Employment Appeals
Board.
(6) Any officer appointed by or any employee of the Director  of the Employment Department
who discloses confidential  information, except with the authority of the director, pursuant to rules
or as otherwise required by law, may be disqualified from holding any appointment or  employment
with the Employment Department.
(7) Any person or any officer or employee of an entity to whom information is  disclosed by the
Employment Department under this  section who divulges or uses the information for any purpose
other than that specified in the provision of law or agreement authorizing the use  or disclosure may
be disqualified from  performing any service under contract or disqualified from holding any ap-
pointment or employment with the state agency that engaged  or employed that person, officer or
employee. The Employment Department may  immediately cancel or modify any information sharing
agreement with an entity when a person or an officer or employee of that  entity discloses confi-
dential information, other than as specified in law or agreement.
SECTION 144.
 ORS 731.820 is amended to read:
731.820. (1)(a) For the purpose of maintaining the [ office] Department of the State Fire Marshal
and paying the expenses incident thereto, every insurer transacting insurance covering  the peril of
fire shall pay a tax to  the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services, on or
before April 1 of each year, equal to 1.15 percent of  the gross amount of premiums received by it
or its  insurance producers from such business, from and under its policies covering direct domestic
risks in the preceding calendar year after deducting the amount of return premiums paid and the
amount of dividend payments made to policyholders or, in the case  of a reciprocal insurer, the
amount of savings paid or credited to the accounts of subscribers, with respect to such policies.
(b) For the purpose of paragraph  (a) of this subsection the following portions of the amounts
required to be reported by line of  business in the annual financial statement required by ORS
731.574 shall be considered premiums for insurance covering the peril of fire:
(A) Fire, 100 percent.
(B) Homeowners and farm owners multiple peril, 65 percent.
(C) Commercial multiple peril, 50 percent.
(D) Inland marine, 20 percent.
(E) Automobile physical damage, eight percent.
(F) Aircraft physical damage, eight percent.
(2) If an insurer ceases to do business or collect  premiums on direct domestic risks, it thereupon
shall make a report to the director  of its premiums subject to taxation as provided in subsection (1)
of this section and collected or due as of the date when  it ceased to do business or collect premiums
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 70
on direct domestic risks, and not theretofore reported,  and shall forthwith pay to the director the
tax thereon.
(3) If the director, during the period in which the  director under ORS 731.836 may collect taxes
owing under this section, finds the amount of such taxes paid by  an insurer to have been incorrect,
the director shall  charge or credit the insurer with the difference between the correct amount of
tax and the amount actually paid.
SECTION 145. ORS 735.470 is amended to read:
735.470. (1)(a) The surplus lines licensee shall pay the Director of  the Department of Consumer
and Business Services a surplus lines premium tax equal to two percent  of the gross amount of
premiums received on Oregon home state risks as shown in the report required by ORS 735.465.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 731.820, the surplus lines licensee shall also pay to the  director a tax
equal to  0.3 percent of the premium or fees charged by the insurer or the insurer’s insurance pro-
ducer and other intermediaries for the insurance, for  the purpose of maintaining the [ office] De-
partment of the State Fire Marshal and paying the expenses incident thereto.
(c) The taxes shall be collected by  the surplus lines licensee as specified by the director, in
addition to the gross amount of premiums charged by the insurer or the insurer’s insurance producer
and other intermediaries for the  insurance. The taxes on any portion of the premium unearned at
termination of insurance having been credited by the state  to the licensee shall be returned to the
policyholder directly by the surplus lines licensee or through the  producing insurance producer, if
any. The surplus lines licensee is prohibited from absorbing the  taxes, and from rebating for any
reason, any part of the taxes.
(2) The surplus lines taxes are due quarterly on the 45th day following  the calendar quarter in
which the premium is collected. The taxes shall be paid to and reported on forms prescribed by the
director or upon the director’s order paid to  and reported on forms prescribed by the Surplus Line
Association of Oregon.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if a surplus lines license is  terminated or
nonrenewed for any  reason, the taxes described in this section are due on the 30th day after the
termination or nonrenewal.
(4) For the purposes of carrying  out the Nonadmitted and Reinsurance Reform Act of 2010 (P.L.
111-203, Title V, Subtitle B), the director may collect taxes on 100  percent of the gross amount of
premiums on Oregon home state risks. If the director enters into a  compact or otherwise establishes
procedures with other states pursuant to ORS 735.418, the director by rule shall  establish proce-
dures to facilitate the reporting, collection, payment, allocation and disbursement of premium  taxes
on Oregon home state risks that also include risks allocable to other states.
(5) As used in this section, “gross amount  of premiums” has the meaning given that term in ORS
731.808.
SECTION 146.
 Section 13c, chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 13c.  (1)(a) The owner of oil at the time the oil is  transported by loaded tank railroad car
in this state shall pay to the Department of Revenue a fee not  to exceed $20 for each tank railroad
car loaded with oil.
(b) If the loaded tank railroad car enters this state from outside of this  state, the fee shall be
imposed on the owner of the oil at the time the loaded tank railroad car enters this state.
(c) If the tank railroad car is loaded with oil in this state, the fee shall be imposed upon the
loading of the oil into or onto the tank railroad car for transport in or through this state.
(2) The Department  of Environmental Quality and the [ office] Department  of the State Fire
Marshal shall establish by rule the amount of the fee required under this section as  necessary to
provide funding for programs  authorized to be funded by moneys in the High Hazard Train Route
Oil Spill Preparedness Fund established under [ section 14 of this 2019 Act ] ORS 468B.435 and  the
Oil and Hazardous Material Transportation by Rail Action Fund established under ORS 453.394.
(3) Any oil that the Constitution  or laws of the United States prohibit the state from taxing is
exempt from the fee imposed under this section.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 71
(4)(a) Each owner of oil transported  by loaded tank railroad car shall remit payment of the fee
established under this section on a quarterly basis.
(b) Each owner of oil  transported by loaded tank railroad car shall register with the Department
of Revenue at least 30 days prior to the date that the owner’s oil is transported by loaded  tank
railroad car in this state.
(c) Each owner of oil transported by loaded tank railroad car shall keep at the person’s  regis-
tered place of business complete and accurate records of  any petroleum products sold, purchased
by, or brought in or caused to be brought in to the place of business.
(d) The Department of Revenue, upon oral or written reasonable notice, may make such exam-
inations of the books, papers, records and equipment required to be  kept under this subsection as
it may deem necessary in carrying out this section.
(5) The Department of Revenue is authorized to establish those rules and procedures  for the
implementation and enforcement of  this section that are consistent with this section’s provisions and
are considered necessary and appropriate.
(6) The provisions of  ORS chapters 305 and 314 as to liens, delinquencies, claims for refund, is-
suance of refunds, conferences, appeals to the Oregon Tax Court, stay of collection  pending appeal,
cancellation, waiver, reduction or compromise of fees,  penalties or interest, subpoenaing and exam-
ining witnesses and books and papers,  and the issuance of warrants and the procedures relating
thereto, shall apply to the collection of fees, penalties and  interest by the Department of Revenue
under this section, except where the context requires otherwise.
(7) All moneys received by the Department of Revenue  under this section shall be deposited in
the State Treasury and credited to a suspense account established  under ORS 293.445. After pay-
ment of administration expenses incurred by the department in the administration of  this section
and of refunds or credits arising  from erroneous overpayments, the balance of the money shall be
transferred to the High Hazard Train Route Oil Spill Preparedness  Fund established under [ section
14 of this 2019 Act ] ORS 468B.435 and to the Oil and Hazardous Material Transportation by Rail
Action Fund established under ORS 453.394, in the  proportionate amounts that each agency found
and determined to be necessary under subsection (2) of this section.
OREGON HOMELAND SECURITY COUNCIL
SECTION 147. ORS 401.109 is amended to read:
401.109. (1) The  Oregon Homeland Security Council is [ created] established  within the Office
of [ Emergency Management ] the Governor.  The mission of the council is to assess risks to the
safety and security of the State of  Oregon with special emphasis on matters related to do-
mestic terrorism and other major threats  to the people of Oregon, including to critical
infrastructure, and to  make formal recommendations to the Governor with respect to
homeland security policy. [ The council shall: ]
[(a) Receive briefings on security matters: ]
[(A) For which the office is responsible at least annually  from state agencies and organizations as
determined by the council; and ]
[(B) Relating to catastrophic disasters declared  by the Governor pursuant to Article X-A, section
1, of the Oregon Constitution, or states of emergency  declared by the Governor pursuant to ORS
401.165.]
[(b) Advise state agencies with responsibility for security matters on the  future direction of the
office’s planning, preparedness, response and recovery activities. ]
(2) The council may:
(a) Recommend strategies to the Governor for the effective coordination of  information
gathering and dissemination on subjects associated with the mission.
(b) Request and receive briefings from state agencies or other entities  for development
of reports and recommendations for the Governor on subjects associated with the mission.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 72
(c) Facilitate interagency collaboration, cooperation and coordination  on operational is-
sues associated with the mission.
(d) Recommend policies to the Emergency Preparedness Advisory  Council on subjects
associated with the mission.
[(2)] (3) The membership of the council consists of:
(a) Four members from the Legislative Assembly appointed as follows:
(A) Two members from the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate; and
(B) Two members from the House of Representatives appointed by  the Speaker of the House of
Representatives;
(b) The Governor;
(c) The Adjutant General;
(d) The Superintendent of State Police;
(e) The Director of the [ Office] Oregon Department  of Emergency Management; [ and]
(f) A representative of the Department of Justice appointed by the Attorney General[ .];
(g) The State Resilience Officer;
(h) The State Fire Marshal;
(i) The Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training;
(j) The Director of the Oregon Health Authority;
(k) The Director of Transportation;
(L) The State Forester;
(m) The Director of the Department of Corrections;
(n) The Superintendent of State Police;
(o) One member appointed  by the Governor to act as a senior policy advisor for emer-
gency operations;
(p) A representative  of the Oregon TITAN Fusion Center with the ability to organize and
explain mission critical information, appointed by the Attorney General; and
(q) Additional members appointed by the Governor as the  Governor may deem necessary.
[(3)] (4)  Each member appointed to the council under subsection [ (2)] (3) of this section serves
at the pleasure of the appointing authority. The membership of a public  official ceases upon termi-
nation of the office held by the official at the time of appointment to the council.
[(4)] (5) The Governor is the chairperson of the council.
[(5)] (6)  The [ Adjutant General ] Director of the Oregon Department  of Emergency Man-
agement is the vice chairperson of the council and serves as the  chairperson in the absence of the
Governor.
[(6)] (7)  Members of the council are not entitled to compensation under ORS  292.495. The [ di-
rector] Governor , in the [ director’s ] Governor’s  discretion, may reimburse members of  the council
as provided in ORS 292.495  for actual and necessary travel or other expenses incurred in the per-
formance of their duties as members of the council.
(8) A majority  of the members of the council constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(9) Official action by the council requires the  approval of a majority of the members of
the council.
(10) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(11) The council shall  meet as needed to carry out the mission of the council, at times
and places specified by the call of  the chairperson or of a majority of the members of the
council.
(12) The council may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the council.
(13) The council may  employ and fix the compensation of such professional assistants and
clerical and other employees as the council deems necessary for  the effective conduct of its
work.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 73
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the council in the performance of the duties of the council and, to  the extent permitted by
laws relating to  confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the council
consider necessary to perform their duties.
(Finance)
SECTION 148. (1) The unexpended balances of amounts  authorized to be expended by the
Office of Emergency  Management for purposes of the Oregon Homeland Security Council for
the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, from revenues dedicated, continuously appropriated,
appropriated or otherwise made available to the office, are  transferred to and are available
for expenditure by the  Office of the Governor for purposes of the Oregon Homeland Security
Council for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021.
(2) The expenditure classifications, if any, established by Acts authorizing or  limiting
expenditures by the Office of Emergency Management remain applicable to expenditures  by
the Office of the Governor under this section.
NOTE: Sections 149 through 150c were  deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not
renumbered.
EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS ADVISORY COUNCIL
SECTION 151. (1) The  Emergency Preparedness Advisory Council is established within
the Office of  the Governor. The mission of the council is to facilitate policy recommendations
for catastrophic disaster preparedness, mitigation and response and recovery  planning, pro-
cedures and protocols with special emphasis on outreach to representatives of designated
state and federal emergency support functions.
(2) The council consists of:
(a) One member appointed by the Adjutant General to represent  the Oregon Military
Department;
(b) One member appointed  by the Director of the Oregon Department of Emergency
Management to represent the Oregon Department of Emergency Management;
(c) One member  appointed by the State Fire Marshal to represent the Department of the
State Fire Marshal;
(d) One member appointed by the  Superintendent of State Police to represent the De-
partment of State Police;
(e) One member appointed by the Director of  the Department of Public Safety Standards
and Training to represent the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training;
(f) One member appointed by the Director of the Oregon Health  Authority to represent
the Oregon Health Authority;
(g) One member  appointed by the Director of Transportation to represent the Depart-
ment of Transportation;
(h) One member appointed by the Attorney General to represent the Department  of
Justice;
(i) One member appointed by the State Forester to represent  the State Forestry De-
partment;
(j) Seven members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(A) One member to represent counties;
(B) One member to represent cities;
(C) One member with  experience in emergency preparedness to represent regional or-
ganizations;
(D) One member with  experience in emergency preparedness to represent local organ-
izations;
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 74
(E) One member representing the private sector;
(F) One member representing the nonprofit community with  a designated emergency
support function responsibility; and
(G) One member to represent Indian tribes in Oregon; and
(k) Additional members appointed by the Governor  as the Governor may deem necessary.
(3)(a) The council may research international and  national best practices and make
formal recommendations to the State Resilience Officer  or the Governor as needed, with
special emphasis given to connecting statewide  policy recommendations with state and fed-
eral emergency support function capabilities.
(b) The council shall  advise and make policy recommendations to the Oregon Homeland
Security Council regarding federal emergency support functions.
(4) A majority of the members  of the Emergency Preparedness Advisory Council consti-
tutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
(5) Official action by the council requires the  approval of a majority of the members of
the council.
(6) The council shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an  appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The council shall meet at  least once quarterly at the place specified by the call of the
chairperson or of a majority of the members of the council.
(9) The council may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the council.
(10) The Oregon Department  of Emergency Management shall provide staff support to
the council.
(11) Members of the council are not entitled to  compensation or reimbursement for ex-
penses and serve as volunteers on the council.
(12) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the council in the performance of the duties of the council and, to  the extent permitted by
laws relating to  confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the council
consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 151a.
Section 151 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2030.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT ADVISORY COUNCIL
SECTION 152. (1) The Local Government Emergency Management Advisory Council  is
established within the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
(2) The council consists of 11 members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(a) One member to represent an organization representing Oregon counties;
(b) One member to represent an organization representing Oregon cities;
(c) One member to represent emergency medical service providers;
(d) One member to represent fire departments;
(e) One member to represent a statewide association of emergency  managers, emergency
responders, government agencies and elected officials  committed to minimizing the impact
of disasters in Oregon;
(f) One member to represent county sheriffs;
(g) One member to represent 9-1-1 emergency dispatchers;
(h) One member to represent volunteer emergency medical service providers; and
(i) Three members with experience relating  to emergency preparedness or management
to represent the public.
(3) The council shall provide advice and recommendations to the Oregon  Department of
Emergency Management regarding its emergency preparedness and response functions.
(4) A majority of the members of the council constitutes a quorum for  the transaction
of business.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 75
(5) Official action by the council requires the approval  of a majority of the members of
the council.
(6) The council shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there is  a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an appointment to be-
come immediately effective.
(8) The council shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson  or
of a majority of the members of the council.
(9) The council may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the council.
(10) The department shall provide staff support to the council.
(11) Members of the council are not entitled to  compensation or reimbursement for ex-
penses and serve as volunteers on the council.
(12) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the council in the performance of the duties of the council and, to  the extent permitted by
laws relating to  confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the council
consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 152a.
Section 152 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2030.
TASK FORCE ON IMPLEMENTATION
SECTION 152b. (1) The Task Force on Implementation is established.
(2) The task force consists of  the members of the Governor’s Fire Service Policy Council
created under ORS 476.680. Nonvoting members of the council are nonvoting members of the
task force.
(3) The task force shall make recommendations as to  whether the office of the State Fire
Marshal should be made an independent state agency, and, if  not, in which existing state
agency the office of the State Fire Marshal should be housed. The task force’s  recommen-
dations must describe the rationales for the decisions of the task force.
(4) No later than February  1, 2022, the task force shall submit a report on its findings
and recommendations, which may include recommendations for legislation, to the  standing
or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly with subject matter responsibility  for
veterans and emergency management.
(5) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The office of the State Fire Marshal shall provide staff support to the task force.
(11) Members of the task force are not entitled to compensation  or reimbursement for
expenses and serve as volunteers on the task force.
(12) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance  of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 152c.
Section 152b of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 153. The Governor or the following agencies may take any action  before the
operative date specified in section 155 of this 2021 Act that is necessary for  the Governor or
agency to exercise, on or after the operative date specified in section 155 of  this 2021 Act,
all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the Governor or agency  by sections 1,
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 76
10 to 15, 25a and 148 to 152 of this 2021 Act  and the amendments to statutes and session law
by sections 2 to 9, 16, 24, 26 to 88h and 108 to 147 of this 2021 Act:
(1) The Office of Emergency Management;
(2) The Oregon Military Department;
(3) The office of the State Fire Marshal;
(4) The Department of State Police; or
(5) The Oregon Homeland Security Council.
SECTION 153a.
The Governor or the following  agencies may take any action before the
operative date specified in section  155a of this 2021 Act that is necessary for the Governor
or agency  to exercise, on or after the operative date specified in section 155a of this 2021
Act, all of  the duties, functions and powers conferred on the Governor or agency by sections
89 and 91 to 96 of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 476.020 by section 90  of this 2021
Act:
(1) The office of the State Fire Marshal; or
(2) The Department of State Police.
SECTION 153b.
The Governor or the following agencies  may take any action before the
operative date specified in section 155b of this 2021 Act that is  necessary for the Governor
or agency to exercise, on or after the operative date specified in section 155b of this  2021
Act, all of the duties,  functions and powers conferred on the Governor or agency by the
amendments to ORS 401.094 by section 16a of this 2021 Act:
(1) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management; or
(2) The Department of State Police.
NOTE:
 Section 154 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
OPERATIVE DATES
SECTION 155. Sections 1, 10 to 15, 25a and 148  to 152 of this 2021 Act and the amend-
ments to statutes and session law by sections 2 to 9, 16, 24, 26 to  88h and 108 to 147 of this
2021 Act become operative on July 1, 2022.
SECTION 155a. Sections 89 and 91 to 96 of this 2021 Act and the amendments to  ORS
476.020 by section 90 of this 2021 Act become operative on July 1, 2023.
SECTION 155b. The amendments to  ORS 401.094 by section 16a of this 2021 Act become
operative on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 155c. Between the operative date specified in  section 155 of this 2021 Act and
the operative date specified in section 155a of this 2021 Act:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, statutory references to  the Department
of the State Fire Marshal shall be construed to mean the office of  the State Fire Marshal in
the Department of State Police.
(2) Duties, functions and powers conferred on the Department of the State Fire  Marshal
are conferred on the office of the State Fire Marshal in the Department of State Police.
(3) Moneys appropriated to the Department of the State Fire Marshal shall  be construed
as appropriations to the Department of State Police for purposes of the office  of the State
Fire Marshal.
FISCAL PROVISIONS
SECTION 156. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Military Department by  section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5535), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  for emergency
management, is increased by $3,431,834  for preparing the Office of Emergency Management
as a separate state agency.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 77
SECTION 157. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Military Department by  section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5535), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for administration,
is increased by  $1,006,057 for preparing the Office of Emergency Management as a separate
state agency.
SECTION 158. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5535), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in section 2 (4), chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5535),
collected or received by the Oregon Military Department, for community support,  is in-
creased by $5,000,000 for state active duty costs.
SECTION 159. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $1,807,561, to  be allocated to the Department of State Police for pre-
paring the office of the State Fire Marshal as a separate state agency.
SECTION 160. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Office of the Governor, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $237,161 to support the work of  the Oregon Homeland Security
Council.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 161. The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are  provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 162. This 2021 Act being necessary for  the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 78
Passed by House June 21, 2021
Repassed by House June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2927 (HB 2927-C) Page 79